CLIMATE  CHANGE  RESEARCH 
AND  SCIENTIFIC  INTEGRITY 

S.  HRG.  110–1060 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

FEBRUARY  7,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

35–039 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 7, 2007  .........................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Letter,  dated  July  5,  2006,  from  Steven  F.  Hayward,  Ph.D.  and  Kenneth 
Green, Ph.D., Scholars, American Enterprise Institute for Public Policy 
Research  to  Prof.  Steve  Schroeder,  Department  of  Atmospheric 
Sciences, Texas A&M University  .................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain  .................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 

WITNESSES 

Anthes, Richard A., Ph.D., President, University Corporation for Atmospheric 
Research  (UCAR);  Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications 
from Space, National Research Council, The National Academies  ..................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Brennan,  Dr.  William,  Acting  Director,  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Pro-
gram,  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  for  International  Affairs,  National  Oce-
anic and Atmospheric Administration, DOC  .....................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Knutson,  Thomas  R.,  Research  Meteorologist,  Geophysical  Fluid  Dynamics 
Laboratory, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, DOC  ...........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Mahoney, James R., Ph.D., Environmental Consultant  .......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Piltz,  Rick,  Director,  Climate  Science  Watch,  Government  Accountability 
Project  ...................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Rowland,  Dr.  F.  Sherwood,  Professor,  Chemistry  and  Earth  System  Science, 
School of Physical Sciences, University of California, Irvine  ...........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Gleick, Peter H., Ph.D., President, Pacific Institute; MacArthur Fellow; Mem-
ber, U.S. National Academy of Science, prepared statement  ...........................
Pryor, Hon. Mark, U.S. Senator from Arkansas, prepared statement  ................
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Richard A. Anthes, Ph.D.  .................................................................................
Rick Piltz  ...........................................................................................................
Dr. F. Sherwood Rowland  ................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Mark  Pryor  to  Dr.  William 
................................................................................................................

Brennan 

Response to written question submitted by Hon. Ted Stevens to: 

Richard A. Anthes, Ph.D.  .................................................................................
Thomas R. Knutson  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 

53 
5 
8 
7 
3 
4 
60 
2 

14 
16 

9 
11 

23 
24 
26 
28 

32 
34 

49 
51 

73 
73 

78 
80 
86 

78 

79 
88 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

CLIMATE  CHANGE  RESEARCH  AND 

SCIENTIFIC  INTEGRITY 

WEDNESDAY,  FEBRUARY  7,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:08  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building.  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  apologize  for  my  delay,  believe  it  or  not,  I  was 

stuck in the elevator. 

Over  the  course  of  this  Congress,  the  Commerce  Committee  will 
pursue  legislation  to  strengthen  the  Federal  climate  research  pro-
gram. We owe it to our constituents and future generations to sup-
port  the  fundamental  science  needed  to  fully  understand  the  im-
pact of climate change. 

However, before we can even begin to debate climate change, we 
must  investigate  the  numerous  allegations  that  our  Federal  sci-
entists  are  being  constrained  from  conveying  their  research  find-
ings and conclusions. Such allegations are very serious. 

We, in Congress, as well as decisionmakers within the regulatory 
agencies  must  examine  and  weigh  the  scientific  evidence  to  guide 
changes in policies, laws and regulations. 

To  make  the  best  decisions,  we  need  free  access  to  unbiased  sci-
entific  findings  and  conclusions,  because  the  quality  of  our  deci-
sions  is  highly  dependent  upon  the  science  we  use  to  make  those 
decisions. 

To  deny  Federal  scientists  the  right  to  speak,  or  to  change  the 
findings  of  their  work,  or  to  deny  the  release  of  their  work,  basi-
cally  creating  an  atmosphere  of  intimidation  and  fear,  is  a  great 
disservice to the public. 

On  January  30,  2007,  the  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists  issued 
a  report  called,  ‘‘Atmosphere  of  Pressure:  Political  Interference  in 
Federal  Climate  Science.’’  The  report  found  and  documented  an 
alarming  number  of  instances  in  which  Federal  scientists  and  em-
ployees  were  pressured  to  downplay  the  significance  of  their  cli-
mate science work, or were prevented from sharing the results and 
conclusions with the public. 

Today’s  hearing  will  examine  these  claims,  which  suggests  that 
we  have  not  always  had  unfettered  access  to  climate  change  re-
search  data.  Let  me  be  clear  to  those  who  criticize  this  report, 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

claiming that the survey size is too small; one incidence of political 
tampering with science is too many. 

for  his  work  on 

Dr. Rowland, who appears today, shared the 1995 Nobel Prize in 
the  environmental  effects  of 
Chemistry 
chlorofluorocarbons  or  CFCs.  His  work  eventually  led  to  the  Mon-
treal  Protocol,  an  international  treaty,  which  stopped  the  wide-
spread  use  of  CFCs  and  helped  reverse  the  damage  to  the  ozone 
layer. 

Dr.  Rowland  serves  as  an  example  of  the  role  that  accurate,  un-

distorted science can play in achieving sound policy. 

With our witnesses, we’ll discuss the extent to which government 
scientists  are  able  to  communicate  their  results  and  conclusions  to 
Congress  and  the  public  and  will  make  recommendations  on  how 
to increase scientific openness in all of the Federal agencies. 

Of course, the communication of scientific information is just half 
of the story of science integrity. We also must fund appropriate re-
search  to  ensure  that  climate  science  advances.  So,  we  have  an-
other  witness  who  will  discuss  the  funding  of  climate  research,  in-
cluding important satellite measurements. 

We  have  much  work  ahead  of  us  if  we  are  to  seriously  address 

the issue of climate change. 

We  begin  with  the  issue  of  scientific  integrity  as  the  foundation 
of  that  effort.  So,  I  thank  all  of  our  witnesses  for  joining  us  today, 
and  we’re  looking  forward  to  a  lively  discussion.  And  may  I  now 
call upon the Vice Chairman of the Committee. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Mr. Chairman, global climate change is a very 
serious  problem  for  us,  becoming  more  so  every  day.  As  far  as  the 
United  States  is  concerned,  the  evidence  of  global  climate  change 
is more apparent in my home State of Alaska than anywhere else. 
During  my  most  recent  trip  to  the  West  Coast  of  Alaska,  I  wit-
nessed  an  incident  where  the  fuel  storage  tank  for  the  whole  vil-
lage  of  Kivalina  nearly  fell  into  the  ocean  due  to  severe  winter 
storms  and  coastal  erosion.  The  potential  catastrophe  was  averted 
through  emergency  action  taken  by  the  U.S.  Army  Corps  of  Engi-
neers,  but  over  the  past  years  we’ve  seen  many  other  changes  in 
the Arctic besides severe coastal erosion. 

The  Arctic  sea  ice  is  receding,  the  trees  are  going  further  north, 
the  permafrost  is  thawing,  the  impact  of  climate  change  is  real, 
and  we  need  to  prepare  for  its  effects,  and  to  do  this,  we  do  need 
sound science. 

I  am  concerned  about  the  human  impacts  on  our  climate,  and 
that’s  why  I  have  introduced  Senate  Bill  183,  the  Improved  Pas-
senger  Automobile  Fuel  Economy  Act  of  2007.  Some  think  that’s  a 
strange  thing,  coming  from  me,  but  I  believe  it’s  essential  that  we 
raise  the  questions  about  how  much  of  this  effect  is  being  caused 
by man, and how much of it is really a natural phenomenon? 

This bill will require a fuel economy standard of 40 miles per gal-
lon  for  passenger  automobiles  manufactured  in  the  model  year 
2017. I believe we do have the technology-base to do that. 

The  transportation  sector  generates  more  than  one-third  of  the 
Nation’s  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  I  believe  we  must  demand  im-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

proved fuel economy from our vehicles, and this bill requires a vol-
untary  national  registry  for  the  greenhouse  gas  trading  credits.  I 
am  extremely  alarmed  by  the  information  I’m  getting  about  meth-
ane,  and  its  release  from  areas  like  our  permafrost  in  Alaska  and 
in Russia. 

We need to look at other possible causes of climate change. Over 
the  past  100  years,  the  sun  has  radiated  additional  energy,  which 
is  responsible  in  part  for  the  increase  of  global  temperature 
changes.  Researchers  such  as  Dr.  Syun  Akasofu  at  our  Inter-
national Arctic Research Center in Alaska, found that the Atlantic 
and  Pacific  oscillations  have  been  dumping  warm  ocean  water  in 
the  Arctic  Ocean.  This  has  greatly  contributed  to  the  degradation 
of the Arctic sea ice. 

In order to obtain a better understanding of these, and other fac-
tors,  we  need  a  robust  climate  science  budget,  and  I  support  you 
in the concept that it should be totally non-partisan, and it should 
be a concept of validating what each researcher is asserting. 

We  have  so  many  different  assertions  now  as  to  what  is  causing 
climate  change.  Really,  good  scientist’s  conclusions  are  based  on 
their own research, and their computer runs remind me of my first 
introduction  to  computers,  and  that  is,  you’ve  got  to  be  sure  what 
goes in if you want to understand what comes out. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator McCain? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator MCCAIN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, and I thank you for 
holding this hearing. I would just like to briefly say that, for years 
we  have  been  frustrated  by  the  lack  of  recognition,  much  less  co-
operation,  on  the  part  of  the  Administration  in  addressing  this 
issue. Required reports that I would ask be made part of the record 
have never been—that were required by law—have never been sub-
mitted  by  the  Administration,  and  fortunately,  hopefully,  we  have 
now  turned  a  corner  and  that  there  is  finally  recognition  that  the 
debate is over. 

Now, the question is, how do we accommodate, as a world, condi-
tions  that—to  some  degree—are  irreversible,  and  how  do  we  as  a 
Congress  and  a  Nation,  take  the  required  measures  to  reduce  the 
emissions of greenhouse gases? 

So,  I  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing,  Mr.  Chairman.  I’d  just 
like  to—an  example  of  the  kind  of—it  was  back  in  Fiscal  Year 
2002, Admiral Lautenbacher said, ‘‘The greenhouse gases are rising 
today,  there’s  not  anything  you  can  do,  short  of  everyone  going  to 
bed  for  the  next  30  years,  to  stop  them  from  rising.  So,  the  object 
is to stop the growth of greenhouse gases.’’ 

This  is  the  kind  of  attitude  that,  unfortunately  we  had  from  the 
Administration  for  many,  many  years,  including  the  years  that  I 
had the honor of chairing this committee. I hope today, and in the 
future,  we  will  turn  the  corner  and  get  serious  about  addressing 
them. 

And I thank you for holding this hearing, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Senator McCain follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN, U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

4 

Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman  for  calling  today’s  hearing.  I  applaud  your  efforts  to 
continue  with  these  committee  hearings  concerning  one  of  the  most  challenging 
issues of our time, climate change. 

As indicated by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change’s Fourth Assess-
ment Report Summary for Policymakers which was issued last Friday, there is over-
whelming  scientific  evidence  that  mankind  is  altering  the  world’s  climate  system. 
The Report’s assessment is yet another call for us to take this problem seriously and 
to  immediately  take  actions  to  make  significant  reductions  in  our  greenhouse  gas 
emissions. 

I am pleased that the Administration is represented here today to discuss this se-
rious  problem.  I  hope  that  we  can  have  an  open  discussion  on  whether  or  not  this 
Administration  have  sought  to  alter  the  work  of  or  denied  public  access  to  many 
of our top scientists. 

As  I  have  traveled  around  the  world,  I  have  heard  from  many  scientists  of  their 
concerns on this issue. As a result of some scientists coming forth publicly with their 
claims,  the  Administration  has  started  the  process  of  revising  their  policies  to  pro-
vide  for  greater  openness  of  scientific  research  results.  This  problem  must  be  cor-
rected immediately. Otherwise, we risk losing the confidence of the American public 
and the broader research community regarding the quality and credibility of govern-
ment-sponsored scientific research results. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  also  note  the  fact  the  other  Senate  Committees  are  also  having 
hearings on climate change. I think this a good thing and will only serve to further 
educate the Members on this complex issue. 

A couple of weeks ago, a coalition of major U.S.-based businesses, with a combined 
market  capitalization  of  over  $750  billion,  joined  with  environmental  organizations 
to  call  upon  our  Federal  Government  to  quickly  enact  strong  national  legislation  to 
achieve significant reductions of greenhouse gas emissions. The members of the U.S. 
Climate  Action  Partnership  recognize  that  setting  the  ground  rules  now  for  man-
aging  greenhouse  gasses  will  unleash  American  ingenuity  in  an  all  out  effort  to 
meet this complicated challenge. 

In their letter to President Bush, the coalition said that, ‘‘properly constructed pol-
icy  can  be  economically  sustainable,  environmentally  responsible,  and  politically 
achievable. Swift legislative action on our proposal would encourage innovation and 
provide  needed  U.S.  leadership  on  this  global  challenge.’’  They  further  stated  that 
‘‘. . . climate change will create more economic opportunities than risks for the U.S. 
economy.’’ I agree. 

Senator Lieberman and I recently introduced our bill S. 280, the Climate Steward-
ship  and  Innovation  Act  of  2007.  This  legislation  is  based  upon  five  guiding  prin-
ciples. 

First, it must have rational, mandatory emission reduction targets and timetables. 
It  must  be  goal  oriented,  and  have  both  environmental  and  economic  integrity.  Let 
us  realize  that  the  climate  system  reacts  not  to  emission  intensity  but  to  atmos-
pheric  concentration  levels.  We  need  policy  that  will  produce  necessary  reductions, 
not  merely  check  political  boxes.  The  reductions  must  be  feasible  and  based  on 
sound  science,  and  this  is  what  we  have  tried  to  do  in  our  bill.  We  realized  that 
this  problem  is  an  environmental  problem  with  significant  economic  implications 
and not an economic problem with significant environmental implications. 

Second,  it  must  utilize  a  market-based,  economy-wide  ‘‘cap  and  trade’’  system.  It 
must  limit  greenhouse  gas  emissions  and  allow  the  trading  of  emission  credits 
across the economy to drive enterprise, innovation and efficiency. This is the central 
component of our legislation. Voluntary efforts will not change the status quo, taxes 
are  counterproductive,  and  markets  are  more  dependable  than  regulators  in  effect-
ing sustainable change. 

Third,  it  must  include  mechanisms  to  minimize  costs  and  work  effectively  with 
other  markets.  The  ‘‘trade’’  part  of  ‘‘cap  and  trade’’  is  such  a  mechanism,  but  it’s 
clear  it  must  be  bolstered  by  other  assurances  that  costs  will  be  minimized.  I  am 
as  concerned  as  anyone  about  the  economic  impacts  associated  with  any  climate 
change legislation. I know that many economists are developing increasingly sophis-
ticated  ways  to  project  future  costs  of  compliance.  Lately,  we  have  seen  the  in-
creased interest in this area of research. As we learn more from these models about 
additional  action  items  to  further  reduce  costs,  we  intend  to  incorporate  them.  Al-
ready, based upon earlier economic analysis, we have added offset provisions in this 
bill  in  an  effort  to  minimize  costs  and  to  provide  for  the  creation  of  new  markets. 
And,  I  assure  my  colleagues,  we  will  continue  to  seek  new  and  innovative  ways  to 
further  minimize  costs.  Let  me  again  mention  what  the  coalition  of  CEO’s  of  major 
U.S.-based  companies  and  environmental  groups  said  last  week,  ‘‘In  our  view,  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

climate  change  challenge  will  create  more  economic  opportunities  than  risks  for  the 
U.S. economy.’’ 

Fourth,  it  must  spur  the  development  and  deployment  of  advanced  technology. 
Nuclear,  solar,  and  other  alternative  energy  must  be  part  of  the  equation  and  we 
need  a  dedicated  national  commitment  to  develop  and  bring  to  market  the  tech-
nologies of the future as a matter of good environmental and economic policy. There 
will  be  a  growing  global  market  for  these  technologies  and  the  U.S.  will  benefit 
greatly from being competitive and capturing its share of these markets. Our legis-
lation  includes  a  comprehensive  technology  title  that  would  go  a  long  way  toward 
meeting  this  goal.  Unlike  the  Energy  bill,  it  would  be  funded  using  the  proceeds 
from  the  auctioning  of  allowable  emission  credits,  rather  than  from  the  use  of  tax-
payers’ funds or appropriations that will never materialize. 

And  fifth,  it  must  facilitate  international  efforts  to  solve  the  problem.  Global 
warming  is  an  international  problem  requiring  an  international  effort.  The  United 
States has an obligation to lead. If we don’t lead proactively, we will find ourselves 
following. There is no in between. However, our leadership cannot replace the need 
for action by countries such as India and China. We must spur and facilitate it. We 
have  added  provisions  that  would  allow  U.S.  companies  to  enter  into  partnerships 
in  developing  countries  for  the  purpose  of  conducting  projects  to  achieve  certified 
emission reductions, which may be traded on the international market. 

These five components represent a serious challenge that will require a great deal 
of  effort,  the  concentration  of  substantial  intellectual  power,  and  the  continued  ef-
forts of our colleagues and those in the environmental, industrial, economic, and na-
tional security communities. 

Again,  I  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing.  I  welcome  our  witnesses  here  today 

and look forward to their testimony. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  I  can  assure  you, 

we’ll do our very best, sir. 

Senator Kerry? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. Thank you 
for holding this hearing. I thank Senator McCain, also, because he 
held some important hearings for a period of time as Chairman. 

This is a very important beginning, Mr. Chairman. There are two 
great issues in our Congress right now, one is obviously a war that 
we’re  engaged  in,  in  Iraq,  and  this.  This  is  the  other  great  issue. 
It’s  hard  sometimes,  because  of  the  draconian  scenarios  that  the 
end-game draw for us all with respect to global climate change. It’s 
hard for some people to wrap their hands around it and say, ‘‘Wow, 
this is really serious,’’ or ‘‘We could do something about it.’’ 

The  bottom  line  is,  as  you  know,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  have  no 
choice.  We  have  to.  I’ve  been  involved  in  this,  since  I  got  on  the 
Commerce  Committee.  Senator  Gore  and  I,  and  a  few  others  held 
the  first  hearings  on  this  back  in  1987.  We  then  became  partici-
pants in the first inter-parliamentary conference, sometime around 
1989–1990, I remember. Then we went down to Rio, and took part 
in the Earth Summit, and came up with an agreed-upon framework 
for  voluntary  reductions.  But  even  then,  in  1990,  the  science  was 
there  and  people  were  accepting  that  we  had  to  do  something.  In 
1992,  President  George  Herbert  Walker  Bush  signed  that  Frame-
work Agreement, and we ratified it. 

Since  then,  the  science  has  been  growing.  You’ve  had  the  UN 
IPCC  Report  of  2001,  which  could  not  have  been  more  clear.  In 
fact, we’ve had 928 peer-reviewed studies, all of which confirm the 
human  input  to  global  climate  change,  to  the  warming,  to  the 
greenhouse  gas  effect,  and  all  of  us  understand  the  basic  science. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

That,  without  the  greenhouse  effect,  life  wouldn’t  exist  on  Earth. 
We all understand that it’s containing gases—and I’m not going to 
go through it all now, except to say that the science has been build-
ing on this. 

As John Holdren at Wood’s Hole in Harvard says, you know, the 
other  side  has  a  responsibility  to  show  something  to  the  contrary. 
There  isn’t  one  peer-reviewed  study,  not  one,  that  suggests  an  al-
ternative  that  scientists  accept  as  to  why  the  warming  is  taking 
place,  and  not  one  peer-reviewed  study  that  tells  us  why  there 
might  be  this  warming  outside  of  human-induced  greenhouse 
gases. 

So,  what  are  we  doing  here?  Now,  scientists  tell  us  there  is  a 
confirmed  consensus  that  we  have  a  10-year  window.  Now,  what 
happens  if  we’re  all  wrong?  Those  of  us  who  believe  the  science  of 
928  peer-reviewed  reports,  and  of  over  1,000–1,500  scientists,  and 
over 600 who just gathered in Paris—what happens if we’re wrong? 
And we embrace doing things about clean fuels and efficiency; and 
clean  coal  technology?  The  ‘‘Big  Three’’  of  what  we  have  available 
to  us.  If  we’re  wrong,  we’ve  got  cleaner  air,  a  healthier  Nation, 
more jobs, better technology, and we’ve protected the environment. 
What  happens  if  they’re  wrong?  Catastrophe.  That’s  the  ledger, 
here.  Mr.  Chairman,  you  know  this  is  important  because  this  Ad-
ministration  has  been  beyond  irresponsible  on  this.  Beyond  irre-
sponsible. In the face of all of this science, in the face of all of these 
reports, they’re playing games, political games for money. 

What they do is they take the science, and they tailor it to reflect 
their  political  goals.  The  interference  is  stunning—from  deleting 
key words, deleting words, this is George Orwell at its best—delet-
ing  ‘‘warming  climate,’’  deleting  ‘‘global  climate  change,’’  deleting 
‘‘climate  change’’  from  press  releases,  changing  agency  mission 
statements, de-emphasizing climate research, denying media access 
to  prominent  climate  scientists.  It’s  absolutely  stunning,  what’s 
been going on. And it has to stop. 

This  is  the  right  place  to  begin,  Mr.  Chairman,  looking  at  what 
has  been  going  on  in  terms  of  blocking  America’s  access  to  the 
truth. And we have to build on this, but Senator McCain is right— 
we  all  have  to  recognize,  this  Congress  has  got  to  take  the  steps 
to deal with this. The signs are everywhere. 

I’ve  just  finished,  actually,  writing  a  book  on  this.  You  can  look 
at  what’s  happening  in  Alaska  alone.  I  think,  Senator,  if  I’m 
wrong—didn’t  they  spend  several  hundred  million  dollars  to  move 
a village? 

Senator STEVENS. About to. 
Senator KERRY. They are going to have to do it. And, the fisher-
man  can’t  go  out  and  fish  to  the  extent  they  were,  because  the 
slush  is  such,  they  can’t  ride  snowmobiles,  reduced  to  boats,  the 
winter storms prevent them from doing it—life is changing. 

Senator STEVENS. I’d add to that, they can’t afford the gas. 
Senator KERRY. And they can’t afford it. 
In  Alaska  they  can’t  afford  it?  God,  I  thought  they  gave  it  to 

them for free there. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KERRY. When you sit with Jim Hansen, and Dr. Hansen 
tells  you  months  ago  that  within  the  next  30  years,  the  Arctic  ice 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

is  going  to  disappear,  it’s  not  a  question  of  if,  and,  or  but.  Barring 
some  God-intervention  that  we  can’t  predict,  it’s  gone.  And  that 
means  more  water  exposed  to  the  sun,  which  heats  up,  which 
means the Greenland Ice Sheet is more at risk, and we’re just play-
ing  with  the  potential  for  catastrophe.  So,  I  thank  you,  Mr.  Chair-
man.  I  think  there  is  nothing  more  important  for  us  to  focus  on, 
and  I  intend  to  certainly  pour  my  energies  into  this,  because  I 
think it’s a great challenge of our time. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much.  I  was  ready  to  pack  my 

bags. 

Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  this 
hearing,  and  finally  coming  to  grips  with  something  that  has  been 
obvious in our view for some time now. 

And  I  do  want  to  welcome  this  distinguished  panel,  particularly 
Mr. Tom Knutson, who is a scientist from the NOAA lab in Prince-
ton, New Jersey. 

The  first  question  that  arises  is  whether  or  not  there’s  actually 
global warming taking place? And finally, when it smacks us in the 
face, we say, ‘‘You know what? It feels warmer here.’’ The warmest 
month, the warmest year, all of the statistics that tell you what the 
condition is. 

I  sit  on  another  committee,  the  Environment  and  Public  Works 
Committee,  and  it  was  there  that  it  was  suggested  that  global 
warming was one of the worst—was the worst hoax perpetrated on 
man.  And  this  is  not  years  ago,  this  is  weeks  ago  that  this  propo-
sition was put out in front of us. 

The next one was whether or not human action has any influence 
on  it.  We  had  a  scientist  there  who  was  brought  in  from  France, 
from the Pasteur Institute, who said that there was really a global 
warming going on, that we’d see more incidents of malaria. And we 
don’t  see  the  mosquito  population  growing,  that  was  very  com-
forting, I must tell you. 

So,  this  total  state  of  denial  is  ridiculous,  and  finally,  now,  the 
truth  is  going  to  come  out.  If  anyone  had  any  doubt  on  global 
warming’s effect on the Earth, or the human effect on global warm-
ing,  the  recent  IPCC  report  just  erased  all  of  the  doubt.  The  work 
of  2,500  scientists,  113  countries,  researchers  who  were  free  to  let 
science  speak  for  itself,  down  to  my  colleagues,  who  have  said  the 
theory that the warming of the climate system is unequivocal, and 
human activity is to blame. 

The  importance  of  what  the  report  says  is  the  fact  that  this  re-
port  relies  on  uncensored,  unedited,  unmodified  science  to  say  so. 
In  contrast  to  the  honesty  of  the  IPCC  Report,  the  Bush  Adminis-
tration  has  permitted  the  removal,  the  censored  redaction  of  data, 
that  was  developed,  destroying  the  meaning  of  the  scientists  in 
order to advance a political agenda. 

The  Administration  has  obstructed,  blocked,  and  delayed  release 
of  government  reports  on  global  warming,  they  deleted  key  words, 
‘‘global  warming,’’  ‘‘warming  climate’’  from  public  documents.  It’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

hard to imagine that something so crude would purvey the Admin-
istration’s view, and the handling of science. 

Well, we’re going to make a change, this Committee’s hearing in-
dicates  that,  as  was  said  in  a  movie,  ‘‘we’re  sick  and  tired  of  it, 
we’re not going to take it anymore.’’ 

Thank you very much. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  and  now  may  I  call  upon 

Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF THE HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I’m  very 
pleased  that  the  Commerce  Committee  is  looking  at  the  issue  of 
global warming. 

I’m on the Agriculture Committee and the Environment and Pub-
lic  Works  Committee,  in  addition  to  this  committee,  so  it  puts  me 
in  a  unique  position  to  continue  to  work  on  this  issue.  The  bad 
news  is  Secretary  Johanns  is  testifying  in  the  Agriculture  Com-
mittee, so I’m going to be brief. 

I  was  just  at  home,  in  Minnesota  over  the  weekend,  where  you 
know,  we  had  70-below-zero  wind  chills.  So,  global  warming,  I 
didn’t  think,  would  be  the  topic  people  would  want  to  talk  about. 
But, it was amazing to me, whether it was hunters who are seeing 
the  effects  firsthand  throughout  our  state,  or  people  who  ice  fish 
who took months to put their fish houses out. People are very con-
cerned about this. It has gone beyond the science, to regular people 
seeing  the  effects  of  global  warming  in  our  state,  and  wanting  to 
do something about it. 

Like most Americans, I’m an optimist. I come from the state that 
gave  you  the  pacemaker  and  the  Post-It  note,  and  I  believe  in  the 
power  of  science,  in  the  power  of  innovation,  in  the  power  of  tech-
nology. I believe in the intelligence and the ingenuity of the Amer-
ican people when we’re confronted with a challenge. That’s why I’m 
so  troubled  when  I  hear  about  efforts  to  elevate  politics  over 
science; when I learn that our best and our brightest thinkers and 
researchers  are  not  getting  the  breathing  space  that  they  need  to 
do their work. 

I believe we can do better. I come from the background of a pros-
ecutor,  and  the  cardinal  rule  in  our  job  is  that  evidence,  and  not 
politics,  determines  our  decisions  in  charging  and  prosecuting 
criminals.  That’s  a  simple  but  all-important  concept.  And  that’s 
where I come from when I look at this issue before us today. 

That’s why I think our government’s approach to climate change 
has  to  rest  on  three  principles.  Our  policy  decisions  on  climate 
change  and  global  warming  must  be  guided  by  the  best  science 
available,  not  by  the  worst  partisan  politics.  Second,  our  govern-
ment  has  a  duty  to  give  our  scientists  and  researchers  all  of  the 
support they need to help us confront and overcome this enormous 
challenge. And third, the American public has a right to hear, con-
sider  and  debate  the  conclusions  of  our  scientists.  And  our  sci-
entists  have  a  right  to  express  their  views  without  government  in-
terference or suppression. 

If  we  do  not  adhere  to  these  principles,  we’re  going  to  be  falling 
farther, and farther behind in our efforts to tackle global warming. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

I  appreciate  the  leadership  of  people  in  this  room,  like  Senator 
McCain,  and  Senator  Kerry  on  this  issue.  I  believe  we  are  close  to 
getting  things  done  on  this  issue,  that  there  is  a  movement  across 
this  country,  a  bipartisan  movement.  But,  to  do  that,  we  have  to 
get  the  science  right,  and  we  can’t  suppress  the  work  of  our  sci-
entists. 

So, I thank you, thank you very much. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator.  And  now  we 

come to the panel. 

Our  first  witness,  the  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  for  Inter-
national Affairs at the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Adminis-
tration,  and  Acting  Director  of  the  Climate  Change  Science  Pro-
gram, Dr. Bill Brennan. 

Dr. Brennan? 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  WILLIAM  BRENNAN,  ACTING  DIRECTOR, 
U.S.  CLIMATE  CHANGE  SCIENCE  PROGRAM,  DEPUTY 
ASSISTANT  SECRETARY  FOR  INTERNATIONAL  AFFAIRS, 
NATIONAL  OCEANIC  AND  ATMOSPHERIC  ADMINISTRATION, 
DOC 
Dr.  BRENNAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  I’ll  see  if  I  can  en-

croach on Dr. Anthes’ space just a little bit here. 

Chairman  Inouye,  and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  I  appreciate  the 
opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today  about  climate  change  re-
search and scientific integrity. 

My  name  is  Bill  Brennan,  and  since  June  2006,  I  have  been  the 
Acting  Director  of  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  in 
addition to my position as the Deputy Assistant Secretary for Inter-
national Affairs with the Department of Commerce’s National Oce-
anic and Atmospheric Administration. 

In  2001,  President  Bush  commissioned  the  National  Academy  of 
Sciences to do a special report on the state of the science on climate 
change.  The  Academy  responded  that  the  surface  temperature  of 
the  Earth  is  warming,  and  that  human  activities  are  largely  re-
sponsible.  The  President  followed  up  on  this  report  by  creating  a 
special  cabinet-level  committee,  headed  by  the  Departments  of 
Commerce  and  Energy,  as  well  as  creating  the  Climate  Change 
Science Program, and the Climate Change Technology Program, to 
lead  the  Administration’s  efforts  to  confront  this  serious  environ-
mental problem. 

CCSP integrates Federal research on global change, and oversees 
the  nearly  $2  billion  spent  by  13  Federal  agencies.  This  program 
is  charged  with  investigating  natural  and  human-induced  changes 
to  Earth’s  environmental  systems,  and  to  monitoring  and  under-
standing  and  predicting  global  change.  The  goal  is  to  provide  a 
sound, scientific basis for Federal, State, and local decisionmakers, 
resource managers, the science community, the media, and the gen-
eral public. 

With  the  February  2,  2007  release  of  the  latest  report  by  the 
Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change,  there  is  even  more 
certainty  about  the  observed  warming  as  a  result  of  the  increase 
in  greenhouse  gases  for  which  humans  have  been  responsible.  Not 
only  does  the  Bush  Administration  accept  the  report,  U.S.  science 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

and government played a large role in its development. Many U.S. 
scientists were instrumental in putting this report together. 

U.S. observation networks, computer modeling labs and research 
programs  all  provided  crucial  data  and  analyses.  Without  the  ef-
forts of the United States, much of this report would not have been 
possible. 

Over  the  next  2  years,  CCSP  will  be  completing  a  series  of  21 
Synthesis  and  Assessment  Reports.  The  first  report  released  in 
May  2006,  helped  correct  errors  identified  in  satellite  data,  and 
contributed significantly to the IPCC’s findings. Soon, we will have 
a  report  on  the  North  American  carbon  cycle,  which  will  focus  on 
key  issues  for  carbon  management  and  policy.  Later  this  year,  the 
CCSP will address the sensitivity and adaptability of ecosystems to 
climate change. 

These reports are being developed with an intensive commitment 
to  scientific  peer-review,  transparency  and  public  involvement. 
CCSP  continues  to  engage  the  National  Research  Council,  to  pro-
vide  a  review  of  the  conduct  and  performance  of  the  program,  and 
their analysis is available to the public. 

I  want  to  thank  Dr.  James  Mahoney  for  all  of  his  efforts  in  cre-

ating this process, and leading the CCSP for the last 4 years. 

Regarding concerns about scientific communications, I think it is 
important to point out that to the best of my knowledge, no one has 
suggested the science or the research findings have been interfered 
with.  But  concerns  have  been  raised  about  the  intersection  of 
science  policy  and  science,  and  how  that  is  communicated  to  the 
public.  The  Bush  Administration  strongly  believes  scientific  find-
ings  should  be  communicated  clearly,  accurately  and  completely. 
The  White  House  has  asked  Departments  and  agencies  to  review 
their  respective  policies  to  ensure  scientific  openness,  and  ensure 
that employees and management understand their rights and obli-
gations under these policies. 

Some NOAA scientists have expressed concerns about their abil-
ity  to  talk  to  the  media.  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  NOAA’s  Adminis-
trator, and a scientist himself, sent communications to every NOAA 
employee, clearly stating his commitment to scientific integrity and 
open discussion of scientific results. He has conducted several town 
hall  meetings  around  the  country  with  NOAA  employees,  and  ex-
pressly stated that anyone who feels that NOAA or the Department 
of Commerce are not supporting the free flow of scientific research, 
they should contact him personally. 

The  Department  has  revised  three  outdated  and  contradictory 
communications  policies.  Under  the  new  policy,  scientists  and  re-
searchers are free to communicate their research findings, and are 
encouraged  to  work  with  the  public  affairs  office  when  it  comes  to 
communicating  the  research.  However,  this  is  not  a  requirement. 
This new policy also contains a strong appeals process to quickly 
address  any  issues  that  may  arise,  and  NOAA  scientists  and  em-
ployees provided the Department with valuable feedback, and have 
helped make this policy a much better product. 

Since 2001, the Bush Administration has been clear that climate 
change  is  a  serious  problem.  The  Earth  is  warming,  and  humans 
are the leading cause. The Administration has spent nearly $29 bil-
lion  on  climate  change,  including  $9  billion  on  climate  change 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

science,  more  than  all  other  nations  combined.  U.S.  researchers 
and funding are responsible for much of the world’s understanding 
of climate change, and the recent IPCC report would not have been 
possible without the United States. 

Regarding scientific communications and openness, the Adminis-
tration takes the concerns of its scientists very seriously, and I am 
particularly proud of the CCSP Program, which has a process that 
is  open  and  transparent,  including  public  reviews  of  its  reports, 
and independent reviews of its performance. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  allowing  me  to  testify  before  you 

today. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Brennan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  WILLIAM BRENNAN,  ACTING DIRECTOR,  U.S.  CLIMATE 
CHANGE SCIENCE PROGRAM,  DEPUTY ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR INTERNATIONAL 
AFFAIRS, NATIONAL OCEANIC AND ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION, DOC 
Chairman Inouye and Vice Chairman Stevens, I appreciate the opportunity to tes-
tify  to  you  today  about  climate  change  research  and  scientific  integrity.  My  name 
is  Bill  Brennan,  and  since  June  2006,  I  have  been  the  Acting  Director  of  the  U.S. 
Climate  Change  Science  Program,  as  well  as  the  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  for 
International Affairs with the Department of Commerce’s National Oceanic and At-
mospheric Administration (NOAA). 

I will first talk about the Climate Change Science Program and the current state 
of  climate  research  and  then  I  will  discuss  the  issue  of  scientific  communications, 
emphasizing issues at NOAA. 
What Is CCSP? 

The  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP)  was  established  by  President 
Bush  in  2002  and  integrates  Federal  research  on  global  climate  change,  as  spon-
sored  by  13  Federal  agencies. 1 CCSP  is  a  multi-agency  program  charged  with:  in-
vestigating natural and human-induced changes in the Earth’s global environmental 
system;  monitoring,  understanding,  and  predicting  global  change;  and  providing  a 
sound scientific basis for national and international decisionmaking. The CCSP com-
bines  the  near-term  focus  of  the  Administration’s  Climate  Change  Research  Initia-
tive,  initiated  in  2001—including  a  focus  on  advancing  the  understanding  of 
aerosols,  carbon  sources  and  sinks,  and  improvements  in  climate  modeling—with 
the breadth of the long-term research elements of the U.S. Global Change Research 
Program. 

Since CCSP was created in 2002, the program has successfully integrated a wide 
range  of  research,  climate  science  priorities  and  budgets  of  the  13  CCSP  agencies. 
CCSP  integrates  research  and  observational  approaches  across  disciplinary  bound-
aries and is also working to create more seamless approaches between theory, mod-
eling, observations, and applications required to address the multiple scientific chal-
lenges  posed  by  changes  in  climate.  CCSP  is  taking  on  the  most  challenging  ques-
tions  in  climate  science  and  is  developing  products  to  convey  the  most  advanced 
state  of  knowledge  to  be  used  by  Federal,  state  and  local  decisionmakers,  resource 
managers,  the  science  community,  the  media,  and  the  general  public.  Since  2002, 
the  Administration  has  spent  approximately  $9  billion  on  climate  change  science. 
Agreement on Climate Change 

In  2001,  the  President  asked  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  to  do  a  special 
report  on  the  state  of  the  science  on  climate  change.  The  report,  entitled  Climate 
Change  Science:  An  Analysis  of  Some  Key  Questions  stated:  ‘‘Greenhouse  gases  are 
accumulating in Earth’s atmosphere as a result of human activities, causing surface 
temperatures and subsurface ocean temperatures to rise. Temperatures are, in fact, 
rising.  The  changes  observed  over  the  last  several  decades  are  likely  mostly  due  to 
human activities, but we cannot rule out that some significant part of these changes 

1 The  CCSP  participating  agencies  include  the  Departments  of  Agriculture,  Commerce,  De-
fense,  Energy,  Health  and  Human  Services,  the  Interior,  State,  and  Transportation,  the  Na-
tional  Science  Foundation,  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency  (EPA),  the  National  Aero-
nautics and Space Administration (NASA), U.S. Agency for International Development, and the 
Smithsonian Institution. Additional CCSP liaisons reside in the Office of Science and Technology 
Policy,  the  Council  on  Environmental  Quality,  the  National  Economic  Council,  and  the  Office 
of Management and Budget. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

is  also  a  reflection  of  natural  variability.’’  In  reaction  to  the  report,  the  President 
created a cabinet-level committee, and in particular CCSP and the Climate Change 
Technology Program to lead the Administration’s efforts to confront this serious en-
vironmental problem. Since 2001, the Administration has devoted nearly $29 billion 
to  climate-related  science,  technology,  international  assistance,  and  incentive  pro-
grams. 

The  latest  report  by  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC),  re-
leased  on  February  2,  2007,  expressed  even  more  certainty  that  the  changes  ob-
served  over  the  last  several  decades  are  mostly  due  to  human  activities,  primarily 
through the release of greenhouse gases. 

The  Bush  Administration  accepts  the  published  report,  and  notes  that  the  U.S. 
Government  played  a  large  role  in  its  development.  Many  U.S.  scientists  were  in-
strumental  in  putting  together  this  report,  especially  Dr.  Susan  Solomon,  a  senior 
scientist  at  NOAA’s  Earth  System  Research  Laboratory  in  Boulder,  Colorado,  who 
was Co-Chair of the Working Group I (WG1). U.S. observations networks, computer 
modeling  efforts,  and  research  programs  all  provided  crucial  data  and  analysis. 
Without  the  efforts  of  the  Administration  and  the  CCSP  program,  much  of  this  re-
port would not have been possible. 

The  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  managed  the  U.S.  author  nomination 
process  for  IPCC  WG1,  including  soliciting  complete  applications,  interfacing  with 
relevant Technical Support Units and the Secretariat in Geneva, convening discipli-
nary  expert  panels,  hosting  series’  of  meetings,  and  consolidating  all  materials  of 
selected finalists. CCSP also managed the Expert and Government Reviews for WG1 
by  providing  technical  advice  and  networking  infrastructure.  CCSP  agencies  as-
sisted  with  issuing  a  public  call  for  comments,  collecting  comments,  assembling  ex-
pert  panels  to  review  inputs  for  technical  merit,  accepting/rejecting/modifying  said 
input, and preparing the final package. 

The work conducted by the Federal agencies as part of CCSP was critical to gain-
ing a greater understanding of climate change processes, including relating observa-
tions  and  models,  for  the  IPCC  report.  CCSP  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Report  1.1 
reconciled lingering and long-standing difficulties that have impeded understanding 
of  changes  in  atmospheric  temperatures  and  the  basic  causes  of  these  changes.  It 
brought  models  and  observations  more  closely  in  line,  and  provided  increased  con-
fidence in our ability to model and predict future changes. 

Over  the  next  2  years  CCSP  will  be  completing  a  series  of  21  Synthesis  and  As-
sessment  Reports,  with  the  report  on  emissions  scenarios  to  be  released  shortly. 
These reports describe the state of the science on a range of key issues, thereby pro-
viding further important contributions to the Nation’s and world’s discussion on cli-
mate change. The first report, released in May 2006, helped correct errors identified 
in  satellite  data  and  other  temperature  observations  in  the  troposphere  and  strato-
sphere, and contributed significantly to the IPCC’s increased confidence in the influ-
ence of anthropogenic greenhouse gases on temperature increase since the mid-20th 
century.  Due  out  in  the  next  couple  of  months  will  be  a  report  on  the  North  Amer-
ican  Carbon  Cycle,  which  will  focus  on  key  issues  for  carbon  management  and  pol-
icy. In addition, later this year the CCSP will release several products that address 
the sensitivity and adaptability of ecosystems to climate change. 
How Are CCSP Reports Produced? 

I  want  to  describe  the  process  by  which  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program  is 
producing  its  21  reports—which  is  with  an  intensive  commitment  to  scientific  peer 
review, transparency and public involvement. The specific details of each step of the 
process  are  available  on  the  CCSP  website  (http://www.climatescience.gov).  All  of 
the  products  are  being  drafted  by  expert  groups  in  compliance  with  the  provisions 
of  the  Federal  Advisory  Committee  Act  and  each  product  will  receive  intensive  sci-
entific  peer  review,  as  well  as  at  least  two  general  public  reviews  (one  for  the  pro-
spectus  and  one  for  the  full  report).  CCSP  has  also  engaged  the  National  Research 
Council (NRC) to provide continuing analysis and advice on the conduct of the CCSP 
program  including  the  preparation  of  the  CCSP  scientific  products.  The  NRC  advi-
sory  reports  will  all  be  public  documents,  and  will  provide  the  Congress  and  all  in-
terested  stakeholders  with  independent  reviews  of  CCSP  performance.  I  want  to 
publicly acknowledge and thank Dr. James Mahoney, who is on the panel today, for 
all  his  work  and  efforts  in  creating  this  process  and  leading  the  CCSP  program  for 
4 years. 
Administration View on Scientific Communications 

The  Bush  Administration  values  science  as  a  basis  for  effective  policy  action  in 
its service to the public, and regards the timely, complete and accurate communica-
tion of scientific information as an important part of that service. The White House, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

through  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  asked  departments  and  agen-
cies to review their respective policies to ensure scientific openness and that employ-
ees  and  management  understand  their  rights  and  obligations  under  these  policies. 
NOAA Scientific Communication 

The  media  have  covered  a  handful  of  instances  where  NOAA  scientists  have  ex-
pressed concerns about their ability to talk to the media about their research. Admi-
ral  Lautenbacher,  NOAA’s  Administrator  and  a  scientist  himself,  continues  to  take 
this  issue  very  seriously.  He  has  sent  communications  to  every  NOAA  employee 
about  the  importance  of  open  communications,  as  science  is  the  foundation  for  ev-
erything  that  NOAA  does  as  an  agency.  He  has  conducted  several  town  hall  meet-
ings  around  the  country  with  NOAA  employees  and  expressly  stated  that  anyone 
who feels that NOAA or the Department of Commerce processes are not supporting 
the  free  flow  of  scientific  research  should  contact  him  personally.  I  would  like  to 
point  out  that  NOAA  scientists  publish  between  800  and  1,000  scientific  papers  a 
year. In coordination with NOAA’s public affairs office, frequent interviews are con-
ducted  on  our  research  and  several  hundred  press  releases  are  sent  out  each  year. 
DOC Communication’s Policy 

The  issue  of  scientific  integrity  is  important  not  only  to  NOAA  but  also  the  De-
partment of Commerce, which has several bureaus, in addition to NOAA where sci-
entists  and  researchers  provide  crucial  information  to  the  media  and  the  public  on 
a regular basis. Secretary Gutierrez and Deputy Secretary Sampson have made this 
issue a top priority for the Department and have reiterated their strong support for 
open  communication  of  peer-reviewed  science.  When  the  Department  reviewed  its 
current communications policies, it found they dated back decades and are based on 
those  set  up  by  President  Jimmy  Carter.  There  are  actually  three  different  depart-
ment-wide  orders  that  at  times  are  contradictory  and  certainly  are  woefully  out-
dated.  The  Department  has  accordingly  decided  to  consolidate  and  simplify  the 
three dated policies into one policy relevant to current times. 

It is my understanding that the drafting process is almost complete and that the 
Department  is  in  the  process  of  fulfilling  its  labor  relations  obligations  regarding 
union  consultation.  In  this  drafting  process,  the  Department  sought  the  input  of 
many scientists and employees. As I understand it, this was an unprecedented proc-
ess,  involving  three  separate  rounds  of  input  and  feedback.  The  Department  has 
been  very  pleased  with  the  constructive  feedback  and  officials  feel  the  draft  policy 
has been greatly improved due to this feedback. The policy will reaffirm the Depart-
ment’s goal of fostering transparency and media and public access, including a spe-
cific statement that clarifies the independence of fundamental research communica-
tions. And, the new policy has a strong appeals process so that if someone feels ag-
grieved,  they  can  seek  a  quick  appeal.  It  has  been  and  continues  to  be  the  Sec-
retary’s  policy  and  that  of  his  leadership  team  to  encourage  and  support  open  com-
munication of scientific research and findings. 
Conclusion 

Since  2001,  the  Bush  Administration  has  spent  $29  billion  on  climate-related 
science,  technology,  international  assistance,  and  incentive  programs.  Federal  re-
searchers  and  grant  money  from  the  U.S.  Government  contribute  substantially  to 
the  world’s  understanding  of  climate  change.  The  recent  IPCC  report  would  not 
have  been  possible  without  the  United  States.  The  Administration  has  been  clear 
that  climate  change  is  a  serious  problem,  the  Earth  is  warming  and  humans  are 
the leading cause. 

these important issues. 

The  report  of  Working  Group  I  of  the  IPCC  demonstrates  that  the  level  of  sci-
entific certainty has increased regarding the human impact on climate change. How-
ever,  more  research  must  be  done  to  answer  the  many  questions  and  uncertainties 
that  remain  in  this  field,  such  as  the  role  aerosols  and  deep  ocean  currents  play  in 
regulating the climate, as well as further work on the relationship between climate 
frequency, distribution, and severity of extreme weather events, such as tropical cy-
clones and drought. 

Regarding  scientific  communications  and  openness,  the  Administration  takes  the 
concerns of its scientists very seriously, and each Department and Agency is review-
ing  (and  modifying  if  necessary)  its  policies  to  ensure  government  scientists  do  not 
face censorship on any scientific matter, including climate change issues. The CCSP 
program has an open and transparent process, which includes several public reviews 
before  any  reports  are  finalized.  The  Department  of  Commerce  is  also  in  the  final 
stages  of  revising  and  updating  its  policies  to  ensure  open  communication  of  sci-
entific research and findings. 

Thank  you  again,  Mr.  Chairman  for  allowing  me  the  opportunity  to  testify  on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Dr.  Brennan.  And  now, 
may  I  call  on  Dr.  Richard  A.  Anthes,  President  of  the  University 
Corporation for Atmospheric Research. 

Dr. Anthes? 

STATEMENT  OF  RICHARD  A.  ANTHES,  PH.D.,  PRESIDENT, 
UNIVERSITY  CORPORATION  FOR  ATMOSPHERIC  RESEARCH 
(UCAR);  CO-CHAIR,  COMMITTEE  ON  EARTH  SCIENCE  AND 
APPLICATIONS  FROM  SPACE,  NATIONAL  RESEARCH 
COUNCIL, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Dr. ANTHES. Is that OK? 
Mr.  Chairman,  Vice  Chairman,  and  members  of  the  Committee, 

thank you for inviting me to testify here today. 

My  name  is  Richard  Anthes,  and  I  am  President  of  UCAR,  the 
University  Corporation  for  Atmospheric  Research.  We  manage  the 
National  Center  for  Atmospheric  Research,  or  NCAR,  under  spon-
sorship of the National Science Foundation. I’m also current Presi-
dent of the American Meteorological Society. 

But,  I  am  here  today  largely  in  my  capacity  as  Co-Chair  of  the 
National  Research  Council’s  Committee  on  Earth  Science,  and  Ap-
plications  from  Space.  I’ve  been  asked  to  discuss  some  of  the  rec-
ommendations  from  the  recently  completed  report:  Earth  Science 
and  Applications  from  Space:  National  Imperatives  for  the  Next 
Decade  and  Beyond.  This  report,  which  was  requested  by  NASA, 
NOAA,  and  the  USGS  was  a  result  of  more  than  2  years  of  work 
by over 100 leaders in the broad Earth science community. 

As  explained  in  more  detail  in  my  written  testimony,  the  Com-
mittee’s recently completed report provides a prioritized roadmap of 
Earth observations to advance Earth science and applications from 
space, from short-term needs for information, such as weather fore-
casts  and  warnings  and  protection  of  life  and  property,  to  longer- 
term  scientific  understanding  that  is  essential  for  understanding 
our planet, and how our planet supports and sustains life. 

The  Committee’s  vision  is  encapsulated  in  the  following  declara-
tion,  first  stated  in  our  Committee’s  interim  report,  published  in 
2005.  ‘‘Understanding  the  complex  changing  planet  on  which  we 
live, how it supports life, and how human activities affect its ability 
to do so in the future, is one of the greatest intellectual challenges 
facing humanity. It is also one of the most important challenges for 
society,  as  it  seeks  to  achieve  prosperity,  health  and  sustain-
ability.’’ 

As detailed in our final report, and as we were reminded by read-
ing  the  front  page  of  nearly  every  newspaper  this  past  week,  de-
scribing  the  powerful  findings  of  the  latest  Report  from  the  IPCC, 
our  society  is  faced  with  a  number  of  profound  scientific  and  soci-
etal challenges, including climate change, and their impacts on our 
key  parts  of  our  economy,  human  health,  sea  level,  eco-systems, 
patterns of precipitation, and water availability. 

In  addition  to  the  ever-increasing  need  for  better  weather  fore-
casts  and  warnings,  we  also  need  to  know  more  about  air  quality 
and  extreme  natural  events,  including  severe  storms,  heat  waves, 
Earthquakes and volcanic eruptions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

Yet,  at  a  time  when  the  need  has  never  been  greater,  we  are 
faced with an Earth observation program that will dramatically di-
minish in capability over the next 10 to 15 years. 

The 2005 interim report warned of a national system of environ-
mental  satellites  that  was  ‘‘at  risk  of  collapse.’’  That  judgment, 
which may have seemed somewhat extreme at the time, was based 
on  the  observed,  precipitous  decline  in  funding  for  Earth-observa-
tion  missions  and  the  consequent  cancellation,  de-scoping  and 
delay  of  a  number  of  critical  missions  and  instruments,  which  you 
see here, illustrated in this first slide. 

This slide shows the decrease in the number of missions and the 
number  of  instruments  of  U.S.  Earth  observations  from  space.  We 
have  reached  the  golden  age  of  Earth  observations  from  space,  if 
this trend is not reversed, with a maximum of instruments and ob-
servations  in  space  in  2006.  You  see  a  decrease,  by  2010  of  some-
thing like 35 percent, in the number of instruments in space. 

Since the publication of our interim report, NASA has delayed or 
canceled  several  missions,  significant  cuts  have  been  made  to 
NASA’s  research  and  analysis  accounts,  NOAA’s  NPOESS  pre-
paratory project mission was delayed for a year and a half, the key 
sensor  plan  for  the  next  generation  of  NOAA  geo-stationary  sat-
ellites  was  canceled,  and  the  NPOESS  program  breached  the 
Nunn-McCurdy  budget  cap,  with  the  latter  having  particular  con-
sequences  for  the  measurement  of  forcing  and  feedbacks  needed  to 
observe  and  understand  global  and  regional  climate  change.  It  is 
against this backdrop that I discuss the present report. 

Mr.  Chairman,  it  is  often  said  that  when  you’re  in  a  hole,  you 
should  stop  digging.  Our  report  recommends  a  path  forward,  that 
restores  U.S.  leadership  in  Earth  science  and  applications  and 
averts  the  potential  collapse  of  our  system  of  environmental  sat-
ellites.  As  documented  in  our  report,  this  can  be  done  in  a  fiscally 
responsible manner. 

As  you  will  observe  in  slide  two,  you  will  see  that  our  rec-
ommendation  can  be  implemented  in  a  cost-effective  manner  by 
simply restoring NASA’s Earth science budget to 2002 levels. These 
numbers are in constant Fiscal Year 2006 dollars. 

We  make  a  number  of  specific  recommendations  which  I  will 
summarize  briefly  here.  Even  in  a  constrained  fiscal  environment, 
we believe it’s imperative that NOAA restore key climate, environ-
mental and weather capabilities to the NPOESS mission. These in-
clude  restoring  capabilities  to  measure  total  solar  radiation,  and 
Earth  radiation,  ocean  surface  vector  winds,  and  sea  surface  tem-
perature and ozone profiles. 

We  also  recommend  that  NASA  undertake  15  new  missions  in 
the period 2008 to 2020. In addition to restoring some of the capa-
bilities lost on NPOESS, these missions will provide an integrated, 
robust  program  to  advance  Earth  system  science,  and  derive  nu-
merous  benefits  of  critical  importance  to  society,  including  of  par-
ticular  relevance  to  this  hearing,  improved  weather  and  climate 
prediction. 

Implementing  these  missions  will  not  only  greatly  reduce  the 
risk to the people of our country, and the world, of natural hazards 
of  all  kinds,  it  will  support  more  efficient  management  of  natural 
resources, including water, energy, fisheries, eco-systems, and sup-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

port  the  economy  and  industries,  so  that  the  cost  of  this  program 
is repaid many times over. 

Our report also discusses the need for improved coordination be-
in  making  these  measurements. 
tween  NASA  and  NOAA 
Mismatches in the missions between NOAA and NASA can lead to 
difficulty  in  transitioning  NASA  research  measurements  into 
NOAA  operational  measurements,  therefore  our  committee  rec-
ommends  that  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  develop 
and  implement  a  comprehensive  plan  for  achieving  and  sustaining 
global Earth observations. 

Mr. Chairman, the observing system we envision will help estab-
lish a firm and sustainable foundation for Earth science, and asso-
ciated  societal  benefits  through  the  year  2020  and  beyond,  will  be 
achieved through effective management of technology advances and 
international  partnerships,  and  broad  use  of  satellite  science  data 
by the research and decisionmaking community. 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today. I’d be 

happy to answer any questions you have. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Anthes follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD A.  ANTHES,  PH.D.,  PRESIDENT,  UNIVERSITY 
CORPORATION FOR ATMOSPHERIC RESEARCH (UCAR);  CO-CHAIR,  COMMITTEE ON 
EARTH SCIENCE AND APPLICATIONS FROM SPACE,  NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL, 
THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES 
Mr. Chairman, Vice Chairman, and Members of the Committee: thank you for in-
viting me here to testify today. My name is Richard Anthes, and I am the President 
of the University Corporation for Atmospheric Research, a consortium of 70 research 
universities that manages the National Center for Atmospheric Research, on behalf 
of the National Science Foundation, and additional scientific education, training and 
support  programs.  I  am  also  the  current  President  of  the  American  Meteorological 
Society. I appear today in my capacity as Co-Chair of the National Research Council 
(NRC)’s  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  A  Community 
Assessment and Strategy for the Future. 

The  National  Research  Council  is  the  unit  of  the  National  Academies  that  is  re-
sponsible  for  organizing  independent  advisory  studies  for  the  Federal  Government 
on  science  and  technology.  In  response  to  requests  from  NASA,  NOAA,  and  the 
USGS, the NRC has recently completed a ‘‘decadal survey’’ of Earth science and ap-
plications  from  space.  (‘‘Decadal  surveys’’  are  the  10-year  prioritized  roadmaps  that 
the NRC has done for 40 years for the astronomers; this is the first time it is being 
done  for  Earth  science  and  applications  from  space.)  Among  the  key  tasks  in  the 
charge to the decadal survey committee were to: 

• Develop a consensus of the top-level scientific questions that should provide the 
focus  for  Earth  and  environmental  observations  in  the  period  2005–2020;  and 
• Develop  a  prioritized  list  of  recommended  space  programs,  missions,  and  sup-

porting activities to address these questions. 

The  NRC  survey  committee  has  prepared  an  extensive  report  in  response  to  this 
charge,  which  I  am  pleased  to  be  able  to  summarize  here  today.  Over  100  leaders 
in  the  Earth  science  community  participated  on  the  survey  steering  committee  or 
its seven study panels. It is noteworthy that this was the first Earth science decadal 
survey, and the Committee and panel members did an excellent job in fulfilling the 
charge and establishing a consensus—a task many previously considered impossible. 
A copy of the full report has also been provided for your use.* 

The  Committee’s  vision  is  encapsulated  in  the  following  declaration,  first  stated 

in the Committee’s interim report, published in 2005: 

‘‘Understanding the complex, changing planet on which we live, how it supports 
life,  and  how  human  activities  affect  its  ability  to  do  so  in  the  future  is  one  of 
the  greatest  intellectual  challenges  facing  humanity.  It  is  also  one  of  the  most 

* A copy of this report is maintained in the Committee’s files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

important  challenges  for  society  as  it  seeks  to  achieve  prosperity,  health,  and 
sustainability.’’ 

As detailed in the Committee’s final report, and as we were profoundly reminded 
by  reading  the  front  page  of  nearly  every  newspaper  this  past  week  describing  the 
powerful  findings  of  the  latest  report  from  the  International  Panel  on  Climate 
Change  (IPCC),  the  world  faces  significant  and  profound  environmental  challenges: 
shortages  of  clean  and  accessible  freshwater,  degradation  of  terrestrial  and  aquatic 
ecosystems,  increases  in  soil  erosion,  changes  in  the  chemistry  of  the  atmosphere, 
declines in fisheries, and above all the rapid pace of substantial changes in climate. 
These changes are not isolated; they interact with each other and with natural vari-
ability in complex ways that cascade through the environment across local, regional, 
and global scales. Addressing these societal challenges requires that we confront key 
scientific  questions  related  to  ice  sheets  and  sea  level  change,  large-scale  and  per-
sistent  shifts  in  precipitation  and  water  availability,  transcontinental  air  pollution, 
shifts  in  ecosystem  structure  and  function  in  response  to  climate  change,  impacts 
of climate change on human health, and occurrence of extreme events, such as hur-
ricanes, floods and droughts, heat waves, Earthquakes, and volcanic eruptions. 

Yet at a time when the need has never been greater, we are faced with an Earth 
observation program that will dramatically diminish in capability over the next 10– 
15 years. 

Last  April,  my  Co-Chair,  Dr.  Berrien  Moore,  came  before  Congress  to  testify  in 
response  to  release  of  the  Committee’s  2005  interim  report.  His  testimony  high-
lighted the key roles played by NASA and NOAA over the past 30 years in advanc-
ing  our  understanding  of  the  Earth  system  and  in  providing  a  variety  of  societal 
benefits  through  their  international  leadership  in  Earth  observing  systems  from 
space.  He  noted  that  while  NOAA  had  plans  to  modernize  and  refresh  its  weather 
satellites, NASA had no plans to replace its Earth Observing System platforms after 
their  nominal  6  year  lifetimes  end.  He  also  noted  that  NASA  had  canceled,  scaled 
back,  or  delayed  at  least  six  planned  missions,  including  a  Landsat  continuity  mis-
sion.  This  led  to  the  main  finding  in  the  interim  report,  which  stated  ‘‘this  system 
of environmental satellites is at risk of collapse.’’ 

Since  the  publication  of  the  interim  report,  the  Hydros  and  Deep  Space  Climate 
Observatory  missions  were  canceled;  the  flagship  Global  Precipitation  Mission  was 
delayed for another two and a half years; significant cuts were made to NASA’s Re-
search  and  Analysis  program:  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  mission  was  de-
layed for a year and a half; a key atmospheric profiling sensor planned for the next 
generation  of  NOAA  geostationary  satellites  was  canceled;  and  the  NPOESS  pro-
gram  breached  the  Nunn-McCurdy  budget  cap.  As  you  have  all  heard,  the  certified 
NPOESS  program  delays  the  first  launch  by  3  years,  eliminates  2  of  the  planned 
6  spacecraft,  and  de-manifests  or  de-scopes  a  number  of  instruments,  with  par-
ticular  consequences  for  measurement  of  the  forcing  and  feedbacks  that  need  to  be 
measured  to  understand  the  magnitude,  pace,  and  consequences  of  global  and  re-
gional climate change. It is against this backdrop that I discuss the present report. 
As you will see in the report, between 2006 and the end of the decade, the number 
of  operating  missions  will  decrease  dramatically  and  the  number  of  operating  sen-
sors  and  instruments  on  NASA  spacecraft,  most  of  which  are  well  past  their  nomi-
nal lifetimes, will decrease by some 35 percent, with a 50 percent reduction by 2015 
(see  Figure  1  below).  Substantial  loss  of  capability  is  likely  over  the  next  several 
years  due  to  a  combination  of  decreased  budgets  and  aging  satellites  already  well 
past their design lifetimes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

In its report, the Committee sets forth a series of near-term and longer-term rec-
ommendations  in  order  to  address  these  troubling  trends.  It  is  important  to  note 
that this report does not ‘‘shoot for the moon,’’ and indeed the Committee exercised 
considerable  constraint  in  its  recommendations,  which  were  carefully  considered 
within  the  context  of  challenging  budget  situations.  Yet,  while  societal  applications 
have  grown  ever-more  dependent  upon  our  Earth  observing  fleet,  the  NASA  Earth 
science budget has declined some 30 percent in constant-year dollars since 2000 (see 
Figure  2  below).  This  disparity  between  growing  societal  needs  and  diminished  re-
sources  must  be  corrected.  This  leads  to  the  report’s  overarching  recommendation: 

‘‘The U.S. Government, working in concert with the private sector, academe, the 
public, and its international partners, should renew its investment in Earth ob-
serving  systems  and  restore  its  leadership  in  Earth  science  and  applications.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
t

n
a

s
p
e
.
1
t
n
a

19 

The report outlines near-term actions meant to stem the tide of capability deterio-
ration  and  continue  critical  data  records,  as  well  as  forward-looking  recommenda-
tions to establish a balanced Earth observation program designed to directly address 
the  most  urgent  societal  challenges  facing  our  Nation  and  the  world  (see  Figure  3 
below for an example of how nine of our recommended missions support in a syner-
gistic  way  one  of  the  societal  benefit  areas—extreme  event  warnings).  It  is  impor-
tant  to  recognize  that  these  two  sets  of  recommendations  are  not  an  ‘‘either/or’’  set 
of  priorities.  Both  near-term  actions  and  longer-term  commitments  are  required  to 
stem  the  tide  of  capability  deterioration,  continue  critical  climate  data  records,  and 
establish  a  balanced  Earth  observation  program  designed  to  directly  address  the 
most  urgent  societal  challenges  facing  our  Nation  and  the  world.  It  is  important  to 
‘‘right  the  ship’’  for  Earth  science,  and  we  simply  cannot  let  the  current  challenges 
we  face  with  NPOESS  and  other  troubled  programs  stop  progress  on  all  other 
fronts.  Implementation  of  the  ‘‘stop-gap’’  recommendations  concerning  NPOESS, 
NPP,  and  GOES–R  are  important—and  the  recommendations  for  establishing  a 
healthy  program  going  forward  are  equally  as  important.  Satisfying  near-term  rec-
ommendations  without  placing  due  emphasis  on  the  forward-looking  program  is  to 
ignore  the  largest  fraction  of  work  that  has  gone  into  this  report.  Moreover,  such 
a  strategy  would  result  in  a  further  loss  of  U.S.  scientific  and  technical  capacity, 
which  could  decrease  the  competitiveness  of  the  United  States  internationally  for 
years to come. 

Key elements of the recommended program include: 

1.  Restoration  of  certain  measurement  capabilities  to  the  NPP,  NPOESS,  and 
GOES–R spacecraft in order to ensure continuity of critical data sets. 
2.  Completion  of  the  existing  planned  program  that  was  used  as  a  baseline  as-
sumption  for  this  survey.  This  includes  (but  is  not  limited  to)  launch  of  GPM 
in or before 2012, securing a replacement to Landsat 7 data before 2012. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
t
n
a

20 

3.  A  prioritized  set  of  17  missions  to  be  carried  out  by  NOAA  and  NASA  over 
the  next  decade  (see  Tables  1  and  2  below).  This  set  of  missions  provides  a 
sound  foundation  for  Earth  science  and  its  associated  societal  benefits  well  be-
yond 2020. The committee believes strongly that these missions form a minimal, 
yet robust, observational component of an Earth information system that is capa-
ble of addressing a broad range of societal needs. 
4. A technology development program at NASA with funding comparable to and 
in  addition  to  its  basic  technology  program  to  make  sure  the  necessary  tech-
nologies  are  ready  when  needed  to  support  mission  starts  over  the  coming  dec-
ade. 
5. A new ‘‘Venture’’ class of low-cost research and application missions that can 
establish entirely new research avenues or demonstrate key application-oriented 
measurements,  helping  with  the  development  of  innovative  ideas  and  tech-
nologies.  Priority  would  be  given  to  cost-effective,  innovative  missions  rather 
than ones with excessive scientific and technological requirements. 
6. A robust NASA Research and Analysis program, which is necessary to maxi-
mize scientific return on NASA investments in Earth science. Because the R&A 
programs  are  carried  out  largely  through  the  Nation’s  research  universities, 
such  programs  are  also  of  great  importance  in  supporting  and  training  next- 
generation Earth science researchers. 
7.  Suborbital  and  land-based  measurements  and  socio-demographic  studies  in 
order to supplement and complement satellite data. 
8. A comprehensive information system to meet the challenge of production, dis-
tribution, and stewardship of observational data and climate records. To ensure 
the  recommended  observations  will  benefit  society,  the  mission  program  must 
be accompanied by efforts to translate raw observational data into useful infor-
mation through modeling, data assimilation, and research and analysis. 

Table 1. Launch, orbit, and instrument specifications for the recommended NOAA mis-
sions.  Detailed  descriptions  of  the  missions  are  given  in  Part  II  of  the  final  report, 
and Part III provides the foundation for selection. 

Decadal Survey 

Mission 

Mission Description 

Orbit 

Instruments 

Rough 
Cost 

Estimate 

(in 

millions) 

CLARREO (In-
strument Re- 
flight Compo-
nents) 

GPSRO 

Timeframe: 2010–2013—Missions listed by cost 

Small Missions (<$300 million) 

Solar  and  Earth  radiation 
for  under-

characteristics 
standing climate forcing 

LEO, SSO  Broadband 

radiometers 

65 

High  accuracy,  all-weather 
temperature,  water  vapor, 
and  electron  density  profiles 
for  weather,  climate  and 
space weather 

LEO 

GPS receiver 

150 

Timeframe: 2013–2016—Missions listed by cost 

Medium Missions ($300–$600 million) 

XOVWM 

Sea  surface  wind  vectors  for 
weather  and  ocean  eco-
systems 

LEO, SSO  Backscatter radar 

350 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Table 2. Launch, orbit, and instrument specifications for the recommended NASA mis-
sions.  Detailed  descriptions  of  the  missions  are  given  in  Part  II  of  the  final  report, 
and Part III provides the foundation for selection. 

Decadal Survey 

Mission 

Mission Description 

Orbit 

Instruments 

Rough 
Cost 

Estimate 

(in 

millions) 

Timeframe: 2010–2013—Missions listed by cost 

Small Missions (<$300 million) 

CLARREO 

(NASA por-
tion) 

Solar  and  Earth  radiation, 
spectrally  resolved 
forcing 
and  response  of  the  climate 
system 

LEO, 

Precessi-
ng 

Absolute, spec-

trally-resolved 
interferometer 

200 

Medium Missions ($300–$600 million) 

SMAP 

Soil  moisture  and  freeze/thaw 
for  weather  and  water  cycle 
processes 

LEO, SSO  L-band radar, L- 

band radiometer 

300 

ICESat-II 

Ice  sheet  height  changes  for 

climate change diagnosis 

LEO, Non- 

SSO 

Laser altimeter 

300 

Large Missions ($300–$900 million) 

DESDynI 

Surface and ice sheet deforma-
tion  for  understanding  nat-
ural  hazards  and  climate; 
vegetation  structure  for  eco-
system health 

LEO, SSO  L-band InSAR, 

Laser altimeter 

700 

HyspIRI 

ASCENDS 

SWOT 

GEO–CAPE 

1Timeframe: 2013–2016—Missions listed by cost 

Medium Missions ($300–$600 million) 

Land  surface  composition  for 
agriculture 
and  mineral 
characterization;  vegetation 
types for ecosystem health 

Day/night,  all-latitude,  all-sea-
son  CO2 column  integrals 
for climate emissions 

Ocean,  lake,  and  river  water 
levels  for  ocean  and  inland 
water dynamics 

LEO, SSO  Hyperspectral spec-

trometer 

LEO, SSO  Multifrequency 

laser 

LEO, SSO  Ka-band wide 

swath radar, C- 
band radar 

Atmospheric  gas  columns  for 
air  quality  forecasts;  ocean 
color  for  coastal  ecosystem 
health  and  climate  emis-
sions 

GEO 

High and low spa-

tial resolution 
hyperspectral 
imagers 

Large Missions ($600–$900 million) 

ACE 

Aerosol  and  cloud  profiles  for 
climate  and  water  cycle; 
ocean  color  for  open  ocean 
biogeochemistry 

LEO, SSO  Backscatter lidar, 
Multiangle polar-
imeter, Doppler 
radar 

300 

400 

450 

550 

800 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Table 2. Launch, orbit, and instrument specifications for the recommended NASA mis-
sions.  Detailed  descriptions  of  the  missions  are  given  in  Part  II  of  the  final  report, 
and Part III provides the foundation for selection.—Continued 

Decadal Survey 

Mission 

Mission Description 

Orbit 

Instruments 

Timeframe: 2016–2020—Missions listed by cost 

Medium Missions ($300–$600 million) 

Rough 
Cost 

Estimate 

(in 

millions) 

LEO, SSO  Laser altimeter 

300 

LIST 

PATH 

GRACE–II 

SCLP 

GACM 

Land  surface  topography  for 
landslide  hazards  and  water 
runoff 

High 

frequency,  all-weather 
temperature  and  humidity 
soundings  for  weather  fore-
casting and SST * 

High temporal resolution grav-
ity  fields  for  tracking  large- 
scale water movement 

Snow  accumulation  for  fresh 

water availability 

GEO 

MW array spec-

trometer 

LEO, SSO  Microwave or laser 

ranging system 

LEO, SSO  Ku and X-band ra-
dars, K and Ka- 
band radiometers 

Large Missions ($300–$900 million) 

Ozone  and  related  gases  for 
intercontinental  air  quality 
and 
ozone 
layer prediction 

stratospheric 

LEO, SSO  UV spectrometer, 
IR spectrometer, 
Microwave limb 
sounder 

450 

450 

500 

600 

3D-Winds 
(Demo) 

Tropospheric  winds  for  weath-
er  forecasting  and  pollution 
transport 

LEO, SSO  Doppler lidar 

650 

* Cloud-independent,  high  temporal  resolution,  lower  accuracy  SST  to  complement,  not  replace,  global  oper-

ational high accuracy SST measurement. 

Further, the Committee is particularly concerned with the lack of clear agency re-
sponsibility  for  sustained  research  programs  and  the  transitioning  of  proof-of-con-
cept  measurements  into  sustained  measurement  systems.  To  address  societal  and 
research needs, both the quality and the continuity of the measurement record must 
be  assured  through  the  transition  of  short-term,  exploratory  capabilities,  into  sus-
tained observing systems. The elimination of the requirements for climate research- 
related  measurements  on  NPOESS  is  only  the  most  recent  example  of  the  Nation’s 
failure to sustain critical measurements. Therefore, our committee recommends that 
the Office of Science and Technology Policy, in collaboration with the relevant agen-
cies,  and  in  consultation  with  the  scientific  community,  should  develop  and  imple-
ment  a  plan  for  achieving  and  sustaining  global  Earth  observations.  This  plan 
should recognize the complexity of differing agency roles, responsibilities, and capa-
bilities  as  well  as  the  lessons  from  implementation  of  the  Landsat,  EOS,  and 
NPOESS programs. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  observing  system  we  envision  will  help  establish  a  firm  and 
sustainable  foundation  for  Earth  science  and  associated  societal  benefits  through 
the year 2020 and beyond. It can be achieved through effective management of tech-
nology  advances  and  international  partnerships,  and  broad  use  of  satellite  science 
data  by  the  research  and  decisionmaking  communities.  Our  report  recommends  a 
path  forward  that  restores  U.S.  leadership  in  Earth  science  and  applications  and 
averts  the  potential  collapse  of  the  system  of  environmental  satellites.  As  docu-
mented in our report, this can be accomplished in a fiscally responsible manner, and 
I urge the Committee to see that it is accomplished. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  am  prepared  to  an-

swer any questions that you may have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Without  objection,  the  report  that  you’ve  men-
tioned  will  be  made  part  of  the  record,  do  you  have  any  objections 
to that? 

Dr. ANTHES. No, I have no objections. * 
The CHAIRMAN. Then I thank you very much. 
May  I  now  call  on  the  research  meteorologist,  Mr.  Thomas 

Knutson. 

STATEMENT OF THOMAS R. KNUTSON, 

RESEARCH METEOROLOGIST, GEOPHYSICAL FLUID 
DYNAMICS LABORATORY, NATIONAL OCEANIC AND 

ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION, DOC 

Mr. KNUTSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
My  name  is  Tom  Knutson,  I’m  a  climate  scientist  at  NOAA’s 
Geophysical  Fluid  Dynamics  Laboratory  in  Princeton,  New  Jersey, 
one of the world’s leading climate modeling centers. 

I thank the Committee for inviting me to testify today about my 
experiences  as  a  government  scientist,  and  communicating  science 
to the media. Any opinions I express here are my own, and do not 
necessarily reflect those of NOAA, or the Department of Commerce. 
I  have  published  several  papers  in  leading  climate  journals  on 
the  question  of  global  warming,  and  hurricanes.  I’m  a  member  of 
a World Meteorologic Organization Committee on Tropical Cyclones 
and  Climate  Change.  We  and  our  colleagues  released  a  recent  as-
sessment  statement  on  this  topic,  this  past  December.  I  am  cur-
rently  on  the  author  team  for  the  CCSP  assessment  report  on 
Weather and Climate Extremes in a Changing Climate, where I and 
several others are focusing on hurricane aspects. 

During  my  career,  at  no  time  have  I  perceived  any  interference 
from NOAA management with my research efforts or scientific pub-
lications, such as the Journal of Climate. 

Concerning  my  interactions  with  the  media,  and  with  NOAA 
public  affairs  in  Washington,  I  will  say  at  the  outset  that  I  have 
had  many  opportunities  to  communicate  my  science  to  the  media 
over the years. However, among these, I have had just a few oppor-
tunities—just a few opportunities—to address a national television 
audience. There have been some instances where my ability to com-
municate with the national media has been hindered, or interfered 
with. I will briefly describe some of these experiences. 

NOAA’s  media  policy,  issued  in  June  2004,  and  its  implementa-
tion, has led to a number of missed opportunities for interviews at 
GFDL. In some cases, this was due to the hurdle of needing to ob-
tain  prior  approval  of  public  affairs  people  in  Washington.  I,  and 
several of my colleagues at GFDL have been frustrated by this bur-
den. Some of us believe it has caused reporters to steer away from 
GFDL scientists for interviews, because of the various hurdles and 
time constraints. 

Several  of  us  at  GFDL  have  had  public  affairs  officers  monitor 
some interviews, typically through phone conferencing. In one case, 
a  public  affairs  officer  traveled  from  Washington  to  New  Jersey  to 
be  in  the  room  with  me  for  a  television  interview.  The  impression 
I had—along with others at GFDL—is that at times, NOAA public 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

affairs  was  becoming  more  of  an  obstruction,  than  a  promoter  of 
interaction between GFDL scientists and the media. 

Examples  of  such  interference  that  either  others,  or  I,  experi-
enced  included:  canceled  press  releases,  requests  for  interviews 
that  were  never  responded  to,  i.e.,  pocket  vetoes,  and  being  given 
guidelines  for  steering  certain  interview  questions  in  directions 
that were not based on science considerations. 

Here are two other specific examples. In October 2005, I received 
a  request  to  appear  on  the  CNBC  program,  On  the  Money,  where 
I had appeared several weeks earlier. I contacted NOAA Public Af-
fairs for approval. A few minutes later, I was called by a public af-
fairs  person,  and  was  quizzed  for  several  minutes  on  what  I 
planned  to  say  on  the  program.  I  received  a  voice-mail  a  few  min-
utes later, informing me that the interview had been turned down. 
Internal  NOAA  e-mails  on  this  incident,  obtained  later  through 
a  FOIA  request,  are  available  for  review  on  Congressman  Wax-
man’s website. 

On  another  occasion,  in  Summer  of  2005,  NOAA  Public  Affairs 
had inquired whether I was interested in appearing on a television 
talk  show  to  discuss  global  warming  and  hurricanes.  I  later  re-
ceived  a  voice-mail  from  them,  stating,  the  White  House  said  no. 
In  response  to  questions,  I  detailed  these  turn-down  incidents  to 
a  Wall  Street  Journal  reporter  in  February  2006.  From  the  time 
that  Jim  Hanson,  and  later,  other  scientists  and  I,  went  public,  I 
have  experienced  no  further  interference  that  I  am  aware  of,  in 
communicating with the media. 

GFDL’s  unofficial  operational  practice  from  shortly  thereafter, 
has been to keep NOAA Public Affairs in Washington informed, but 
generally, to notify them after the fact, after media contacts. A new 
draft  media  policy  is  being  developed  at  the  Department  of  Com-
merce,  which  includes  NOAA.  I,  and  others,  at  GFDL  will  be  anx-
ious  to  see  how  NOAA  will  interpret  and  implement  this  new  pol-
icy. 

I  think  it  is  important  that  improved  policies  be  in  place  to  en-
sure  that  communication  between  government  climate  scientists 
and the media remain open and free of obstruction. 

I  appreciate  being  given  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  Thank 

you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Knutson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THOMAS R.  KNUTSON,  RESEARCH METEOROLOGIST, 
LABORATORY,  NATIONAL OCEANIC AND 

FLUID DYNAMICS

GEOPHYSICAL
ATMOSPHERIC ADMINISTRATION, DOC 

Introduction 

My  name  is  Tom  Knutson.  I  am  a  climate  scientist  at  NOAA’s  Geophysical  Fluid 
Dynamics  Laboratory  in  Princeton,  New  Jersey.  I  would  like  to  thank  the  Com-
mittee  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today  about  my  experiences  as  a  government  sci-
entist in communicating science-related topics to the media. Any opinions I express 
here  are  my  own,  and  do  not  necessarily  reflect  those  of  NOAA  or  the  Department 
of Commerce. 
Science Background 

I  have  authored  several  publications  in  leading  climate  science  journals  on  the 
question  of  global  warming  and  hurricanes.  Most  of  my  career  I  have  worked  at 
GFDL—one  of  the  world’s  leading  climate  modeling  centers.  I  am  a  member  of  a 
WMO (World Meteorological Organization) committee on Tropical Cyclones and Cli-
mate  Change.  We  developed,  in  collaboration  with  a  cross-section  of  the  inter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

national  tropical  cyclone  research  community,  an  assessment  statement  on  this 
topic,  which  was  released  this  past  December.  I  am  currently  on  the  author  team 
for the U.S. CCSP (Climate Change Science Program) assessment report on ‘‘Weath-
er  and  Climate  Extremes  in  a  Changing  Climate,’’  where  I  and  several  others  are 
focusing on hurricane aspects. 
My Experiences With the Media and NOAA Public Affairs 

During my career, at no time have I perceived any interference from NOAA man-
agement  with  my  research  efforts  or  scientific  publications  in  journals  such  as  the 
Journal  of  Climate.  Concerning  my  interactions  with  the  media  and  with  NOAA 
Public Affairs in Washington, I will say at the outset that I have had many opportu-
nities  to  communicate  my  science  to  the  media  over  the  years.  However,  among 
these I have had just a few opportunities to address a national television audience. 
There  have  been  instances  where  my  ability  to  communicate  with  the  national 
media has been hindered or interfered with. I will briefly describe some of these ex-
periences. 
A New NOAA Media Policy—2004 

NOAA’s media policy, issued in June 2004, requires prior notification of Public Af-
fairs  before  media  interviews  involving  policy  relevant  research  such  as  mine.  This 
led  to  a  number  of  missed  opportunities  for  interviews,  at  times  simply  due  to  the 
additional hurdle and complexity of getting in touch or coordinating with Public Af-
fairs  people  in  Washington  (for  example  evenings  and  weekends).  I  and  several  of 
my  colleagues  at  GFDL  have  been  frustrated  by  this  burden.  Some  of  us  believe  it 
has  caused  some  reporters  to  steer  away  from  GFDL  scientists  for  interviews  be-
cause of the various hurdles and time constraints. Reporters are busy and often op-
erate under tight deadlines. 

Several  of  us  at  GFDL  have  had  Public  Affairs  officers  monitor  some  interviews, 
typically  through  phone  conferencing.  In  one  case  a  public  affairs  officer  traveled 
from  Washington  to  New  Jersey  to  be  in  the  room  with  me  for  a  television  inter-
view. He did not interfere with the interview. 

The impression I had (along with others at GFDL) is that at times NOAA Public 
Affairs was becoming more of an obstruction than a promoter of interaction between 
GFDL scientists and the media. Examples of such interference that either others or 
I  experienced  included:  canceled  press  releases,  requests  for  interviews  that  were 
never responded to (‘‘i.e., pocket vetoes’’), and being given guidelines for steering cer-
tain interview questions in directions that were not based on science considerations. 
Press Release Example 

In  August  2004,  I  was  asked  by  NOAA  Public  Affairs  to  send  them  copy  of  an 
upcoming paper in the Journal of Climate so that a press release could be prepared. 
I  never  heard  back  from  them  and  apparently  no  press  release  was  issued.  Despite 
this,  the  New  York  Times  learned  about  the  upcoming  paper  and  ran  a  story  on  it 
that generated considerable media interest and more interviews. 
On the Term ‘‘Global Warming’’ 

In Summer 2005, I was invited by the American Meteorological Society (or AMS) 
to give a talk here on Capitol Hill on my research. I followed NOAA procedures for 
this  type  of  appearance,  sending  my  PowerPoint  presentation  to  Legislative  Affairs 
for  review  several  days  prior  to  my  talk.  I  received  e-mail  expressing  some  concern 
with my use of the term ‘‘Global Warming’’ in the title. I did not make any changes, 
and a few days later received e-mails indicating that the term would be OK for my 
particular talk. (By that time seminar announcements advertising a talk on ‘‘hurri-
canes in a warming world’’ had already been released on the Internet by the AMS.) 
Two  ‘‘Turned  Down’’  National  TV  Appearances  on  ‘‘Global  Warming  and 

Hurricanes’’ 

Later  that  summer,  returning  from  vacation,  I  listened  over  the  weekend  to  a 
voice-mail from NOAA Public Affairs inquiring about whether I would be interested 
in  appearing  on  a  television  talk  show  involving  Ron  Reagan,  Jr.,  to  discuss  hurri-
canes  and  global  warming.  A  second  voice-mail  came  from  a  ‘‘booker’’  for  the  show. 
As it was the weekend, I responded to the booker’s cell number and agreed to make 
myself  available  for  taping  on  Monday,  providing  the  appearance  was  approved  by 
Public  Affairs.  Arriving  at  my  office  on  Monday  morning,  I  listened  to  a  new  voice- 
mail from Public Affairs advising me something to the effect of: ‘‘Tom, sorry for the 
confusion . . . . The White House said no . . .’’ 

On October 19, 2005, I received a media request to appear on the CNBC program 
‘‘On the Money’’ where I had appeared several weeks earlier. I contacted NOAA Pub-
lic Affairs for approval. A few minutes later I was called by a Public Affairs person 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

and  was  quizzed  for  several  minutes  on  what  I  planned  to  say  on  the  program.  I 
was  asked  whether  I  thought  there  was  a  trend  in  Atlantic  hurricane  activity.  I 
gave  a  guarded  response  that,  based  on  recently  published  work,  there  was  some 
possibility  that  a  trend  was  emerging.  I  received  a  voice-mail  a  few  minutes  later 
informing  me  that  ‘‘About  the  CNBC  interview  tonight,  I’m  afraid  it  has  been 
turned  down.’’  Internal  NOAA  e-mails  on  this  incident,  obtained  later  through  a 
FOIA  request,  are  available  for  review  on  Congressman  Waxman’s  website:  http:// 
oversight.house.gov/story.asp?ID=1107&Issue=Politics+and+Science 

Some  months  later  I  learned  that  I  have  the  right  as  a  private  citizen  to  talk  to 
the  media  on  my  own  time,  and  in  principle  I  could  have  tried  to  use  this  tactic 
to  circumvent  NOAA’s  ‘‘turn  down’’  (assuming  a  media  organization  would  actually 
agree to go along.) 

In  response  to  questions,  I  detailed  these  ‘‘turn-down’’  incidents  to  a  Wall  Street 

Journal reporter for a Feb. 16, 2006 article. 
Aftermath of Going Public 

From  the  time  that  Jim  Hansen,  and  later  other  scientists  and  I,  went  public,  I 
have experienced no further interference that I am aware of in communicating with 
the  media.  GFDL’s  unofficial,  operational  practice,  shortly  thereafter,  has  been  to 
keep NOAA Public Affairs in Washington informed, but generally notify them after 
the fact about media contacts. 

One  later  incident  that  I  was  tangentially  involved  with  was  the  several-month 
hold-up,  apparently  somewhere  in  the  Department  of  Commerce,  of  a  NOAA  FAQ 
sheet  on  Atlantic  hurricanes  and  climate  that  others  and  I  at  NOAA  had  helped  to 
put  together.  More  detail  on  that  incident  is  presented  in  a  Nature  article  dated 
Sept. 28, 2006. 
Moving Forward 

In  summary,  prior  to  going  public  with  these  incidents,  I  experienced  some  cases 
of  what  I  view  as  unreasonable  levels  of  interference  with  my  communication  with 
the  media.  Requirements  such  as  prior  notification  of  Public  Affairs  have  hindered 
GFDL  scientists’  communications  with  the  media.  A  promising  development  is  a 
new  draft  media  policy  being  developed  in  the  Department  of  Commerce,  which  in-
cludes NOAA. I and others at GFDL will be anxious to see how NOAA will interpret 
and implement the new policy. I think it is very important that such improved poli-
cies  be  in  place  to  ensure  that  the  channels  of  communication  between  government 
climate scientists and the media and public remain open and free of obstruction. 

I appreciate being given the opportunity to testify today. Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Knutson. 
And  may  I  now  call  upon  Dr.  James  Mahoney,  Environmental 

Consultant. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES R. MAHONEY, PH.D., 

ENVIRONMENTAL CONSULTANT 

Dr. MAHONEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I assume this is still on? Am I transmitting OK? 
Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and 
other  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  appreciate  your  invitation  to 
address the Committee today. 

I  am  James  R.  Mahoney,  and  I  currently  serve  as  an  Environ-
mental  Consultant,  but  I  wanted  to  identify  that  from  2002  until 
2006,  the  specific  dates  are  in  my  written  testimony,  I  was  Assist-
ant  Secretary  of  Commerce,  and  Deputy  Administrator  of  NOAA, 
and  I  was  also  a  Director  of  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program 
during its first four, formative years. 

I  reluctantly  retired  from  my  Federal  appointment  about  10 
months  ago  because  of  continuing,  significant  health  problems,  so 
I  am  now  speaking  as  an  individual,  but  where  appropriate,  I  try 
to draw on the information that I developed during my time in my 
position. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

I  received  a  Ph.D.  degree  in  meteorology  from  MIT,  with  a  spe-
cialization  in  geophysical  fluid  dynamics,  a  specialization  that  Mr. 
Knutson has furthered much more over the years of his own career. 
In response to the Chairman’s letter, I address three main topics 
today.  One,  the  evolution  of  NOAA’s  scientific  communication  pol-
icy; two, the peer-review process required for reports to be officially 
released  by  NOAA,  and;  three,  other  relevant  items.  And  I  have 
chosen that third category ‘‘other relevant items’’ to provide a little 
highlight/background  on  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  be-
cause  we  have  developed  a  very  special  approach  to  transparency 
and  review,  which  I  think  is  serving  the  science  field,  and  espe-
cially the Nation, very well. 

I  appear  today  in  the  hybrid  position  I  mentioned  a  minute  ago. 
I  have  knowledge  from  my  time  in  Federal  appointment,  but  I  am 
now a private citizen. Relative to the broader issue of scientific in-
tegrity,  I  certainly  rely  on  my  experience  and  judgment  developed 
in  more  than  40  years  as  a  working  scientist  in  environmental 
management,  including  earlier  experience  as  Director  of  the  Fed-
eral Acid Rain Assessment Program back in the 1980s. 

NOAA has a long and well-recognized culture aimed at fostering 
integrity  in  scientific  communication  activity.  I  suggest,  for  the 
Committee’s  interest,  a  definition  of  communication  activities  that 
includes  several  parts,  this  is  laid  out  in  my  testimony.  For  time 
limits,  I  will  just  name  them—at  the  highest  level,  I  see  the  sci-
entific  synthesis  documents  that  bring  things  together,  like  we 
have  in  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  and  like  the  inter-
national  body  has  with  the  IPCC  reports,  as  you  know,  a  good  ex-
ample  being  the  new  Fourth  Assessment  Summary,  which  was  re-
leased last week. 

After that special synthesis material, which is of the most, hope-
fully, the most importance and relevance to the Nation, and to this 
Committee’s work, are the general rung of important peer-reviewed 
scientific  papers.  The  peer-review  is  the  highest  standard  for  nor-
mal contribution of papers to be well recognized. 

Next,  the  scientific  papers  that  are  presented  at  meetings,  ver-
bally,  and  often  in  written  form,  but  often  without  peer-review. 
Then, books and monographs, then various project summaries, and 
then  on  down  to  the  case  of  informal  presentations  that  may  in-
clude  school  lectures,  other  community  events,  and  matters  of  this 
sort. 

I  mention  these  at  the  outset,  with  reference  to  that  highest 
standard, and suggest that that highest standard of aggressive and 
transparent  review—and  inclusive  review  by  all  of  the  interested 
constituencies—are the measures most appropriately applied to the 
CCSP  reports,  which  set  out  to  give  us  the  best  look  at  this  infor-
mation,  as  well  as  the  IPCC  assessments,  as  with  the  current 
fourth one now coming along. 

I note that there are thousands of NOAA scientists working, and 
they produce several thousand scientific communications each year. 
Moreover,  the  NOAA  Public  Affairs  Offices  around  the  country 
typically  field  approximately  20  to  50  different  media  inquiries 
each day. So, this question of communications is a very broad one, 
which carries on almost all of the time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

NOAA’s  communication  policy  is  aimed  at  reducing  or  elimi-
nating errors, and that is the policy that, and the standard that we 
should be held to. 

Some  NOAA  scientists  have  complained  about  alleged  muzzling 
of  some  of  their  activity,  Mr.  Knutson  has  just  spoken  about  this, 
and NOAA has taken several steps to address this. As Dr. Brennan 
said  before,  Administrator  Lautenbacher  has  written  to  all  NOAA 
employees  twice  about  this,  and  I  know  that  the  Department  of 
Commerce  is  currently  revising  its  communication  policy,  and  I 
have great hope that it will clarify some, any remaining difficulties. 
The  peer-review  process  at  NOAA,  I  would  refer  to  the  same  six 
categories,  beginning  with  synthesis  products,  other  peer-reviewed 
papers, and on down the line, and I simply recommend to the Com-
mittee  that  the  six-part  table  that  I  have  presented,  or  any  other 
similar  grouping—I’m  not  claiming  special  status  for  my  six,  but 
the  concept  of  understanding  the  different  types  of  communica-
tions,  I  recommend  to  the  Committee  for  its  use  in  reviewing  the 
different approaches to peer-review in various cases. 

Now,  I’ll  finish  with  a  couple  of  comments  about  the  CCSP  Pro-
gram.  Dr.  Brennan  has  already  addressed  this,  so  I  will  simply 
note that when we prepared the CCSP Strategic Plan to guide the 
development  of  our  Synthesis  and  Assessment  documents,  we 
asked  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  to  conduct  two,  separate 
reviews of that work. The first at a draft stage, and the second re-
view  after  the  plan  was  fully  completed.  The  Academy  found  that 
plan  to  be  an  ideal  tool  for  guiding  the  Nation’s  climate  studies 
throughout  the  upcoming  years.  And  we  have  tried  very  hard  to 
use this as the basis for the work in the CCSP Program. 

I’ll  just  mention  before  closing  that  the  analyses  carried  out  in 
the  CCSP  studies  have  been  aimed  at  the  most  challenging  sci-
entific question, so we get the best view and guidance. We address 
those  questions,  we  address  the  stakeholders,  we  attempt  to  look 
at uncertainties, but with the maximum transparency for all view-
ers,  and  reviewers,  and  I  cite  this  as  some  of  the  major  progress 
which has been achieved in the last few years. 

With that, Mr. Chairman, and Mr. Vice–Chairman, I end my tes-
timony.  I’d  like  to  add  just  the—what  I’ll  call  a  professional  com-
ment  at  the  end.  I  believe  that  there  is  abundant  evidence  about 
the human causation of climate change about which you began this 
hearing  today.  I  also  believe  that  the  working  scientists  have  very 
important  contributions  to  make  in  this  area,  and  I  strongly  favor 
the theme you have addressed for this hearing. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Mr. Vice Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Mahoney follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES R. MAHONEY, PH.D., 

ENVIRONMENTAL CONSULTANT * 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens and Members of the Committee: thank 
you  for  your  invitation  to  address  the  Committee  today  on  the  important  issue  of 
assuring  integrity  in  climate  change  research.  I  am  James  R.  Mahoney,  and  I  cur-
rently  serve  as  an  Environmental  Consultant,  providing  scientific  and  professional 

* Previously (April 2, 2002–March 30, 2006): Assistant Secretary for Oceans and Atmosphere, 
U.S. Department of Commerce; Deputy Administrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric 
Administration; and Director, U.S. Climate Change Science Program. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

advice  to  a  number  of  organizations.  From  April  2,  2002  to  March  30,  2006,  I  was 
Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Oceans and Atmosphere, and Deputy Adminis-
trator  of  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Organization  (NOAA).  During  this 
period I was also the Director of the U.S. Climate Change Science Program (CCSP), 
involving 13 Federal agencies conducting and overseeing total annual budgets of ap-
proximately  $2  billion  dedicated  to  scientific  research,  Earth  system  observations, 
computer  simulations  of  future  climate  conditions,  and  evaluation  of  possible  adap-
tation  and  mitigation  actions  to  address  climate  change.  I  reluctantly  retired  from 
my  Federal  appointment  approximately  10  months  ago  because  of  continuing,  sig-
nificant health problems. 

In  1966  I  received  the  Ph.D.  degree  in  meteorology  from  MIT,  with  a  specializa-
tion in geophysical fluid mechanics. Since that time I have had over 40 years contin-
uous  experience  in  science-based  environmental  management,  including  service  on 
the  faculty  of  Harvard  University,  advisory  assignments  with  national  government 
agencies  and  international  organizations  in  several  regions  of  the  world,  extensive 
private  sector  environmental  assessment  and  design  work,  and  two  appointed  posi-
tions  with  the  U.S.  Federal  Government  (involving  overall  management  of  national 
acid rain studies from 1988 to 1991, and climate science studies from 2002 to 2006). 
In response to the issues raised in Chairman Inouye’s letter, my testimony today 
addresses  three  main  topics:  (1)  the  background  and  evolution  of  NOAA’s  commu-
nication policy related to scientific research; (2) the peer-review process required for 
scientific reports or conclusions to be officially released by NOAA; and (3) other im-
portant  and  relevant  items.  Related  to  this  final  topic,  I  address  the  scientific  and 
general  public  review  process  required  for  scientific  reports  and  conclusions  being 
released by the Climate Change Science Program. These CCSP processes are highly 
important for assuring the credibility of complicated and often controversial climate 
science  findings  that,  in  turn,  underpin  the  development  of  appropriate  climate 
change  policies  that  will  be  needed  in  the  years  and  decades  ahead  to  address  re-
gional-, national-, and international-scale challenges. 

I appear today in somewhat of a ‘‘hybrid position’’. In the case of positions devel-
oped and actions taken during the recent 4 years (ending on March 31, 2006) while 
I served in my Federal appointed assignments, I attempt to speak from the perspec-
tive of my former position, and to convey the requested information based upon my 
memory  and  personal  files,  augmented  by  recent  dialog  with  a  limited  number  of 
my former colleagues. In the case of the broader issue of scientific integrity involved 
in  the  reporting  of  controversial  environmental  research,  I  also  rely  on  the  experi-
ence  and  judgment  I  have  developed  during  more  than  40  years  of  environmental 
study.  As  an  example,  I  benefited  from  the  development  of  a  large  body  of  ‘‘lessons 
learned’’ during my years as Director of the interagency National Acid Precipitation 
Assessment  Program,  from  1988  to  1991.  Many  lessons  developed  in  the  process  of 
applying acid rain research findings to Federal legislation (for example, to the Clean 
Air Act Amendments of 1990) positively influenced my commitment to highly trans-
parent and inclusively reviewed scientific statements related to climate change. 
The  Background  and  Evolution  of  NOAA’s  Communication  Policy  Related 

to Scientific Research 

As  one  of  the  principal  scientific  agencies  within  the  Federal  Government  NOAA 
has  long  had  a  well-recognized  culture  aimed  at  fostering  integrity  in  its  scientific 
communications  activities.  I  suggest  for  the  Committee’s  interest  a  working  defini-
tion  for  ‘‘communications  activities’’  to  include  (1)  scientific  synthesis  documents 
(often  co-authored  by  multiple  experts)  intended  to  summarize  the  best  available 
‘‘state of the science’’ in defined areas of coverage; (2) peer reviewed research papers 
appearing  in  recognized  scientific  journals;  (3)  verbal  (and  often  written)  scientific 
papers presented at scheduled scientific meetings; (4) books, monographs and/or sec-
tions  of  books  intended  to  summarize  science  in  designated  subject  areas;  (5)  pro-
gram and project report documents that provide examples (but not exhaustive sum-
maries)  of  interesting  developments  in  the  areas  studied;  and  (6)  informal  presen-
tations to students, community groups, etc. 

This  list  of  six  categories  is  ranked  in  the  order  of  decreasing  requirements  (in 
my  view)  for  thorough  and  formal  review  before  dissemination.  Examples  of  Cat-
egory  1  include  the  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Reports  (SAR’s)  being  prepared  by 
the Federal Government sponsored Climate Change Science Program (discussed fur-
ther  below),  and  the  several  volumes  of  the  United  Nations  sponsored  Fourth  As-
sessment  Report  (FAR)  being  prepared  by  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate 
Change  (IPCC)  that  released  last  week  its  new  Summary  for  Policymakers  for  the 
Working  Group  I  (Physical  Science  findings).  Both  the  CCSP  and  the  IPCC  docu-
ments are being prepared following well-established protocols to assure comprehen-
siveness, transparency and broad review by interested constituencies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

In the case of NOAA’s scientific communications (including all six categories men-
tioned above) it is important to note that thousands of NOAA scientists produce sev-
eral  thousand  scientific  communications  each  year.  Even  in  the  category  of  media 
inquires  NOAA  typically  receives  twenty  to  fifty  press  inquiries  each  workday.  The 
normal  scientific  culture  of  carefully  reporting  the  findings  of  studies  has  served 
NOAA and other Federal scientific agencies well for many years—in most cases. My 
observation  is  that—in  all  large  workforces—there  will  always  be  some  small  per-
centage  of  errors  in  communication.  Many  of  these  errors  are  inadvertent,  and  can 
usually be rectified quickly. My personal observation is that there are occasional ‘‘in-
tended  errors’’  or  misrepresentations  that  can  occur  within  any  organization  and 
that  illustrate  the  need  for  effective  communications  policies  applicable  to  govern-
ment  scientific  organizations.  These  situations  can  arise  from  two  causes:  (1)  a  sci-
entist  may  desire  to  claim  disproportionate  credit  for  his/her  work,  or  (2)  the  bias 
of a scientist (or a group of scientists) may lead to inaccurate reporting or discussion 
of findings. 

NOAA’s communication policy over several years has aimed to reduce or eliminate 
errors  and  misrepresentations  by:  (1)  assuring  appropriate  internal  scientific  re-
views  before  technical  information  is  communicated;  (2)  asking  scientists  to  coordi-
nate  their  communication  activities  with  the  public  affairs  offices  in  the  major  ele-
ments of NOAA (to avoid ‘‘left hand—right hand’’ inconsistencies among various re-
searchers). Please note that the internal scientific reviews mentioned here are to be 
conducted by scientific peers, and not by political appointees. 

During recent years some scientific issues (climate change in particular) have be-
come  very  controversial  among  elements  of  the  public,  and  this  has  created  in-
creased  challenges  to  the  integrity  of  scientific  reporting  by  NOAA  and  other  agen-
cies.  In  this  situation  of  heightened  sensitivity  some  NOAA  scientists  have  com-
plained  about  alleged  ‘‘muzzling’’  of  their  ability  to  speak  to  the  media.  In  par-
ticular, NOAA’s long-term practice of using its public affairs specialists to seek con-
sistency  among  the  reports  by  various  scientists  has  been  seen  as  an  impediment 
to full reporting. NOAA has been taking several steps to address this concern since 
it  has  arisen.  In  particular,  NOAA  Undersecretary  Lautenbacher  has  written  to  all 
NOAA  employees  twice  during  the  past  year  affirming  his  support  for  open  report-
ing  by  all  NOAA  scientists.  Moreover  I  understand  that  the  Department  of  Com-
merce  (DOC)  has  been  revising  its  communications  policy  to  encourage,  but  not  re-
quire, scientists to work with their counterparts in Public Affairs prior to dissemina-
tion.  I  understand  that  this  revised  policy  should  be  ready  for  adoption  within  the 
next  few  weeks.  It  is  my  view  that  this  revised  policy  should  resolve  most  or  all  of 
the  recent  complaints  by  some  NOAA  scientists,  and  I  am  sure  that  if  any  further 
issues arise, they will be addressed promptly by NOAA management. 
The Peer-Review Process Required for Scientific Reports or Conclusions to 

Be Officially Released by NOAA 

In  response  to  this  question,  I  refer  to  the  six  categories  of  ‘‘communications  ac-
tivities’’ that I previously recommended for consideration. Not all of these categories 
represent ‘‘official releases’’ by NOAA, so it is important to recognize the differences 
between the categories. Table 1 on the next page addresses each category. 

As Table 1 illustrates, the scientific Synthesis and Assessment Reports (for exam-
ple,  the  21  CCSP  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Reports)  represent  an  example  of  the 
most  stringent  requirements  for  peer  review,  including  the  opportunity  for  com-
ments  by  interested  public  constituencies  as  well  as  by  members  of  the  scientific 
community.  The  IPCC  Fourth  Assessment  Report  documents  (such  as  the  physical 
science Summary for Policymakers released last week) are similar examples. A large 
number of NOAA scientists, as well as many U.S. Government scientists from other 
agencies  took  part  in  the  preparation  of  the  new  IPCC  document.  Dr.  Susan  Sol-
omon of the NOAA Boulder Laboratories served as the overall Co-Chairman of IPCC 
Working Group I, providing substantial leadership to this major international activ-
ity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Table 1. Classification of Categories of Scientific Information Communication 

Suggested to the Senate Committee by James R. Mahoney 
(These classifications are not used in the NOAA Communication Policy) 

Category 

Topic 

Official Release? 

Comments 

1 

2 

3 

4 

5 

6 

Scientific synthesis 

documents 

Peer-reviewed re-
search papers 

Papers presented at 

meetings 

Books & monographs 

Yes 

Case-by-case de-

termination 

Usually not 

Case-by-case de-

termination 

Yes 

Program & project re-

port documents 

Lectures to students & 

No 

other groups 

Requires  extensive  peer  and  pub-

Peer  review  accomplished  by  the 
journal  and  by 

lic review 

publishing 
NOAA 

Peer  review  by  NOAA  scientific 

staff 

staff 

Peer  review  by  NOAA  scientific 

Peer  review  by  NOAA  scientific 

staff & project management 

Peer  review  by  NOAA  scientific 

staff is encouraged 

As  the  table  illustrates,  other  communications  activities  routinely  undertaken  by 
NOAA  scientific  staff  typically  have  differing  requirements  for  peer  review.  All  of 
the  first  five  categories  require  at  least  peer  review  by  other  NOAA  scientific  staff 
(i.e., independent review by expert staff not involved in the drafting of the informa-
tion) before dissemination or other use of the information. The sixth category (infor-
mal lectures to students and other community groups) does not require peer review 
in  all  cases  because  the  information  conveyed  in  such  lectures  usually  would  not 
constitute an official dissemination by NOAA. 

I recommend that the Committee keep in mind the six-part table presented here, 
or  a  similar  classification  scheme,  when  considering  the  manner  in  which  NOAA 
(and  possibly  other  Federal  science  agencies)  conveys  technical  information  to  the 
scientific  community,  to  students,  and  to  interested  constituencies  among  the  gen-
eral public. 
The  Scientific  and  General  Review  Process  of  the  CCSP  Scientific 

Synthesis and Assessment Products 

In  June  2001  the  President  called  for  an  increase  in  Federal  funding  for  climate 
research  and  observations,  as  part  of  his  overall  plan  (also  including  control  tech-
nology development and major new international technical collaboration) to address 
climate change issues. A major part of the reasoning for increased climate research 
was  the  need  to  improve  the  accuracy  of  regional  and  global  scale  understanding 
of climate variability, and to improve projections of future climate conditions related 
to  profiles  of  future  greenhouse  gas  emission  rates  around  the  world.  In  February 
2002  the  President  created  a  new,  cabinet-level  interagency  management  structure 
to supervise the approximately $2 billion annual Federal expenditure in climate re-
search  and  monitoring.  After  confirmation  by  the  Senate  in  late  March  2002,  I  un-
dertook  my  new  position  as  CCSP  Director  on  April  2,  2002.  The  earliest  focus  for 
the  new  CCSP  management  structure  was  the  creation  of  a  Strategic  Plan  that 
would assure the development and dissemination of the best available scientific syn-
theses of high-priority climate issues. 

The  CCSP  Strategic  Plan,  which  has  guided  both  scientific  reporting  and  the  de-
velopment  of  improved  assessment  methodologies,  was  adopted  in  July  2003  after 
extensive  peer  review,  public  review  and  special  review  by  an  ad  hoc  committee  of 
the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  convened  at  the  request  of  CCSP.  The  National 
Academy  conducted  a  second  round  review  of  the  newly  revised  CCSP  Strategic 
Plan  in  late  2003,  and  reported  its  finding  that  the  Plan  constituted  a  good  vehicle 
to  guide  the  development  of  the  Nation’s  climate  studies  throughout  the  next  dec-
ade. 

The  CCSP  Strategic  Plan  required  the  development  of  detailed,  aggressive  plans 
for  scientific  peer  review,  and  comprehensive  public  review,  of  the  scientific  Syn-
thesis and Assessment Reports by CCSP. The review process was complicated by the 
passage of the Information Quality Act of 2002 and the adoption of separate guide-
lines  to  comply  with  the  Act  by  OMB  between  2003  and  2005.  In  2005  CCSP  pub-
lished its Guidelines for Producing CCSP Synthesis and Assessment Products, incor-
porating  the  combined  requirements  of  the  CCSP  Strategic  Plan  and  the  OMB 
Guidelines  responsive  to  the  2002  Information  Quality  Act.  The  detailed  guidelines 
for  the  CCSP  products  are  available  on  the  CCSP  website  www.climatescience.gov, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

and  are  being  used  as  the  basis  for  extensive  peer  and  public  review  of  the  entire 
set  of  21  CCSP  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Reports  currently  being  prepared.  These 
guidelines  represent  one  of  the  most  comprehensive  summaries  of  guidance  for  the 
preparation  and  review  of  important  government  science  documents.  I  commend 
these  guidelines  to  the  Committee  and  its  staff,  both  to  evaluate  the  approach  to 
scientific dissemination adopted by CCSP, and to provide examples that may be use-
ful for other government science reporting as well. 

Time  does  not  allow  detailed  discussion  of  these  CCSP  guidelines,  but  I  note  the 
summary  statement  of  principles  for  the  guidelines  for  the  interest  of  the  Com-
mittee. These general principles are: 

• Analyses structured around specific questions. 
• Early and continuing involvement of stakeholders. 
• Explicit treatment of uncertainties. 
• Transparent public review of analysis questions, methods and draft results. 
• Adoption of a ‘‘lessons learned’’ approach, building upon the ongoing CCSP anal-

yses. 

I cite one example of the major progress attained by the CCSP collaborating agen-
cies during the past few years, by reference to the IPCC Fourth Assessment science 
summary  released  last  week:  When  the  prior  IPCC  Third  Assessment  was  released 
in late 2000, the large computer models used for the future projections of global cli-
mate  conditions  were  supplied  by  Canadian  and  European  research  institutes,  be-
cause  the  U.S.  climate  modeling  capability  was  not  ready  for  use  in  these  global 
studies.  In  the  new  2007  IPCC  assessment,  my  view  (shared  by  many  in  the  field) 
is  that  the  United  States  has  assumed  the  leadership  position  in  the  critically  im-
portant  computer  modeling  of  future  climate  conditions  for  the  global  climate 
science community. 

To the Vice Chairmen and Members of the Committee, I thank you for your invi-
tation to appear before the Committee today. I shall be pleased to answer any ques-
tions you choose to pose. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Dr. Mahoney. 
And I’ll now call on the Director of Climate Science Watch, Gov-

ernment Accountability Project, Mr. Rick Piltz. 

STATEMENT OF RICK PILTZ, DIRECTOR, CLIMATE SCIENCE 

WATCH, GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY PROJECT 

Mr. PILTZ. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Mr. Vice-Chairman, Mem-
bers  of  the  Committee.  I  greatly  appreciate  the  opportunity  to 
present testimony at this hearing. 

In  my  written  testimony,  I  address  several  issues  that  I  believe 
are  of  particular  significance  for  Congressional  oversight  at  this 
time. Very briefly, a few key points. 

First, on the Administration’s suppression of the National Assess-
ment  of  Climate  Change  Impacts:  In  the  1998  to  2000  timeframe, 
the  Federal  Global  Change  Research  Program  initiated,  pursuant 
to the Global Change Research Act, a project to assess the potential 
consequences  of  climate  variability  and  change  for  the  United 
States. A multi-agency coordination effort supported assessment ac-
tivities  involving  hundreds  of  scientists  and  stakeholders  in  19  re-
gions around the country, including the Pacific Islands, Alaska, the 
Gulf Coast, the Mid-Atlantic, and others. 

In  November  2000,  an  independent  synthesis  panel  made  up  of 
leading  scientists  and  other  experts,  issued  the  National  Assess-
ment  report  that—to  this  day—remains  the  most  comprehensive, 
scientifically-based assessment of the potential consequences of cli-
mate  change  for  the  United  States.  The  National  Assessment  was 
designed  to  become  an  ongoing  process  to  support  national  pre-
paredness in dealing with global climate change. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

But the Bush Administration abandoned support for this process 
of  communication  between  scientists  and  stakeholders,  and  has 
failed  to  move  forward  with  a  follow-on  National  Assessment  re-
port. 

The Administration has suppressed discussion and use of the Na-
tional  Assessment  Report  by  Federal  agencies  in  research  and  as-
sessment  activities,  and  has  suppressed  references  to  it  in  pub-
lished  program  documents,  including  annual  program  reports  to 
Congress,  that  for  9  years,  I  edited  while  working  for  the  Climate 
Change Research Program. 

It is my understanding that the White House, through the agen-
cy  of  the  Council  on  Environmental  Quality,  directed  this  suppres-
sion,  which  was  then  implemented  by  the  CCSP  leadership  during 
the last 5 years. 

Myron Ebell, of the industry-funded policy group the Competitive 
Enterprise  Institute,  has  been  quoted  as  saying,  ‘‘To  the  degree 
that  it  is  vanished,  we  have  succeeded.’’  And  the  fact  that  the  Ad-
ministration  and  the  CCSP  leadership  essentially  made  the  Na-
tional  Assessment  vanish,  in  the  Strategic  Plan  for  the  U.S.  Cli-
mate Change Science Program, issued in 2003. 

The  National  Research  Council  has  used  and  praised  the  Na-
tional  Assessment  as  an  important  and  credible  study,  and  was 
critical of the program’s unjustified failure to incorporate and build 
on the National Assessment in its Strategic Plan. 

The  White  House  Science  Office,  the  Council  on  Environmental 
Quality, and the CCSP leadership stonewalled the Academy by fail-
ing  to  respond  to  and  address  this  criticism,  by  providing  any  jus-
tification for their actions, scientific or otherwise. 

I see the Administration’s treatment of the 2000 National Assess-
ment  as  the  political  interference  with  scientific  integrity  that  has 
done, and continues to do, the greatest damage in undermining na-
tional preparedness in dealing with the challenge of global climate 
change.  I  believe  it  would  be  appropriate  for  the  Committee  to  in-
vestigate  this,  and  even  more  important,  for  Congress  to  move  to 
revitalize  what  should  become  an  ongoing  National  Assessment 
process.  High-level  support  for  this  kind  of  direct,  unfiltered  com-
munication  between  scientists  and  stakeholders,  would  convey  im-
portant  information  to  policymakers  and  society  about  climate 
change impacts, and potential response strategies. 

Also, the Administration has acted in a variety of ways to impede 
and  manipulate  communication  about  climate  change  by  Federal 
scientists  to  wider  audiences,  including  Congress  and  the  media. 
And  it’s  not  so  much  interference  with  what’s  published  in  the 
technical  journals,  but  it’s  when  the  science  comes  forward  and  is 
communicated  to  a  wider  audience—Congress,  the  media,  the  pub-
lic—that  the  political  gatekeepers  step  in,  through  a  variety  of 
mechanisms. 

Last  week,  the  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists  and  the  Govern-
ment Accountability Project released their joint report, Atmosphere 
of Pressure. This report—investigation—uncovered new evidence of 
widespread  political  interference  in  Federal  climate  science.  One 
hundred  and  fifty  Federal  climate  scientists  reported,  collectively, 
at least 435 such incidents of political interference during the past 
5  years.  More  than  100  survey  respondents  reported  changes  or 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

edits  during  review  of  their  work,  to  change  the  meaning  of  their 
findings. That number should be zero. 

Political interference in climate science has moved from the anec-
dotal  to  the  epidemic.  And  even  if  we  succeed  in  lifting  this  heavy 
hand of censorship, there is still the problem of getting the political 
leadership to embrace the findings that are put forward by the sci-
entists, and act on them to translate them effectively into National 
policy. 

This  atmosphere  of  pressure  that  we  have  been  seeing  has  seri-
ous consequences for the Nation’s ability to have access to the best 
available  scientific  information  for  understanding  and  responding 
to  climate  change.  The  UCS/GAP  report  has  a  set  of  recommenda-
tions,  that  ensure  basic  freedoms  for  government  scientists,  and 
that taxpayer-funded science sees the light of day, without manipu-
lation of climate science communication by political gatekeepers. 

Congress  should  act  to  extend  whistleblower  protection  to  sci-
entists  who  report  interference.  Federal  scientists  have  a  constitu-
tional  right  to  talk  about  any  subject,  so  long  as  they  speak  as  a 
private citizen, and the public has the right to hear them. 

A case example of my own personal experiences with what I con-
sider inappropriate White House political interference with Climate 
Change  Science  Program  reports  produced  by  career  Federal 
science  professionals  is  summarized  and  explained  in  my  written 
testimony. 

I’ll conclude on that. I’d be pleased to answer any questions. 
If  I  could  just  add  one  additional  item.  Dr.  Brennan  referred  to 
the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  budget  as  $2  billion.  In 
fact, it was $2 billion in 2004. But the Administration has steadily 
cut  back  the  funding  for  climate  change  research,  to  the  point 
where,  in  the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2008  request  the  other  day, 
that  budget  request  is  now  $1.5  billion.  That  is  an  almost  30  per-
cent  cut  in  real  terms  in  the  climate  research  budget  in  4  years, 
and almost all of that can be accounted for by cutbacks in the glob-
al  climate  observing  system—the  NASA/NOAA  observing  system, 
which  is  in  a  state  of  crisis.  Dr.  Anthes  has  addressed  that,  I  ad-
dress it also in my written testimony, but I urge the Committee to 
look into this. I think it’s a tremendously important issue for over-
sight, and to be rectified by Congressional action. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Piltz follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICK PILTZ, DIRECTOR, CLIMATE SCIENCE WATCH, 

GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY PROJECT 

Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  members  of  the  Committee—I  greatly 
appreciate  the  opportunity  to  present  testimony  at  this  hearing,  which  addresses  a 
subject  of  crucial  importance  for  good  policymaking  and  an  informed  society.  I  am 
currently  the  Director  of  Climate  Science  Watch,  a  program  of  the  Government  Ac-
countability  Project  in  Washington,  D.C.  The  Government  Accountability  Project,  a 
29-year-old  nonprofit  public  interest  group,  is  the  Nation’s  leading  whistleblower 
protection  organization.  Climate  Science  Watch  engages  in  investigation,  commu-
nication,  and  reform  advocacy  aimed  at  holding  public  officials  accountable  for  how 
they use climate research in addressing the challenge of global climate change. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Since  1988,  my  primary  professional  focus  has  been  on  the  relationship  between 
science  and  policy  on  global  climate  change. 1 From  April  1995  until  March  2005, 
I  worked  in  the  program  coordination  office  of  the  multiagency  U.S.  Government 
program that supports scientific research on climate and associated global change. 2 
The  program  was  originally  established  as  the  U.S.  Global  Change  Research  Pro-
gram (USGCRP) under the Global Change Research Act of 1990. In 2002, the Bush 
Administration  established  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP),  in-
corporating  the  USGCRP  and  the  President’s  Climate  Change  Research  Initiative. 
Key Issues Addressed in My Testimony 

We  currently  face  major,  interrelated  problems  with  the  U.S.  Climate  Change 
Science  Program  and  with  how  the  Administration  is  undercutting  climate  science 
assessment, communication, and research. In my judgment, the following are of par-
ticular  significance  for  the  public  interest  and  for  Congressional  oversight  at  this 
time: 

1. The Administration suppressed official use of the National Assessment of Cli-
mate Change Impacts and has failed to continue the National Assessment proc-
ess,  thus  undermining  national  preparedness  for  dealing  with  the  challenge  of 
global climate change. 
2. The Administration has acted in a variety of ways to impede and manipulate 
communication  about  climate  change  by  Federal  scientists  and  career  science 
program leaders to wider audiences, including Congress and the media. 
3. The Administration has cut the climate change research budget to its lowest 
level  since  1992  and  is  presiding  over  what  appears  to  be  a  growing  crisis  in 
the global climate observing system, thus undermining a critical national intel-
ligence-gathering process. 

My  testimony  deals  with  each  of  these  problems  and  concludes  with  a  set  of  rec-

ommendations. 
1.  The  Administration  Suppressed  Official  Use  of 

the  National 
Assessment of Climate Change Impacts and Has Failed to Continue the 
National  Assessment  Process, 
Thus  Undermining  National 
Preparedness for Dealing With the Challenge of Global Climate Change 
During  the  2001–2005  time-frame,  I  came  to  the  conclusion  that  politicization  of 
climate science communication by the current Administration was undermining the 
credibility  and  integrity  of  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program  in  its  relationship 
to the research community, to program managers, to policymakers, and to the public 
interest.  Among  the  key  issues  that  I  viewed  as  particularly  significant  in  the 
politicization  of  the  program,  foremost  was  the  treatment  by  the  current  Adminis-
tration  of  the  National  Assessment  of  the  Potential  Consequences  of  Climate  Varia-
bility and Change (‘‘National Assessment’’). 

The  National  Assessment  to  this  day  remains  the  most  comprehensive,  scientif-
ically  based  assessment  of  the  potential  consequences  of  climate  change  for  the 
United  States.  No  national  climate  change  assessment  process  or  reporting  of  com-
parable  subject  matter  and  regionally-based,  nationwide  scope  has  subsequently 
been undertaken with the support of the Federal Government. The National Assess-
ment was a pioneering experiment in societal relevance for climate change research. 
I  see  the  Administration’s  treatment  of  the  2000  National  Assessment,  and  the 
abandonment  of  high-level  support  for  an  ongoing  process  of  scientist-stakeholder 
interaction, as the central climate science scandal of the Administration—the action 
that  has  done,  and  continues  to  do,  the  greatest  damage  in  undermining  national 

1 I  studied  Political  Science  at  the  University  of  Michigan,  earning  an  M.A.  and  Ph.D.  Can-
didate  status.  I  have  worked  on  issues  of  environmental  and  energy  research  and  policy  both 
inside  and  outside  of  government  since  1979.  From  1991  through  1994  I  served  as  a  Majority 
Professional  Staff  Member  of  the  Committee  on  Science,  Space  and  Technology  of  the  U.S. 
House  of  Representatives.  During  that  time  I  supported  the  Committee’s  oversight  of  climate 
and global change research and policy issues. 

2 The  Climate  Change  Science  Program  Office,  where  I  worked,  supports  this  research  effort 
by performing interagency coordination, strategic planning, communications, and reporting func-
tions,  and  serving  as  the  program  secretariat.  I  worked  directly  with  the  program  leadership, 
career  Federal  science  program  managers,  and  the  senior  professional  staff  in  the  program  of-
fice.  At  the  time  I  resigned  in  March  2005  my  position  was  Senior  Associate.  During  the  time 
I  worked  in  the  program  office  I  was  employed  by  the  University  Corporation  for  Atmospheric 
Research (UCAR), based in Boulder, Colorado. UCAR is a nonprofit consortium of North Amer-
ican  member  universities  that  grant  doctoral  degrees  in  the  atmospheric  and  related  sciences. 
I was assigned to work in the program office under a grant from the National Science Founda-
tion to the UCAR Joint Office of Science Support. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

preparedness in dealing with the challenge of global climate change. Thus, I believe 
it would be appropriate for the Committee to investigate the Administration’s treat-
ment  of  the  2000  National  Assessment,  as  part  of  oversight  of  the  White  House’s 
political intervention in the U.S. Climate Change Science Program and in particular 
its assessment and communication activities. 

The  National  Assessment  was  initiated,  carried  out,  and  published  between  1997 
and  2000,  during  the  time  I  worked  in  the  program  office.  The  Global  Change  Re-
search  Act  of  1990  mandates  the  production  and  submission  to  the  President  and 
the  Congress  ‘‘no  less  frequently  than  every  4  years’’  scientific  assessment  reports 
of  global  change  that  include  the  impacts  of  such  change  on  the  environment  and 
on  various  socioeconomic  sectors.  To  be  responsive  to  this  statutory  mandate,  the 
program  sponsored  the  National  Assessment.  The  process  involved  communication 
between  scientists  and  a  variety  of  ‘‘stakeholders,’’  from  the  public  and  private  sec-
tors and academia. It was intended to initiate a process of interaction and reporting 
that would be ongoing and developed and improved over time. 

A  National  Assessment  Synthesis  Team  made  up  of  leading  scientists  and  other 
experts,  was  established  as  a  Federal  advisory  committee  to  guide  the  process.  It 
produced  a  National  Assessment  report  that  integrated  key  findings  from  regional 
and sectoral analyses and addressed questions about the implications of climate var-
iability and change for the United States. The report was forwarded to the President 
and Congress in November 2000. 

Climate  change  impacts  vary  by  region  and  sector,  as  do  response  strategy  op-
tions. University-based teams led 19 regional workshops and assessments across the 
United States that focused on interrelated environmental and socioeconomic issues. 
In  addition,  five  sectoral  reports  focused  on  issues  that  were  national  in  scope  and 
related to the goods and services on which society and the economy depend, includ-
ing reports on agriculture, water, human health, forests, and coastal areas and ma-
rine resources. 

Every Member has an interest in the kind of information such an assessment can 
make  available  for  consideration  in  developing  national  policy.  These  were 
groundbreaking, integrative efforts that were designed to be of use to Congress and 
the Federal agencies, state and local officials, regional and sectoral planners and re-
source  managers,  educators,  and  the  general  public.  They  exemplified  a  vision  of  a 
democratic  process  for  societally  relevant  environmental  assessment,  based  on  dia-
logue  between  interdisciplinary  teams  of  scientific  experts  and  a  wide  range  of 
stakeholders  and  the  general  public.  Through  this  process,  the  agenda  for  ongoing 
research  and  assessment  would  be  informed  by  a  better  understanding  of  the  con-
cerns  of  policymakers  and  the  public,  and  policymakers  and  the  public  would  learn 
about  issues  of  climate  change  and  its  potential  consequences  so  as  to  better  equip 
them for making decisions. 

In  June  2001,  the  Committee  on  the  Science  of  Climate  Change  of  the  National 
Research Council (NRC) issued a report titled Climate Change Science: An Analysis 
of  Some  Key  Questions.  The  study  originated  from  a  White  House  request  in  May 
2001  to  help  inform  the  Administration’s  review  of  U.S.  climate  change  policy.  The 
Committee  was  made  up  of  11  eminent  climate  scientists.  It  was  chaired  by  Ralph 
J.  Cicerone  of  the  University  of  California,  who  is  today  the  President  of  the  Na-
tional  Academy  of  Sciences.  The  section  of  the  NRC  report  on  ‘‘Consequences  of  In-
creased  Climate  Change  of  Various  Magnitudes’’  is  based  almost  entirely  on  the 
findings  of  the  National  Assessment.  The  NRC  Committee  did  not  in  any  way  call 
into  question  the  scientific  legitimacy  or  significance  of  the  National  Assessment, 
but rather drew on it as a core text in this advisory report to the White House. 
The Administration’s Treatment of the National Assessment 

Despite  the  utility  of  the  National  Assessment,  the  Administration,  most  aggres-
sively  from  the  second  half  of  2002  onward,  acted  to  essentially  bury  the  National 
Assessment,  i.e.,  by  suppressing  discussion  of  it  by  participating  agencies  for  pur-
poses  of  research  planning  by  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program;  suppressing 
references  to  it  in  published  program  documents  including  annual  program  reports 
to  Congress;  withdrawing  support  from  the  coordinated  process  of  scientist-stake-
holder interaction and assessment that had been initiated by the first National As-
sessment;  and  making  clear  that  no  second  National  Assessment  would  be  under-
taken.  The  Administration  failed  to  consider  and  utilize  the  National  Assessment 
in  the  Strategic  Plan  for  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  issued  in  July 
2003.  From  my  experience,  observation,  analysis  of  documentation,  and  personal 
communications  with  others  in  the  program,  I  believe  it  is  clear  that  the  reasons 
for  this  were  essentially  political,  and  not  based  on  scientific  considerations.  I  be-
lieve this is generally understood within the program. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

In late May 2002 the Administration issued the report U.S. Climate Action Report 
2002:  Third  National  Communication  of  the  United  States  of  America  Under  the 
United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change. This Climate Action Re-
port was one of a series of reports required periodically pursuant to U.S. responsibil-
ities under the Framework Convention on Climate Change, the foundational climate 
treaty. Chapter 6 of the Climate Action Report, ‘‘Impacts and Adaptation,’’ drew sub-
stantially on the findings of the National Assessment for its discussion of the poten-
tial  consequences  of  climate  change  for  the  United  States.  This  was  appropriate, 
considering  that  the  National  Assessment  had  recently  been  published  and  rep-
resented  the  most  systematic,  in-depth  study  of  this  subject  that  had  been  done  to 
that point (and remains so at the present time). 

The  ‘‘Impacts  and  Adaptation’’  chapter  prompted  press  coverage,  including  a 
prominent  story  in  the  New  York  Times,  on  how  the  chapter  suggested  a  new  ac-
knowledgement  by  the  Administration  of  the  science  pointing  to  the  reality  of 
human-induced  climate  change  and  a  range  of  likely  adverse  societal  and  environ-
mental consequences. This appeared to cause a public relations problem for the Ad-
ministration. Asked about the report and the press coverage of it, the President re-
plied in a way that distanced himself from it by referring to it as ‘‘a report put out 
by the bureaucracy.’’ 

My  understanding  at  that  point,  which  I  believe  was  coming  to  be  more  widely 
shared,  both  inside  and  outside  the  program,  was  that  the  Administration  was  un-
comfortable  with  the  mainstream  scientifically  based  communications  suggesting 
the  reality  of  human-induced  climate  change  and  the  likelihood  of  adverse  con-
sequences.  Straightforward  acknowledgement  of  the  growing  body  of  climate  re-
search and assessment suggesting likely adverse consequences could potentially lead 
to  stronger  public  support  for  controls  on  emissions  and  could  be  used  to  criticize 
the  Administration  for  not  embracing  a  stronger  climate  change  response  strategy. 
It  was  the  concern  about  this  linkage  that  seemed  to  underlie  much  of  what  I  per-
ceived  to  be  the  Administration’s  intervention  in  managing  communications  by  the 
Climate Change Science Program. 

In this context, for the Administration to have released a U.S. Climate Action Re-
port  with  a  chapter  on  climate  change  impacts  that  identified  a  range  of  likely  ad-
verse  consequences,  based  on  scientific  reports  including  the  National  Assessment, 
could rightly be seen as an anomaly and appeared to be seen as a significant polit-
ical  error  by  Administration  allies  dedicated  to  denying  the  reality  of  human-in-
duced  global  warming  as  a  significant  problem.  On  June  3,  2002,  Myron  Ebell  of 
the  Competitive  Enterprise  Institute  sent  an  e-mail  message  addressed  to  Philip 
Cooney, Chief of Staff at the White House Council on Environmental Quality (CEQ), 
offering  to  help  manage  this  ‘‘crisis’’  and  help  ‘‘cool  things  down.’’  (This  document 
was  obtained  by  a  nongovernmental  organization  via  a  Freedom  of  Information  Act 
request). In the e-mail to Cooney, Ebell said: ‘‘If it were only this one little disaster 
we  could  all  lock  arms  and  weather  the  assault,  but  this  Administration  has  man-
aged,  whether  through  incompetence  or  intention,  to  create  one  disaster  after  an-
other and then to expect its allies to clean up the mess.’’ He told Cooney the Admin-
istration  needed  to  get  back  on  track  with  disavowals  of  the  Climate  Action  Report 
and the National Assessment. Shortly thereafter, Cooney began to play a more visi-
ble  role  in  Climate  Change  Science  Program  governance  as  the  CEQ  liaison  to  the 
interagency  principals  committee,  and  in  intervening  to  manage  and  edit  Climate 
Change Science Program communications. 

Immediately  prior  to  taking  the  position  of  CEQ  Chief  of  Staff,  Cooney  had  been 
employed  as  a  lawyer-lobbyist  at  the  American  Petroleum  Institute  (API),  the  pri-
mary  trade  association  for  corporations  associated  with  the  petroleum  industry.  He 
was  the  climate  team  leader  at  API,  leading  the  oil  industry’s  fight  against  limits 
on  greenhouse  gas  emissions.  CEI  also  had  a  close  relationship  with  the  oil  indus-
try,  having  reportedly  received  $2  million  in  funding  between  1998  and  2005  from 
ExxonMobil. 

In July 2003 the program issued its Strategic Plan for the Climate Change Science 
Program.  The  document  was  submitted  to  Congress  under  the  signatures  of  Sec-
retary  of  Energy  Spencer  Abraham,  Secretary  of  Commerce  Donald  L.  Evans,  and 
Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  Director  John  H.  Marburger.  In  the  plan, 
the  existence  of  the  National  Assessment  was  mentioned  only  in  a  single  sentence, 
which  did  not  even  include  the  title  of  the  report.  There  was  no  description  of  the 
structure, process, scope, purpose, or contents of the National Assessment. The Na-
tional  Assessment  did  not  appear  in  the  bibliography  of  the  plan.  No  information 
was  given  to  suggest  how  copies  might  be  obtained.  In  effect,  mention  of  the  Na-
tional  Assessment  had  almost  completely  vanished  from  the  CCSP  Strategic  Plan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

National Research Council’s Criticism of the CCSP on the National Assessment 

The final report of the National Research Council’s Committee to Review the U.S. 
Climate  Change  Research  Program  Strategic  Plan,  issued  in  February  2004,  was 
critical  of  the  failure  of  the  program  to  incorporate  and  build  on  the  National  As-
sessment  in  its  Strategic  Plan  for  assessment  and  ‘‘decision  support’’  activities.  On 
the subject of the National Assessment’s scientific credibility the report said: 

It  is  especially  important  that  CCSP  synthesis  and  assessment  products  be 
independently prepared, or evaluated, by the science community. This will pro-
vide  a  level  of  credibility  that  reports  produced  exclusively  within  the  govern-
ment sometimes fail to achieve. The only previous centralized assessment effort 
by  the  CCSP  agencies,  the  U.S.  National  Assessment  on  the  Potential  Con-
sequences  of  Climate  Variability  and  Change,  followed  these  credibility  assur-
ance  guidelines.  The  National  Assessment’s  Overview  and  Foundation  reports 
are  important  contributions  to  understanding  the  possible  consequences  of  cli-
mate variability and change. (National Research Council, Committee to Review 
the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  Strategic  Plan,  Implementing  Cli-
mate  and  Global  Change  Research:  A  Review  of  the  Final  U.S.  Climate  Change 
Science Program Strategic Plan (National Academies Press, 2004, p.13). 

On  the  value  of  the  National  Assessment’s  process  of  engaging  scientists  and 

‘‘stakeholders’’ in dialogue, the NRC review said: 

The  processes  of  stakeholder  engagement  and  transparent  review  of  the  Na-
tional Assessment reports were exemplary. . . . The Strategic Plan . . . should 
more  effectively  buildupon  a  growing  capability  within  the  U.S.  climate  and 
global  change  research  community  to  interact  with  potential  users  of  climate 
and  global  change  science,  as  was  demonstrated  in  the  U.S.  National  Assess-
ment  of  the  Potential  Consequences  of  Climate  Variability  and  Change  (NAST, 
2001).  The  revised  plan  generally  overlooks  the  insights  and  relationships  that 
were developed by the National Assessment . . . (pp. 13–14). 

On  the  significance  of  the  regional-scale  assessments  included  as  part  of  the  Na-

tional Assessment, the NRC review said: 

The  plan  also  does  not  include  areas  of  research  relevant  to  regional-scale  as-
sessments  identified  as  a  result  of  the  National  Assessment.  . . .  This  defi-
ciency  needs  to  be  remedied  quickly  so  that  the  program’s  decision  support  ac-
tivities  reflect  what  the  scientific  community  now  knows,  what  it  can  accom-
plish, and what users would like to know (p. 14). 

On  the  Administration’s  apparent  refusal  to  provide  any  scientific  rationale  for 
the  disappearance  of  any  acknowledgement  of  the  National  Assessment,  the  NRC 
review said: 

For  the  most  part  the  CCSP’s  revisions  to  the  Strategic  Plan  are  quite  respon-
sive to comments expressed at the workshop, in written input, and by this Com-
mittee. One notable exception is the fact that the revised plan does not acknowl-
edge  the  substantive  and  procedural  contributions  of  the  U.S.  National  Assess-
ment  of  the  Potential  Consequences  of  Climate  Variability  and  Change  (NAST, 
2001), a major focus of the Global Change Research Program (GCRP) in the late 
1990s.  Many  participants  at  the  [CCSP]  December  [2002]  workshop  criticized 
how the draft Strategic Plan treated the National Assessment, as did this Com-
mittee in its first report. The revised plan does not reflect an attempt to address 
these  concerns,  and  no  rationale  for  this  decision  has  been  provided.  (pp.  29– 
30). 

Although  OSTP  Director  John  Marburger  has  referred  to  the  National  Academy 
of Sciences as the ‘‘gold standard’’ of scientific advice to the government, and despite 
the  criticism  of  the  plan  for  failing  to  provide  any  rationale  for  the  disappearance 
of the National Assessment, Dr. Marburger, then-CCSP Director James R. Mahoney, 
and other Administration officials and CCSP leaders offered no response to this crit-
icism  of  how  they  treated  the  National  Assessment.  No  changes  were  made  to  the 
Strategic Plan in response to the NRC’s criticism. It appeared to me that something 
akin  to  a  conspiracy  of  silence  was  being  enforced  within  the  Federal  Government, 
which had nothing to do with the scientific merits of the National Assessment. 
The Role of the Council on Environmental Quality 

The  Administration,  without  ever  clarifying  the  issue  forthrightly,  has  allowed  a 
perception to persist that the suppression of the National Assessment was required 
by  a  legal  agreement  pursuant  to  a  joint  stipulation  to  dismissal  of  a  2001  lawsuit 
filed  by  the  Competitive  Enterprise  Institute  et  al.,  seeking  to  halt  the  distribution 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

of the National Assessment. White House and Climate Change Science Program offi-
cials  have  never  offered  an  honest  public  explanation  of  why  the  terms  of  that  dis-
missal  would  have  legally  required  (as  distinct  from  an  unofficial,  secret  political 
agreement)  that  the  White  House  and  the  Federal  agencies  suppress  a  taxpayer- 
funded,  scientifically  based  assessment  sponsored  by  the  Federal  global  change  re-
search program, even for purposes of using it as a scientific document or in program 
planning for research and future assessments. 

I have examined the official court records on lawsuits filed by CEI et al., in 2001 
and  2003  and  find  no  basis  for  such  suppression.  Rather,  it  appears  that,  although 
the CEI lawsuits were dismissed, the Administration decided nevertheless to award 
what I have termed the global warming denial machine a political victory that they 
could  not  have  won  had  their  lawsuits  gone  to  trial.  Myron  Ebell  of  CEI  has  been 
quoted  as  saying  of  the  National  Assessment,  ‘‘To  the  degree  that  it  has  vanished, 
we have succeeded’’ (Greenwire, October 3, 2006). 

It  is  my  understanding  that  the  White  House  directed  CCSP  Director  Mahoney 
to  suppress  the  use  of  and  references  to  the  National  Assessment  in  program  plan-
ning  and  publications.  It  is  my  understanding  that  this  directive  was  likely  given 
by Philip Cooney at CEQ, acting as an agent of CEQ Chairman James Connaughton 
and, by extension, the White House policy and political apparatus. One of the CCSP 
agency principals informed me that a subsequent directive to the agencies to refrain 
from  referencing  the  National  Assessment  had  come  from  Mahoney’s  office. 
Mahoney  later  confirmed  to  Environmental  Science  &  Technology,  a  journal  of  the 
American Chemical Society, that Federal researchers were restricted from referring 
to  the  National  Assessment  (Environmental  Science  &  Technology  Online,  October 
12, 2005). 

Unlike  the  other  representatives  on  the  program’s  interagency  principals  com-
mittee,  the  great  majority  of  whom  were  career  science  program  management  pro-
fessionals,  CCSP  Director  Mahoney  was  a  Senate-confirmed  Presidential  appointee, 
as the Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Oceans and Atmosphere and Deputy Ad-
ministrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, and thus a po-
litical representative of the Administration. On the matter of not citing or using the 
National Assessment, I believe it was well-understood by the agency principals that 
to  challenge  the  Chairman  would,  in  effect,  have  been  to  challenge  the  White 
House—in particular CEQ. 

Building  appropriately  on  the  pioneering  work  of  the  National  Assessment  could 
have  had  a  salutary  influence  on  developing  the  priorities  of  the  CCSP  Strategic 
Plan and surely would have led the program toward a different overall configuration 
of  follow-up  scientific  and  assessment  priorities.  It  could  have  led  to  a  different  ap-
proach  to  evolving  the  discourse  between  scientists  and  users  of  information—a 
freer  relationship  and  one  less  constrained  than  is  the  current  process  by  political 
gatekeepers  concerned  with  controlling  the  flow  of  communications  about  climate 
change and its implications for the United States. 
2.  The  Administration  Has  Acted  in  a  Variety  of  Ways  To  Impede  and 
Manipulate  Communication  About  Climate  Change  by  Federal 
Scientists  and  Career  Science  Program  Leaders  to  Wider  Audiences, 
Including Congress and the Media 

The ability of our society and public officials to make good decisions about impor-
tant  issues  depends  on  a  free,  honest,  and  accurate  flow  of  scientific  research  and 
findings.  Unfortunately,  the  Administration  and  industry-funded  special  interest 
groups  have  acted  to  impede  and  manipulate  essential  communication  about  global 
climate  change  and  its  implications  for  society  and  the  environment.  The  many  cli-
mate  scientists  in  the  employ  of  the  Federal  Government  represent  a  tremendous 
resource.  Their  knowledge  and  advice  should  be  heeded,  rather  than  manipulated 
or ignored. Without strong action to protect and restore integrity of Federal climate 
science  communication,  our  Nation  will  be  ill-prepared  to  deal  with  the  challenge 
of global climate change. 
Atmosphere  of  Pressure:  The  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists—Government  Account-

ability Project Joint Report 

On January 30, 2007, the Union of Concerned Scientists and the Government Ac-
countability Project 3 released their joint report, Atmosphere of Pressure: Political In-

3 The  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists  is  the  leading  scinece-based  nonprofit  working  for  a 
healthy  environment  and  a  safer  world.  The  UCS  Scientific  Integrity  Program  mobilizes  sci-
entists  and  citizens  alike  to  defend  science  from  political  interference  and  restore  scientific  in-
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

terference  in  Federal  Climate  Science.  The  Atmosphere  of  Pressure  study  found  that 
150  Federal  climate  scientists  report  personally  experiencing  at  least  one  incident 
of political interference in the past 5 years, for a total of at least 435 such incidents. 
I have transmitted the report to the Committee as a supplement to my written testi-
mony. * 

As a part of this study, UCS sent surveys to 1,600 climate scientists at seven Fed-
eral  agencies  and  departments,  to  gauge  the  extent  to  which  politics  was  playing 
a  role  in  scientists’  research.  279  scientists  responded  to  the  survey.  At  the  same 
time,  GAP  conducted  40  in-depth  interviews  with  Federal  climate  scientists  and 
other  officials  and  analyzed  thousands  of  pages  of  government  documents,  obtained 
through the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) and inside sources, regarding agen-
cy media policies and Congressional communications. 

These  two  complementary  investigations  arrived  at  similar  conclusions  regarding 
the state of Federal climate research and the need for strong policies to protect the 
integrity of science and the free flow of scientific information. The following is taken 
from the Executive Summary of the UCS–GAP joint report: 
Political Interference With Climate Science 

The  Federal  Government  needs  accurate  scientific  information  to  craft  effective 
policies. Political interference with the work of Federal scientists threatens the qual-
ity  and  integrity  of  these  policies.  As  such,  no  scientist  should  ever  encounter  any 
of  the  various  types  of  political  interference  described  in  our  survey  questions.  Yet 
unacceptably large numbers of Federal climate scientists personally experienced in-
stances of interference over the past 5 years: 

during review that changed the meaning of scientific findings. 

ments by officials at their agencies that misrepresented scientists’ findings. 

• Nearly  half  of  all  respondents  (46  percent  of  all  respondents  to  the  question) 
perceived  or  personally  experienced  pressure  to  eliminate  the  words  ‘‘climate 
change,’’ ‘‘global warming’’ or other similar terms from a variety of communica-
tions. 
• Two  in  five  (43  percent)  perceived  or  personally  experienced  changes  or  edits 
• More  than  one-third  (37  percent)  perceived  or  personally  experienced  state-
• Nearly  two  in  five  (38  percent)  perceived  or  personally  experienced  the  dis-
appearance  or  unusual  delay  of  websites,  reports,  or  other  science-based  mate-
rials relating to climate. 
• Nearly half (46 percent) perceived or personally experienced new or unusual ad-
• One-quarter  (25  percent)  perceived  or  personally  experienced  situations  in 
which scientists have actively objected to, resigned from, or removed themselves 
from a project because of pressure to change scientific findings. 
• Asked  to  quantify  the  number  of  incidents  of  interference  of  all  types,  150  sci-
entists (58 percent) said they had personally experienced one or more such inci-
dents  within  the  past  5  years,  for  a  total  of  at  least  435  incidents  of  political 
interference. 

ministrative requirements that impair climate-related work. 

The  more  frequently  a  climate  scientist’s  work  touches  on  sensitive  or  controver-
sial  issues,  the  more  interference  he  or  she  reported.  More  than  three-quarters  (78 
percent)  of  those  survey  respondents  who  self-reported  that  their  research  ‘‘always’’ 
or ‘‘frequently’’ touches on issues that could be considered sensitive or controversial 
also reported they had personally experienced at least one incident of inappropriate 
interference. More than one-quarter (27 percent) of this same group had experienced 
six or more such incidents in the past 5 years. 
Barriers to Communication 

Federal  scientists  have  a  constitutional  right  to  speak  about  their  scientific  re-
search,  and  the  American  public  has  a  right  to  be  informed  of  the  findings  of  tax-
payer-supported  research.  Restrictions  on  scientists  who  report  findings  contrary  to 
an administration’s preferred policies undermine these basic rights. These practices 

tegrity  in  Federal  policymaking.  More  information  about  UCS  and  the  Scientific  Integrity  Pro-
gram is available online at www.ucsusa.org/scientificlintegrity. 

The Government Accountability Project (GAP) is the Nation’s largest whistleblower organiza-
tion. GAP attorneys and organizers assist whistleblowers in taking their evidence of wrongdoing 
to appropriate government agencies, committees, and officials to investigate, expose, and rectify 
the  problems  they  have  identified.  More  information  about  GAP  is  available  online  at 
www.whistleblower.org. 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

also contribute to a general misunderstanding of the findings of climate science and 
degrade  our  government’s  ability  to  make  effective  policies  on  topics  ranging  from 
public health to agriculture to disaster preparation. 

The  investigation  uncovered  numerous  examples  of  public  affairs  officers  at  Fed-
eral  agencies  taking  a  highly  active  role  in  regulating  communications  between 
agency scientists and the media—in effect serving as gatekeepers for scientific infor-
mation. 

Among the examples taken from interviews and FOIA documents: 
• One  agency  scientist,  whose  research  illustrates  a  possible  connection  between 
hurricanes  and  global  warming,  was  repeatedly  barred  from  speaking  to  the 
media.  Press  inquiries  on  the  subject  were  routed  to  another  scientist  whose 
views more closely matched official Administration policy. 
• Government  scientists  routinely  encounter  difficulty  in  obtaining  approval  for 
official  press  releases  that  highlight  research  into  the  causes  and  consequences 
of global warming. 
• Scientists  report  that  public  affairs  officers  are  sometimes  present  at  or  listen 
• Both  scientists  and  journalists  report  that  restrictive  media  policies  and  prac-
tices  have  had  the  effect  of  slowing  down  the  process  by  which  interview  re-
quests  are  approved.  As  a  result,  the  number  of  contacts  between  government 
scientists and the news media has been greatly reduced. 

in on interviews between certain scientists and the media. 

Highly  publicized  incidents  of  interference  have  led  at  least  one  agency  to  imple-
ment reforms; in February 2006, NASA adopted a scientific openness policy that af-
firms  the  right  of  open  scientific  communication.  Perhaps  as  a  result,  61  percent  of 
NASA  survey  respondents  said  recent  policies  affirming  scientific  openness  at  their 
agency  have  improved  the  environment  for  climate  research.  While  imperfect,  the 
new NASA media policy stands as a model for the type of action other Federal agen-
cies should take in reforming their media policies. 

The  investigation  also  highlighted  problems  with  the  process  by  which  scientific 
findings  are  communicated  to  policymakers  in  Congress.  One  example,  taken  from 
internal  documents  provided  to  GAP  by  agency  staff,  shows  edits  to  official  ques-
tions  for  the  record  by  political  appointees,  which  change  the  meaning  of  the  sci-
entific findings being presented. 
Inadequate Funding 

When  adjusted  for  inflation,  funding  for  Federal  climate  science  research  has  de-
clined since the mid-1990s. A majority of survey respondents disagreed that the gov-
ernment  has  done  a  good  job  funding  climate  science,  and  a  large  number  of  sci-
entists  warned  that  inadequate  levels  of  funding  are  harming  the  capacity  of  re-
searchers  to  make  progress  in  understanding  the  causes  and  effects  of  climate 
change.  Budget  cuts  that  have  forced  the  cancellation  of  crucial  Earth  observation 
satellite programs were of particular concern to respondents. 
Poor Morale 

Morale  among  Federal  climate  scientists  is  generally  poor.  The  UCS  survey  re-
sults  suggest  a  correlation  between  the  deterioration  in  morale  and  the  politicized 
environment  surrounding  Federal  climate  science  in  the  present  Administration. 
One  primary  danger  of  low  morale  and  decreased  funding  is  that  Federal  agencies 
may have more difficulty attracting and keeping the best scientists. 

A  large  number  of  respondents  reported  decreasing  job  satisfaction  and  a  wors-

ening environment for climate science in Federal agencies: 

• Two-thirds  of  respondents  said  that  today’s  environment  for  Federal  Govern-
ment  climate  research  is  worse  compared  with  5  years  ago  (67  percent)  and  10 
years  ago  (64  percent).  Among  scientists  at  NASA,  these  numbers  were  higher 
(79 percent and 77 percent, respectively). 

A Case Study of Political Interference From My Experience 

I worked on many projects during the 10 years I served in the program office. One 
key  ongoing  project  for  which  I  was  responsible  involved  coordinating  the  develop-
ment  of  and  editing  nine  editions  of  the  program’s  annual  report  to  Congress,  Our 
Changing Planet. The report is distributed to all Members of Congress and all Con-
gressional committees and subcommittees with relevant oversight or budget jurisdic-
tion.  The  report  also  is  distributed  more  widely  and  is  one  of  the  principal  means 
by  which  information  about  the  highlights  of  recent  research  and  research  plans  of 
the Federal program as a government-wide entity is communicated. I also provided 
senior  advisory  and  editorial  support  on  a  number  of  aspects  of  the  development  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

the  Strategic  Plan  for  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  issued  in  July 
2003 and distributed to Congress and more widely in both print and electronic form. 
In  developing  program  publications  and  on  other  matters,  I  worked  with  a  large 
network  of  career  science  program  managers  in  the  participating  agencies.  In  pro-
ducing  a  particular  edition  of  the  Our  Changing  Planet  report,  I  would  work  with 
as many as 90 individual contributors, spanning as many as 13 participating agen-
cies,  to  solicit,  coordinate,  and  edit  their  submissions  and  review  comments  into  a 
completed, integrated document. Before being issued, this report had to be reviewed 
and  approved,  first  by  career  science  program  managers  in  all  participating  agen-
cies, then by Administration officials in the Executive Office of the President (EOP), 
including OSTP, OMB, and CEQ. 

Starting  in  October  2002,  in  this  final-stage  editorial  review  and  clearance  proc-
ess, it came to my attention that CEQ Chief of Staff Philip Cooney was extensively 
marking  up  reports  in  a  manner  that  had  the  cumulative  effect  of  adding  an  en-
hanced sense of scientific uncertainty about global warming and minimizing its like-
ly  consequences,  while  also  deleting  even  minor  references  to  the  National  Assess-
ment. 

For  example,  in  a  memorandum  dated  October  28,  2002,  he  marked-up  the  first 
draft  of  the  CCSP  Strategic  Plan  after  it  was  approved  by  CCSP  agency  principals 
and before it was released for NRC review and public comment. Most of his roughly 
200 text changes were incorporated in the review draft. A number of these changes 
in  text  relating  to  questions  of  climate  science  altered  the  content  of  the  draft  as 
it had been developed by Federal science program professionals. Taken in the aggre-
gate,  the  changes  had  a  cumulative  effect  of  shifting  the  tone  and  content  of  an  al-
ready quite cautiously-worded draft to create an enhanced sense of scientific uncer-
tainty  about  climate  change  and  its  implications.  The  draft  Strategic  Plan  was  le-
gitimately criticized by reviewers who charged that the CCSP had adopted a vocabu-
lary with an exaggerated emphasis on scientific uncertainties. To my knowledge this 
CEQ  mark-up  was  not  shared  with  or  vetted  by  CCSP  principals  or  CCSP  agency 
science  program  managers.  The  process  was  quintessentially  non-transparent  and, 
in my view, a policy-driven political interference in a key science program document. 
As another example, the CEQ Chief of Staff made about 100 revisions to the final 
draft of the FY 2003 Our Changing Planet, some of which substantially changed or 
deleted text relating, for example, to decision support on mitigation and adaptation 
options, integration of climate science with comparative analysis of response strate-
gies, ongoing regional assessments of global change consequences, and the relation-
ship between energy-related emissions, climate change, and ecosystem impacts. 

I could give additional examples, but I will conclude with a few summary observa-

tions about this process: 

(a)  From  my  observation,  a  few  examples  of  relatively  heavy-handed  interven-
tions  sufficed  to  send  a  message  to  the  program  leadership  about  White  House 
political  sensitivities.  Under  those  circumstances,  I  believe  a  kind  of  antici-
patory  self-censorship  kicks  in,  and  reports  begin  to  be  drafted  with  an  eye  to 
what will be able to obtain CEQ approval—which appeared to be the final step 
in the White House clearance process. 
(b)  Although  this  matter  has  received  a  good  deal  of  media  and  political  atten-
tion,  I  have  always  regarded  it  as  essentially  a  single  graphic  case  study  illus-
tration  of  a  much  larger  pattern  of  Administration  interference  with  and  spin-
ning  of  climate  change  science  communication.  I  believe  it  is  an  indicative  and 
revealing case study, but I believe we should focus primarily on the larger pat-
tern  and  take  steps  to  correct  a  whole  set  of  problems.  The  former  CEQ  Chief 
of  Staff  has  moved  on  to  a  position  with  ExxonMobil,  but  rearranging  the  deck 
chairs  does  not  make  the  problems  go  away  and,  as  part  of  his  legacy,  the  Na-
tional Assessment he played a role in suppressing remains suppressed. 
(c)  It  has  been  suggested  by  some  critics  that,  since  neither  I  nor  Cooney  is  a 
scientist,  this  issue  is  simply  a  matter  of  competing  editorial  viewpoints.  I  be-
lieve this view betrays a fundamental misunderstanding of the problem, calling 
for  some  clarification.  My  job  was  to  work  closely  with  career  science  profes-
sionals  to  communicate  climate  research  information  clearly  and  accurately  in 
such a way that it would be readily understandable and of value to general at-
tentive  readers  such  as  those  in  Congressional  offices.  There  was  no  political 
agenda  other  than  to  encourage  a  bipartisan  appreciation  for  the  value  of  this 
national  research  program.  The  science  professionals  I  worked  with  will  attest 
to  the  appropriateness  of  my  role,  the  integrity  with  which  I  played  it,  and  my 
grasp of the subject matter, as will the fact that I was asked to continue in this 
role  throughout  my  tenure  with  the  program.  I  was  aligned  with  and  account-
able  to  the  mainstream  climate  science  community  every  step  of  the  way.  CEQ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

was  not.  What  CEQ  was  doing  with  its  interventions  was  something  quite  dif-
ferent,  and  in  my  view  of  clearly  questionable  legitimacy.  I  see  that  as  the  es-
sential difference in our roles. 

3. The Administration Has Cut the Climate Change Research Budget to its 
Lowest  Level  Since  1992  and  Is  Presiding  Over  What  Appears  To  Be  a 
Growing  Crisis  in  the  Global  Climate  Observing  System,  Thus 
Undermining a Critical National Intelligence-Gathering Process 

Funding  for  climate  and  global  change  research  under  the  Global  Change  Re-
search  Program  (FY  1989–FY  2002)  and  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (FY 
2003–present) is shown in the table on the following page, which is taken from the 
CCSP website. The table shows that, in real terms, funding is currently at the low-
est level since 1992. 

The President’s FY 2007 budget request for the CCSP was 26 percent less than the 
program’s budget in 1995, the high-water mark. The FY 2007 request was 13 percent 
less than the program’s budget in FY 2001, the last budget before the current Admin-
istration took office. 

The  Administration’s  response  to  criticism  on  climate  change  is  often  to  point  to 
how  much  is  spent  on  research.  The  Climate  Change  Science  Program  is  indeed  a 
large program, with a budget that supports a wide range of both governmental and 
nongovernmental  scientific  research,  as  well  as  climate  observing  systems,  in  par-
ticular  NASA’s  space-based  remote-sensing  observing  system.  But,  notwithstanding 
the importance that Administration officials purport to give to the issues addressed 
by the program, the Administration is now steadily reducing the budget request for 
the program. Why? 

A review of the CCSP budget tables as presented in the FY 2006 and FY 2007 edi-
tions  of  Our  Changing  Planet  indicates  generally  that  the  steady  cuts  in  the  overall 
CCSP  budget  from  FY  2004  onward  are  almost  entirely  attributable  to  cuts  in  the 
NASA Earth Science research and observations budget. The NASA budget figures as 
arrayed in Our Changing Planet during the past several years are difficult to inter-
pret in any detail, nor is the discussion in the report of NASA’s program at all illu-
minating about the reasons for and implications of the cutbacks in NASA’s program, 
nor  about  how  these  cutbacks  are  allocated  across  specific  clearly  identifiable  pro-
gram activities. However, the report says that, from FY 2005 to the FY 2007 request, 
NASA’s  CCSP  budget  was  cut  by  17  percent,  from  $1.241  billion  to  $1.029  billion. 
(The  inflation-adjusted  cut  would  be  greater.)  This  includes  a  13  percent  cut  in  the 
‘‘Scientific Research’’ portion of the budget, and a 20 percent cut in ‘‘Space-Based Ob-
servations.’’ 

Funding for Global Change Research under the CCSP and USGCRP, 

Fiscal Years 1989–2007 (dollars in millions) * 

Past, present and future budget data are key components of the information transmitted to Congress in 
Our  Changing  Planet.  This  table  shows  the  evolution  of  funding  for  the  program  since  1989. 
Note  that  the  scope  of  activities  included  within  the  budget  is  not  constant  over  the  period.  In  some 
cases  (as  in  1989–1990),  a  substantial  portion  of  the  year-to-year  budget  change  results  from  shifting 
activities  into  or  out  of  the  program.  These  changes  in  program  definition  are  the  result  of  changing  sci-
entific priorities and other factors. 

Fiscal Year 

Actual 
dollars 

Constant (2005) 

dollars 

1989 
1990 
1991 
1992 
1993 
1994 
1995 
1996 
1997 
1998 
1999 
2000 
2001 
2002 
2003 
2004 

134 
659 
954 
1,110 
1,326 
1,444 
1,760 
1,654 
1,656 
1,677 
1,657 
1,687 
1,728 
1,667 
1,766 
1,977 

209 
975 
1,355 
1,531 
1,775 
1,885 
2,234 
2,039 
1,995 
1,989 
1,925 
1,896 
1,886 
1,792 
1,857 
2,023 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Funding for Global Change Research under the CCSP and USGCRP, 

Fiscal Years 1989–2007 (dollars in millions) *—Continued 

Past, present and future budget data are key components of the information transmitted to Congress in 
Our  Changing  Planet.  This  table  shows  the  evolution  of  funding  for  the  program  since  1989. 
Note  that  the  scope  of  activities  included  within  the  budget  is  not  constant  over  the  period.  In  some 
cases  (as  in  1989–1990),  a  substantial  portion  of  the  year-to-year  budget  change  results  from  shifting 
activities  into  or  out  of  the  program.  These  changes  in  program  definition  are  the  result  of  changing  sci-
entific priorities and other factors. 

Fiscal Year 

2005 

2006 (estimate) 
2007 (request) 

Actual 
dollars 

Constant (2005) 

dollars 

1,865 
1,709 
1,715 

1,865 
1,674 
1,643 

* The  table  is  posted  on  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program  website  at:  http://www.climatescience.gov/ 

infosheets/highlight2/default.htm#funding. The table was updated November 2006. 

Without going into further detail in this written testimony, I suggest that this ex-
traordinary  scaling  back  of  the  Administration’s  commitment  to  a  strong  Earth 
Science  research  and  observations  program  at  NASA  has  very  serious  implications 
for  the  strength  of  the  Nation’s  climate  change  science  capability.  The  Administra-
tion  must  be  held  accountable  for  this  indirect  method  of  undermining  the  ability 
to understand, assess, and communicate what is happening with climate and associ-
ated  global  change—especially  if  we  also  take  into  consideration  the  extraordinary 
and  disturbing  developments  with  the  NPOESS  next-generation  weather-climate 
satellite  system  that  are  taking  place  on  the  watch  of  Administration  officials  at 
DOD, NOAA, and NASA. 
The NPOESS Crisis 

The  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 
(NPOESS)  was  created  by  a  Presidential  Decision  Directive  in  1994,  under  which 
the  military  and  civil  meteorological  programs  were  merged  into  a  single  program. 
NPOESS was intended as an operational system to provide state-of-the art data for 
weather  forecasting  and  climate  system  monitoring.  Within  NPOESS,  NOAA  is  re-
sponsible  for  satellite  operations,  the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  is  responsible 
for  major  acquisitions,  and  NASA  is  responsible  for  the  development  and  infusion 
of new technologies. 

To  continue  climate-quality  measurements  beyond  the  first  series  of  NASA’s 
Earth Observing System (EOS) research satellites (NASA is not developing a second 
series of EOS satellites), it was assumed that the NPOESS system would continue, 
in  an  operational  environment,  the  mature  EOS  measurements,  many  of  which  ad-
dress the Nation’s climate monitoring needs. 

NPOESS,  as  originally  configured,  would  have  represented  a  significant  step  for-
ward  in  the  Nation’s  ability  to  deploy  a  comprehensive  climate  observing  system. 
Many key climate variables would be measured for decades. However, cost estimates 
for  the  program  skyrocketed  from  $6.5  billion  to  $10  billion  and  the  scheduled 
launch of its first satellite slipped from May 2006 to at least April 2008—a gap that 
the Government Accountability Office concluded could leave the United States with 
gaps in vital climate and weather forecasting data. 

As  a  result  of  the  massive  cost  overrun,  NPOESS  was  subjected  to  a  statutorily 
required  re-scoping  in  2006.  During  the  re-scoping  process,  ground  rules  endorsed 
by  the  NPOESS  Executive  Committee  stipulated  that  a  higher  priority  would  be 
placed  on  the  continuity  of  operational  capabilities  in  support  of  weather  measure-
ments, which resulted in a lower priority for climate-focused measurements. The Of-
fice  of  the  Secretary  of  Defense  (OSD)  led  a  tri-agency  process  culminating  in  the 
certification  of  a  restructured  NPOESS  Program  on  June  5,  2006.  The  result  was 
a  decision  to  reduce  the  overall  number  of  satellites  and  eliminate  climate  sensors 
from the system. 

Climate  Science  Watch  has  obtained  a  December  11,  2006,  joint  document  pre-
pared  by  the  NASA  Earth  Science  Division  and  the  NOAA  Climate  Observations 
and  Analysis  Program  that  describes  the  impacts  of  the  Nunn-McCurdy  Certifi-
cation of NPOESS on the climate program goals of NASA and NOAA. The document 
was developed at the direction of the Office of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP) 
as a result of a meeting on June 26, 2006. 

On  the  importance  of  a  continuous  climate-quality  data  record,  the  report  says: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

Detecting climate change, understanding the associated shifts in specific climate 
processes,  and  then  projecting  the  impacts  of  these  changes  on  the  Earth  sys-
tem requires a comprehensive set of consistent measurements made over many 
decades.  Many  climate  trends  are  small  and  require  careful  analysis  of  long 
time  series  of  sufficient  length,  consistency,  and  continuity  to  distinguish  be-
tween  the  natural  long-term  climate  variability  and  any  small,  persistent  cli-
mate  changes.  Interruptions  in  the  climate  data  records  make  the  resolution  of 
small  differences  uncertain  or  even  impossible  to  detect.  To  confidently  detect 
small  climate  shifts  requires  instrument  accuracy  and  stability  better  than  is 
generally required for weather research and most other scientific uses. For more 
than  thirty  years,  NASA  research-driven  missions,  such  as  the  EOS,  have  pio-
neered remote sensing observations of the Earth’s climate, including parameters 
such  as  solar  irradiance,  the  Earth’s  radiation  budget,  ozone  vertical  profiles, 
and  sea  surface  height.  Maintaining  these  measurements  in  an  operational  en-
vironment  provides  the  best  opportunity  for  maintaining  the  long-term,  con-
sistent, and continuous data records needed to understand, monitor, and predict 
climate variability and change. 

On  the  implications  of  losing  the  NPOESS  climate  sensors,  the  report  concludes: 
For NASA, NPOESS was not only a converged civilian and military weather ob-
serving  system  but  also  the  cornerstone  of  the  Nation’s  future  climate  research 
program.  For  NOAA,  NPOESS  represented  a  key  component  of  the  operational 
climate observing program and a cornerstone of its Climate Goal. . . . 
Unfortunately,  the  recent  loss  of  climate  sensors  due  to  the  NPOESS  Nunn- 
McCurdy Certification places the overall climate program in serious jeopardy. 
These shortfalls are characterized in a letter from the Chair of the Joint Science 
Committee from the World Climate Research Programme (WCRP) and from the 
Chair  of  the  Steering  Committee  from  the  Global  Climate  Observing  System 
(GCOS) to the Chair of the Committee on Earth Observation Satellites (CEOS). 
The Chairs from WCRP and GCOS stated: 

Some  of  the  difficulties  in  establishing  and  maintaining  climate  observations 
from  space  are  currently  being  highlighted  by  the  de-scoping  of  NPOESS,  in 
which  climate  observations  have  been  seriously  compromised.  . . .  [U]nless 
revised plans compensate for the anticipated shortcomings in climate observa-
tions,  gaps  in  several  key  climate  data  records  (some  that  go  back  almost  30 
years)  are  highly  likely.  . . .  WCRP  and  GCOS  assert  that  our  ability  to  ad-
dress  critical  climate  issues,  with  profound  societal  implications,  will  be 
strongly  limited  unless  observation  of  climate  variables  is  given  higher  pri-
ority. We urge that this be done. [emphasis added] 

The report contains joint NASA–NOAA recommendations as to how the impacted 
climate-related observations and related science might be recovered. However, there 
is  no  indication  as  to  the  projected  cost  of  even  a  partial  recovery  of  the  observing 
capability to be lost under the current re-scoping of NPOESS. Nor is there any indi-
cation  of  whether  the  Administration  will  request  the  funding  needed  in  order  to 
implement a recovery. 

Who  is  accountable  for  the  mismanagement  and  failure  of  leadership  of  this  es-
sential program? A May 2006 investigative report by the Commerce Department In-
spector General was sharply critical of high-level Federal management for failing to 
deal  effectively  with  the  long  delays  and  major  cost  overruns  in  the  development 
and deployment of NPOESS. 4 
Conclusions and Recommendations 
1. Revitalize the National Assessment Process 

Reports of a steady stream of scientific findings on global climate change, in par-
ticular  reports  on  observed  and  projected  consequences  of  global  warming,  have  in-
creased  the  level  of  concern  among  policymakers  and  the  public.  Debate  on  appro-
priate  climate  change  policy  and  response  strategies  at  the  international,  national, 
and state levels has also increased in urgency in the U.S. public arena. In this con-
text,  re-activating  the  National  Assessment  process  and  producing  a  second  Na-
tional Assessment report would make a major contribution to the Nation’s prepared-
ness for addressing the challenge of global warming and climate change. 

4 U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  Office  of  Inspector  General,  National  Oceanic  and  Atmos-
pheric  Administration—Poor  Management  Oversight  and  Ineffective  Incentives  Leave  NPOESS 
Program  Well  Over  Budget  and  Behind  Schedule.  Audit  Report  No.  OIG–17794–6–0001/May 
2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

The essential idea is not to replicate the 2000 National Assessment in its particu-
lars, but rather to move forward with a strong, updated, coordinated, integrative ef-
fort,  employing  the  method  of  having  climate  scientists  and  other  experts  commu-
nicate directly with policymakers and other stakeholders, geographical region-by-re-
gion,  and  socioeconomic  sector-by-sector,  to  diagnose  vulnerabilities  and  develop  re-
sponse  strategies,  without  political  interference  with  free  and  open  communication. 
Climate change impacts vary by region and sector, as do response strategy options. 
Every Member has an interest in the kind of information such an assessment could 
make available for consideration in developing national policy. 
2.  Address  the  Problems  of  the  Council  on  Environmental  Quality,  Agency  Media 

Policies, and Public Communication by the Climate Change Science Program 

On the White House Council on Environmental Quality 

The  UCS–GAP  report  does  not  substantially  address  the  higher  levels  in  the 
chain  of  command  that  has  resulted  in  political  interference  with  climate  science 
communication, starting with the President. In particular, the report does not focus 
on  the  role  of  the  Council  on  Environmental  Quality.  CEQ  is  a  White  House  policy 
office,  not  a  science  office.  In  my  view  it  was  problematic  from  day  one  that  CEQ 
officials, whose essential job was to advance the President’s policy and political posi-
tion on global climate change, were at the table participating directly in the govern-
ance of the Climate Change Science Program and shaping its communication of cli-
mate change research. In my judgment, CEQ should be put back on the policy side 
of the science-policy fence—as was the case under the previous Administration. And 
management of the CCSP should be back on the science side of the fence. 
On Agency Media Policies 

The Government Accountability Project has prepared a critical analysis of the new 
media  policy  developed  at  NASA  in  2006  in  the  wake  of  publicity  surrounding 
NASA’s scandalous attempt to muzzle public communication by Dr. James Hansen, 
Director  of  the  NASA  Goddard  Institute  of  Space  Studies.  While  the  NASA  media 
policy appears to be an improvement over the prior situation, GAP’s analysis raises 
concerns about agency media policies and identifies legislative action that the Com-
mittee  should  consider.  A  statement  and  memorandum  prepared  by  Tom  Devine, 
Legal Director at GAP, is included with this testimony as an Appendix. 
On Public Communication by the Climate Change Science Program 

Congressional  oversight  should  include  a  focus  on  the  Climate  Change  Science 
Program  and  the  CCSP  Office  as  well  as  the  agencies.  In  order  to  ensure  the  sci-
entific  independence  and  credibility  of  the  program  and  its  products,  the  CCSP 
should  develop  CCSP-wide  principles  and  policies  on  communications  to  ensure  the 
scientific independence of climate change science communications. 

Currently, there is no procedure under which the CCSP, or the CCSP Office, can 
communicate on behalf of the Federal climate research enterprise as a whole. Media 
inquiries  to  the  CCSP  are  channeled  to  the  NOAA  Public  Affairs  Office—an  office 
that,  as  discussed  in  the  UCS–GAP  report,  has  been  politically  compromised  in  its 
climate science communication by the Department of Commerce and by the Admin-
istration political appointees at the head of NOAA. One key example has been com-
munication  on  the  scientific  question  of  the  relationship  between  global  warming 
and increased hurricane intensity. 

Congress,  the  media,  and  the  public  need  to  be  able  to  receive  communications 
directly from the Climate Change Science Program that are not filtered through the 
public and governmental affairs offices of a single agency. One alternative would be 
to give the Climate Change Science Program Office the resources, staffing with sci-
entific  expertise,  and  freedom  from  White  House  political  manipulation,  to  commu-
nicate,  and  to  coordinate  communications,  on  behalf  of  the  full  range  of  scientific 
research supported by the CCSP participating agencies. 
3.  Implement  the  Recommendations  of  the  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists—Govern-

ment Accountability Project Report 

The  UCS–GAP  report,  Atmosphere  of  Pressure—Political  Interference  in  Federal 
Climate Science has brought to light numerous ways in which U.S. Federal climate 
science  has  been  filtered,  suppressed,  and  manipulated  in  the  last  5  years.  I  fully 
support  the  UCS  and  GAP  recommendations  of  the  following  reforms  and  actions: 
• Congress must act to specifically protect the rights of Federal scientists to con-
duct  their  work  and  communicate  their  findings  without  interference  and  pro-
tect  scientists  who  speak  out  when  they  see  interference  or  suppression  of 
science. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

• The  Federal  Government  must  respect  the  constitutional  right  of  scientists  to 
speak  about  any  subject,  including  policy-related  matters  and  those  outside 
their  area  of  expertise,  so  long  as  the  scientists  make  it  clear  that  they  do  so 
in  their  private  capacity.  Scientists  should  also  be  made  aware  of  these  rights 
and ensure they are exercised at their agencies. 
• Ultimate  decisions  about  the  communication  of  Federal  scientific  information 
should  lie  with  scientists  themselves.  While  non-scientists  may  be  helpful  with 
various  aspects  of  writing  and  communication,  scientists  must  have  a  ‘‘right  of 
last review’’ on agency communications related to their scientific research to en-
sure scientific accuracy has been maintained. 
• Pre-approval  and  monitoring  of  media  interviews  with  Federal  scientists  by 
public  affairs  officials  should  be  eliminated.  Scientists  should  not  be  subject  to 
restrictions  on  media  contacts  beyond  a  policy  of  informing  public  affairs  offi-
cials  in  advance  of  an  interview  and  summarizing  the  interaction  for  them 
afterwards. 
• Federal  agencies  should  clearly  support  the  free  exchange  of  scientific  informa-
tion  in  all  venues.  They  should  investigate  and  correct  inappropriate  policies, 
practices,  and  incidents  that  threaten  scientific  integrity,  determine  how  and 
why  problems  have  occurred,  and  make  the  necessary  reforms  to  prevent  fur-
ther incidents. 
• Congress should immediately exert pressure on the Executive Branch to comply 
with  its  statutory  duty  under  Federal  law  and  undertake  periodic  scientific  as-
sessments  of  climate  change  that  address  the  consequences  for  the  United 
States. (The last national assessment was conducted in 2000.) 
• Funding  decisions  regarding  climate  change  programs  should  be  guided  by  sci-
entific  criteria,  and  must  take  into  account  the  importance  of  long-term,  con-
tinual climate observation programs and models. 

• All branches of the government must have independent scientific advice. 

3.  End  the  Cutbacks  and  Restore  Support  for  Space-Based  Observations  and  Long- 

Term Monitoring of Essential Climate and Global Change Variables 

The  scaling  back  of  the  Administration’s  commitment  to  a  strong  Earth  Science 
research and observations program at NASA should be the subject of in-depth Con-
gressional  oversight.  The  Committee  should  investigate  the  implications  of  these 
cutbacks for the Nation’s climate change research capability and should seek to rec-
tify this situation with appropriate funding levels and program oversight. 

Congress should also hold Administration officials accountable for allowing essen-
tial  climate  sensors  to  be  dropped  from  NPOESS,  the  next-generation  DOD–NOAA 
environmental  satellite  system,  at  the  same  time  NASA  is  not  developing  a  next 
generation  of  its  Earth  Observing  System  satellites.  The  Committee’s  oversight 
should  include  investigation  of  recommendations  for  mitigation  of  the  crisis  that 
have  been  developed  under  the  guidance  of  the  NASA  Earth  Science  Division  and 
the NOAA Climate Observations and Analysis Program. 

In  each  case,  I  recommend  that  the  Committee  not  limit  itself  to  hearing  testi-
mony  from  Administration  political  appointees,  such  as  the  NASA  Administrator, 
the  NOAA  Administrator,  or  the  Director  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology 
Policy.  Officials  whose  primary  commitment  is  to  advance  White  House  policy  and 
political objectives will tend to put the best face on a bad situation and be less than 
fully  forthcoming  with  the  Committee  with  explanations  of  the  real  problems.  In-
stead,  I  recommend  that  the  Committee  hear  from  and  ask  the  tough  questions  of 
senior career officials with both programmatic and technical expertise, such as Jack 
Kaye  of  the  NASA  Earth  Science  Division  and  Thomas  Karl  of  the  NOAA  National 
Climatic Data Center. Hopefully they will feel free to tell you a straight story. 

APPENDIX 

NASA  and  other  agencies  have  trumpeted  new  media  policies  as  proof  of  their 
good  intentions  and  new-found  respect  both  for  scientific  freedom  and  freedom  of 
speech.  Indeed,  the  policies  have  appealing  rhetoric  that  can  help  change  bureau-
cratic  attitudes.  That  matters.  Depending  on  the  political  cycle,  the  rhetoric  could 
be sufficient to sustain an open environment within scientific agencies. 

Unfortunately,  the  policies’  fine  print  exposes  them  as  a  trap  that  could  be  used 
to fire, or potentially prosecute, almost any scientist if the political environment be-
comes hostile again. First let’s consider what’s in them. The Achilles’ heel is a loop-
hole  that  cancels  all  the  new  free  speech  rights  if  a  scientist  discloses  information 
in  new,  pseudo-classified,  hybrid  secrecy  categories.  These  categories,  with  new 
names  such  as  ‘‘Sensitive  but  Unclassified’’  or  ‘‘Sensitive  Security  Information,’’  do 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

not  purport  to  have  the  national  security  significance  of  classified  documents.  In 
fact,  they  are  just  new  names  for  longstanding  categories  like  ‘‘For  Official  Use 
Only,’’  that  primarily  are  secrecy  shields  of  convenience  for  virtually  any  informa-
tion  the  agency  wants  to  keep  off  the  market  of  public  discourse,  either  to  control 
timing or avoid embarrassment. Although the SBU or SSI brands can be issued ar-
bitrarily, the potential criminal liability can be even more severe than for genuinely 
classified information. 

Even  worse,  information  can  be  designated  as  SBU  or  SSI  after-the-fact.  For  ex-
ample,  one  GAP  air  marshal  client  has  been  fired  3  years  after-the-fact  for  dis-
closing Sensitive Security Information, even though it was not marked as restricted 
at  the  time.  The  whistleblower  was  challenging  a  security  breakdown,  and  his  dis-
sent  was  vindicated  as  the  agency  quickly  canceled  a  reckless  decision  when  it  be-
came  public.  Depending  on  the  next  election  results  or  other  factors  that  should  be 
irrelevant,  under  NASA’s  fraudulent  media  policy  reform,  every  NASA  scientist 
communicating  with  this  Committee  could  be  fired  several  years  from  now  for  dis-
closing Sensitive but Unclassified information. 

Not only is the policy disingenuous, it is illegal. It violates the Whistleblower Pro-
tection Act on its face, because that law only permits blanket restrictions on public 
speech if information is properly classified. 

Let’s  also  consider  what  the  policy  doesn’t  include.  The  Anti-Gag  Statute,  an  ap-
propriations  rider  passed  unanimously  by  Congress  for  the  last  18  years,  bans  any 
spending  to  implement  or  enforce  any  nondisclosure  policy,  form  or  agreement,  un-
less it also has an addendum with specific Congressional language that, in the event 
of  a  conflict  with  the  policy,  the  Whistleblower  Protection  Act  and  the  Lloyd- 
Lafollette Act protecting safe communications with Congress will supersede any con-
tradictory  language  and  prevail.  The  NASA  media  policy  does  not  contain  this  ad-
dendum. Any funds spent to implement and enforce it have been and will be illegal 
expenditures. 

There  is  no  possibility  that  this  was  a  good  faith  error.  GAP’s  legal  director  Tom 
Devine spent over an hour tutoring the NASA Office of General Counsel lawyer who 
wrote  the  phony  reform,  both  on  the  requirements  of  the  Whistleblower  Protection 
Act and the Anti-Gag Statute. The lawyer reassured GAP that he understood what 
those  laws  required.  But  NASA  issued  a  policy  that  is  a  custom  fit  for  violating 
these fundamental merit system and whistleblower rights for scientific freedom. The 
illegality is deliberate. 

Legislation co-sponsored in the last Congress by Representatives Waxman, Davis, 
and  Platts  and  marked  up  unanimously  in  committee  (H.R.  1317  and  H.R.  5112) 
directly  addresses  this  type  of  back-door  scientific  repression.  It  codifies  and  pro-
vides  a  remedy  for  the  Anti-Gag  Statute,  and  establishes  checks  and  balances  on 
the  currently-unrestrained  use  of  pseudo-classification  gag  orders.  The  media  pol-
icy’s  fine  print  illustrates  why  your  Committee  should  act  immediately  to  pass  this 
badly needed reform. The Committee also should have GAO audit how much money 
has been spent illegally to implement and enforce the NASA media policy. An April 
1, 2006, memorandum GAP prepared on the policy is attached. 

MEMORANDUM 

To: Climate Scientists 
From: Government Accountability Project 
Re: Analysis of NASA’s Recently Released Media Policy 
The  Government  Accountability  Project  (GAP)  is  issuing  advisory  comments  on 
NASA’s new media policy that it released yesterday, March 30. The new policy came 
in response to public outcry over NASA’s suppression of climate science research in-
consistent with the Bush Administration’s political agenda. NASA is touting the de-
velopment as a free-speech breakthrough for agency scientists. 

demonstrating official respect for scientific freedom. 

GAP identified the areas in which the new policy is an improvement: 
• NASA  Administrator  Michael  Griffin’s  reassuring  rhetoric  is  of  symbolic  value, 
• The  new  media  policy  does  not  cover  scientific  reports,  web  postings,  or  profes-
sional  dialogue  such  as  at  conferences,  allowing  scientists  to  share  information 
with  their  colleagues  without  going  through  public  affairs  political  appointees. 
• The  policy  officially  recognizes  the  free  speech  right  for  scientists  to  express 
their  ‘‘personal  views’’  when  they  make  clear  that  their  statements  are  not 
being made on behalf of NASA. 

However,  in  six  critical  areas  the  new  policy  falls  short  of  genuine  scientific  free-

dom and accountability, and potentially undermines the positive guarantees: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

• While  recognizing  the  existence  of  a  ‘‘personal  views’’  exception,  the  policy 
doesn’t  announce  the  circumstances  when  that  right  cancels  out  conflicting  re-
strictions,  which  are  phrased  in  absolute  terms  applying  to  contexts  such  as 
‘‘any  activities’’  with  significant  media  potential.  This  leaves  a  cloud  of  uncer-
tainty that translates into a chilling effect for scientists. 
• The  policy  fails  to  comply  with  the  legally-mandated  requirements  of  the  Anti- 
Gag  Statute  to  explicitly  include  notice  that  the  Whistleblower  Protection  Act 
and  Lloyd-Lafollette  Act  (for  Congressional  communications)  limit  and  super-
sede its restrictions. 
• The  policy  institutionalizes  prior  restraint  censorship  through  ‘‘review  and 
clearance  by  appropriate  officials’’  for  ‘‘all  NASA  employees’’  involved  in  ‘‘pre-
paring  and  issuing’’  public  information.  This  means  that  scientists  can  be 
censored and will need advance permission from the ‘‘appropriate’’ official before 
anything can be released. 
• The policy defies the WPA by requiring prior approval for all whistleblower dis-
closures  that  are  ‘‘Sensitive  But  Unclassified’’  (SBU).  The  legal  definition  of 
SBU is broad and vague, to the point that it can be interpreted to sweep in vir-
tually anything. The WPA only permits that restriction for classified documents 
or those whose public release is specifically banned by statute. 
• The policy bans employees’ free speech and WPA rights to make anonymous dis-
closures,  requiring  them  to  work  with  NASA  public  affairs  ‘‘prior  to  releasing 
information’’  or  ‘‘engaging  in  any  activities  or  events  that  have  the  potential  to 
generate significant media or public interest or inquiry.’’ 
• The policy gives NASA the power to control the timing of all disclosures, which 
means  scientists  can  be  gagged  until  the  information  is  dated  and  the  need  for 
the public to know about critical scientific findings has passed. 

In  December  of  last  year,  NASA  climatologist  Dr.  James  Hansen  was  threatened 
with ‘‘dire consequences’’ by a political appointee for statements he made about the 
consequences  of  climate  change.  According  to  GAP’s  legal  director,  Tom  Devine, 
‘‘Under  this  so-called  reform,  Dr.  Hansen  would  still  be  in  danger  of  ‘dire  con-
sequences’  for  sharing  his  research,  although  that  threat  is  what  sparked  the  new 
policy  in  the  first  place.  The  new  policy  violates  the  Whistleblower  Protection  Act, 
the  Anti-Gag  Statute,  and  the  law  protecting  communications  with  Congress,  the 
Lloyd-Lafollette Act. The loopholes are not innocent mistakes or oversights. GAP ex-
tensively  briefed  the  agency  lawyer  on  these  requirements,  who  insisted  he  under-
stood  them  fully.  NASA  is  intentionally  defying  the  good  government  anti-secrecy 
laws.’’ 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Piltz.  I’d  like  to  as-
sure  the  panel  that  all  of  your  prepared  statements  and  reports 
will be made part of the Committee’s record. And I can assure you 
that we will study them very carefully. 

And  now,  may  I  call  upon  the  Bren  Research  Professor,  Chem-
istry  and  Earth  System  Science,  School  of  Physical  Sciences,  Uni-
versity of California, Dr. F. Sherwood Rowland. 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  F.  SHERWOOD  ROWLAND,  PROFESSOR, 
CHEMISTRY  AND  EARTH  SYSTEM  SCIENCE,  SCHOOL  OF 
PHYSICAL SCIENCES, UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA, IRVINE 
Dr. ROWLAND. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’m  Sherwood  Rowland,  Professor  of  Chemistry  and  Earth  Sys-
tem  Science  at  the  University  of  California,  Irvine,  where  I  have 
been for more than 40 years. 

I first testified to the U.S. Congress in December 1974, in connec-
tion  with  the  study  published  that  year  with  Professor  Mario 
Molina  on  the  depletion  of  stratospheric  ozone  by  the  chlorofluoro-
carbon gases, then used worldwide as refrigerants and aerosol pro-
pellants. 

The  following  year,  the  same  gases  were  identified  as  being  po-
tent  greenhouse  gases,  despite  their  very  low  concentrations  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

Earth’s  atmosphere.  Three  years  later,  members  of  our  research 
laboratory  at  the  University  of  California  Irvine,  began  collecting 
ground-level  atmospheric  samples  in  widely  distributed  remote  lo-
cations  in  both  Northern  and  Southern  hemispheres,  to  monitor 
these rising, global CFC concentrations. 

When we extended our studies beyond the CFCs, we quickly dis-
covered that the concentrations of methane gas found in these sam-
ples  after  emission  from  rice  paddies,  swamps,  coal  mines,  cows 
and other sources, were also increasing. Because of the greenhouse 
gas significance of both CFCs and methane, we have continued now 
for  28  years,  with  financial  support  from  NASA,  to  monitor  these 
gases  in  atmospheric  samples  collected  quarterly  from  Northern 
Alaska, to Southern New Zealand. 

The  concentration  of  methane  gas  in  the  atmosphere  has  more 
than  doubled  since  1800,  as  shown  by  comparison  with  the  con-
centrations  found  in  air  bubbles  in  glacial  ice  cores.  This  growth 
has  made  methane  a  significant  contributor  to  global  greenhouse 
forcing  over  these  two  centuries,  second  only  to  gaseous  carbon  di-
oxide, in quantitative importance up to the present. 

In  our  continuing  analyses  of  atmospheric  composition,  we  now 
have  a  record,  more  than  a  decade  long,  in  both  hemispheres,  of 
the  concentrations  of  more  than  100  gaseous  molecules,  of  either 
natural  or  industrial  origin.  In  addition,  with  the  support  of  the 
Department  of  Energy  we  have  applied  the  identical  analytical 
techniques  to  the  same  set  of  atmospheric  gases  in  more  than  20 
U.S.,  and  many  foreign  cities,  and  to  the  U.S.  Southwest  as  a  re-
gion. 

These  data  are  very  pertinent  to  estimates  of  the  contributions 
of  tropospheric  ozone,  another  greenhouse  gas.  All  of  these  studies 
form a small part of the much larger scientific understanding of the 
greenhouse  effect,  global  warming,  and  the  accompanying  concern 
about  abrupt  climate  change.  This  background  of  participation  in 
the  atmospheric  science  community  has  meant  interactions  both 
within the science itself, and in its interfaces with the various gov-
ernmental organizations, and the general public. 

Beginning  in  1988,  the  global  scientific  understanding  of  these 
areas  began  to  be  organized  internationally  by  the  Intergovern-
mental  Panel  on  Climate  Change,  or  IPCC.  The  initial  portion  of 
the fourth IPCC report on the fundamental science of the planetary 
energy  balances,  and  how  they  effect  the  climate,  was  reported  in 
Paris  last  week.  It  was,  and  is,  a  very  stark  presentation  of  how 
the growing concentrations of the greenhouse gases and other ongo-
ing  atmospheric  changes  are  already  significantly  affecting  large 
portions  of  the  Earth,  for  example,  melting  of  ice  in  the  polar 
North, and prolonged, severe drought in Southeastern Australia. 

The  outlook  for  the  coming  decades  is  for  much  further  change, 

including rising sea level, hurricane intensity, et cetera. 

This IPCC report represents an outstanding effort on the part of 
the  international  scientific  community,  and  has  the  support  of  al-
most all of its members. Complete unanimity is never expected, nor 
is there any mechanism for establishing the competence and credi-
bility  of  those  claiming  to  speak  as  scientists,  other  than  the  sel-
dom-performed  examination  of  his  or  her  record  of  past  successes 
and failures. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

The  closer  we  come  to  widespread  public  interest  from  the  gen-
eral public, the harder it becomes to evaluate the merits of the sci-
entific  case  in  the  mix  of  other  opinions.  The  IPCC  report  rep-
resents  the  best  effort  of  the  scientific  community  to  evaluate  the 
problems of climate change, and it should be listened to by us. 

Those of us who are based in universities are accustomed to pre-
senting,  directly,  our  findings  and  our  opinions  about  the  context 
of our results. And in most of my experience, our colleagues in na-
tional laboratories have had almost as much freedom in their pres-
entations. 

Describing  one’s  work  as  one  sees  it  is  the  bedrock  of  the  sci-
entific  enterprise.  However,  in  the  last  several  years,  my  scientific 
conversations  have  run  into  far  too  many  instances  in  which  the 
reports  of  the  significance  of  the  work  have  been  subsequently 
changed  by  others—often  by  persons  with  less,  or  even  no,  exper-
tise in the subject at hand. 

Some of these conflicts have been gathered together with verified 
details  by  the  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists,  and  by  the  Govern-
ment  Accountability  Project,  and  are  presented  here  today.  Work-
ing  out  the  best  approaches  to  mitigation  or  adaptation  to  future 
climatic change, is critically dependent upon possession of the most 
accurate and pertinent knowledge. 

I  will  conclude  by  quoting  the  remarks  of  the  late  Senator  John 
Chafee,  of  Rhode  Island,  at  the  closing  of  a  hearing  on  the  atmos-
phere  which  had  just  been  held  with  the  Senate  Subcommittee  on 
the  Environment,  which  he  chaired.  ‘‘If  we  were  masters  of  the 
world,  we  would  do  something  about  carbon  dioxide.  But  we  are 
not.  We  can’t  tell  the  Soviets  what  to  do,  or  the  Chinese.  But,  it 
seems  to  me,  that  is  not  an  excuse  for  no  action  at  all  on  the  part 
of  the  United  States.  That  is  why  I  find  fault  with  the  view  that, 
if  we  take  action,  the  Europeans  may  not.  But,  that’s  not  a  call  to 
inaction, to me. We ought to do what we can, and set an example.’’ 
These were his comments to us in June 1986, and unfortunately, 

they are just as applicable now as they were 21 years ago. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Rowland follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. F. SHERWOOD ROWLAND, PROFESSOR, CHEMISTRY AND 
EARTH SYSTEM SCIENCE,  SCHOOL OF PHYSICAL SCIENCES,  UNIVERSITY OF 
CALIFORNIA, IRVINE 
I am Sherwood Rowland, Professor of Chemistry and Earth System Science at the 
University of California Irvine, where I have been for more than forty years. I first 
testified  to  the  U.S.  Congress  in  December  1974  in  connection  with  the  study  pub-
lished that year with colleague Prof. Mario Molina, on the depletion of stratospheric 
ozone by the chlorofluorocarbon gases then used worldwide as refrigerants and aer-
osol  propellants.  The  following  year,  these  same  gases  were  identified  as  being  po-
tent  greenhouse  gases  despite  their  very  low  concentrations  in  Earth’s  atmosphere. 
Three years later members of our research laboratory at the University of California 
Irvine—as  did  others—began  collecting  ground-level  atmospheric  samples  in  widely 
distributed remote locations in both northern and southern hemispheres to monitor 
these rising global CFC concentrations. 

When  we  extended  our  studies  beyond  the  CFCs,  we  quickly  discovered  that  the 
concentrations  of  methane  gas,  found  in  these  samples  after  emission  from  rice 
paddies, swamps, coal mines, cows and other sources, were also increasing. Because 
of  the  greenhouse  gas  significance  of  both  CFCs  and  methane,  we  have  continued, 
with  financial  support  from  NASA,  to  monitor  these  gases  in  atmospheric  samples 
collected  quarterly  from  northern  Alaska  to  southern  New  Zealand.  The  concentra-
tion of methane gas in the atmosphere has more than doubled since 1800, as shown 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

by comparison with the concentrations found in air bubbles in glacial ice cores. This 
growth has made methane a significant contributor to added global greenhouse forc-
ing  over  those  two  centuries,  second  only  to  gaseous  carbon  dioxide  in  quantitative 
importance up to the present. 

In  our  continuing  analyses  of  atmospheric  composition,  we  now  have  a  record 
more  than  a  decade  long  in  both  hemispheres  of  the  concentrations  of  more  than 
one  hundred  gaseous  molecules,  of  either  natural  or  industrial  origin.  In  addition, 
with the support of the Department of Energy, we have applied the identical analyt-
ical techniques to the same set of atmospheric gases in more than 20 U.S. and many 
foreign cities, and to the U.S. Southwest as a region. These data are very pertinent 
to estimates of the contributions of tropospheric ozone, another greenhouse gas. All 
of these studies form a small part of the much larger scientific understanding of the 
greenhouse  effect,  global  warming,  and  the  accompanying  concern  about  abrupt  cli-
mate change. 

This  background  of  participation  in  the  atmospheric  science  community,  has 
meant  interactions  both  within  the  science  itself  and  in  its  interfaces  with  the  var-
ious  governmental  organizations  and  the  general  public.  Beginning  in  1988,  the 
global  scientific  understanding  of  these  areas  began  to  be  organized  internationally 
by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, or IPCC. The initial portion of 
the  Fourth  IPCC  report,  on  the  fundamental  science  of  the  planetary  energy  bal-
ances  and  how  they  affect  the  climate,  was  reported  in  Paris  last  week.  It  was— 
and  is—a  very  stark  presentation  of  how  the  growing  concentrations  of  the  green-
house gases and other ongoing atmospheric changes are already significantly affect-
ing large portions of the Earth—for example, melting of ice in the polar North, and 
prolonged severe drought in southeastern Australia. The outlook for the coming dec-
ades is for much further change, including rising sea level, hurricane intensity, etc. 
This IPCC report represents an outstanding effort on the part of the international 
scientific  community,  and  has  the  support  of  almost  all  of  its  members.  Complete 
unanimity  is  never  expected,  nor  is  there  any  mechanism  for  establishing  the  com-
petence  and  credibility  of  those  claiming  to  speak  as  scientists,  other  than  the  sel-
dom performed examination of his or her record of past successes and failures. The 
closer  we  come  to  widespread  public  interest  from  the  general  public,  the  harder  it 
becomes to evaluate the merits of the scientific case in the mix of other opinion. The 
IPCC  report  represents  the  best  effort  of  the  scientific  community  to  evaluate  the 
problems of climate change, and it should be listened to. 

Those  of  us  who  are  based  in  universities  are  accustomed  to  presenting  directly 
our findings and our opinions about the context of our results. In most of my experi-
ence,  our  colleagues  in  national  laboratories  have  had  almost  as  much  freedom  in 
their  presentations.  Presentation  of  one’s  work  as  one  sees  it  is  the  bedrock  of  the 
scientific  enterprise.  However,  in  the  last  several  years,  my  scientific  conversations 
have run into far too many instances in which the reports of the significance of the 
work have been subsequently changed by others, often by persons with less, or even 
no, expertise in the subject at hand. Some of these conflicts have been gathered to-
gether,  with  verified  details,  by  the  Union  of  Concerned  Scientists  and  by  the  Gov-
ernment  Accountability  Project,  and  are  presented  here  today.  The  working  out  of 
the  best  approaches  to  mitigation  or  adaptation  to  future  climatic  change  is  criti-
cally dependent upon possession of the most accurate and pertinent knowledge. 

I  will  conclude  by  quoting  the  remarks  of  the  late  Senator  John  Chafee  of  Rhode 
Island at the closing of a hearing on the atmosphere which had just been held with 
the Senate Subcommittee on the Environment, which he chaired. 

‘‘If we were masters of the world, we would do something about carbon dioxide. 
But  we  are  not.  We  can’t  tell  the  Soviets  what  to  do,  or  the  Chinese.  But  it 
seems to me that is not an excuse for no action at all on the part of the United 
States. That is why I find fault with the view that if we take action, the Euro-
peans  may  not.  But  that  is  not  a  call  to  inaction  to  me.  We  ought  to  do  what 
we can and set an example.’’ 

These were his comments in June 1986, and unfortunately they are just as appli-

cable now as they were 21 years ago. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Dr.  Rowland,  I  thank  you  very  much,  and  if  I 

may, I’d like to begin my questioning. 

It  has  come  to  my  attention  that  in  July  of  last  year,  the  Amer-
ican  Enterprise  Institute—a  well-known  think-tank  in  Wash-
ington—sent  letters  to  climate  scientists  offering  $10,000  to  those 
willing  to  dispute  the  findings  of  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Climate Change, or IPCC, which consolidated world research on cli-
mate change, and concluded that human activities are warming the 
planet. 

And, if I may, I’d like to place a copy of this letter in the record. 
[The information previously referred to follows:] 

AMERICAN ENTERPRISE INSTITUTE FOR PUBLIC POLICY RESEARCH 

Washington, DC, July 5, 2006 

Prof. STEVE SCHROEDER, 
Department of Atmospheric Sciences, 
Texas A&M University, 
College Station, TX. 
Dear Prof. Schroeder: 

The  American  Enterprise  Institute  is  launching  a  major  project  to  produce  a  re-
view  and  policy  critique  of  the  forthcoming  Fourth  Assessment  Report  (FAR)  of  the 
Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC),  due  for  release  in  the  Spring 
of 2007. We are looking to commission a series of review essays from a broad panel 
of  experts  to  be  published  concurrent  with  the  release  of  the  FAR,  and  we  want  to 
invite you to be one of the authors. 

The  purpose  of  this  project  is  to  highlight  the  strengths  and  weaknesses  of  the 
IPCC process, especially as it bears on potential policy responses to climate change. 
As with any large-scale ‘‘consensus’’ process, the IPCC is susceptible to self-selection 
bias  in  its  personnel,  resistant  to  reasonable  criticism  and  dissent,  and  prone  to 
summary  conclusions  that  are  poorly  supported  by  the  analytical  work  of  the  com-
plete Working Group reports. An independent review of the FAR will advance public 
deliberation about the extent of potential future climate change and clarify the basis 
for  various  policy  strategies.  Because  advance  drafts  of  the  FAR  are  available  for 
outside  review  (the  report  of  Working  Group  I  is  already  out;  Working  Groups  II 
and  III  will  be  released  for  review  shortly),  a  concurrent  review  of  the  FAR  is  fea-
sible for the first time. 

From  our  earlier  discussions  of  climate  modeling  (with  both  yourself  and  Prof. 
North),  I  developed  considerable  respect  for  the  integrity  with  which  your  lab  ap-
proaches  the  characterization  of  climate  modeling  data.  We  are  hoping  to  sponsor 
a paper by you and Prof. North that thoughtfully explores the limitations of climate 
model  outputs  as  they  pertain  to  the  development  of  climate  policy  (as  opposed  to 
the utility of climate models in more theoretical climate research). In particular, we 
are  looking  for  an  author  who  can  write  a  well-supported  but  accessible  discussion 
of  which  elements  of  climate  modeling  have  demonstrated  predictive  value  that 
might make them policy-relevant and which elements of climate modeling have less 
levels of predictive utility, and hence, less utility in developing climate policy. If you 
are  interested  in  the  idea,  or  have  thoughts  about  who  else  might  be  interested, 
please give Ken Green a call at your convenience. 

If you and Prof. North are agreeable to being authors, AEI will offer an honoraria 
of  $10,000.  The  essay  should  be  in  the  range  of  7,500  to  10,000  words,  though  it 
can be longer. The deadline for a complete draft will be December 15, 2007. We in-
tend  to  hold  a  series  of  small  conferences  and  seminars  in  Washington  and  else-
where  to  coincide  with  the  release  of  both  the  FAR  and  our  assessment  in  the 
Spring or Summer of 2007, for which we can provide travel expenses and additional 
honoraria if you are able to participate. 

Please feel free to contact us with questions and thoughts on this invitation. 

Cordially, 

KENNETH GREEN, PH.D. 

Visiting Scholar. 

STEVEN F. HAYWARD, PH.D. 

Resident Scholar. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  This  letter  is  addressed  to  Professor  Steve 
Schroeder,  dated  July  5,  2006,  on  the  letterhead  of  the  American 
Enterprise  Institute,  and  signed  by  Dr.  Steven  Haywood  and  Dr. 
Kenneth Green. 

Dr. Rowland, have you seen this type of letter? 
Dr. ROWLAND. I did see that letter. A couple of days ago. 
The CHAIRMAN. And what are your thoughts on this letter? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

Dr. ROWLAND. I think it illustrates the problem of getting science 
out in an understandable fashion in Washington, D.C., where there 
are many competing sources—many of them with money—that put 
out steady information that affect the general public’s view of what 
is going on. 

Within  the  scientific  community,  with  its  refereed  publications, 
there has been very little denial or avoidance of the realization that 
global warming is actually happening. The question of details is al-
ways  valid,  but  the  fact  that  Alaska  is  showing  all  of  these  signs 
of increasing temperature, makes me say simply that global warm-
ing  is  occurring.  Our  problem  now  is,  what  can  we  do  to  slow  it 
down,  to  adapt  to  it,  to  mitigate.  But,  we  have  to  take  very  seri-
ously the fact that it’s happening. 

The CHAIRMAN. Do you see this letter as an attempt to bribe sci-

entists to manufacture criticism of the IPCC report conclusions? 

Dr. ROWLAND. I think that the question of who is a scientist and 
what they believe is a very broad-ranging one. There are undoubt-
edly  people  that  will  respond  to  this,  that  have  their  own  beliefs. 
What I’m saying is that the overwhelming opinion of the scientists 
that have spent their discussions trying to understand it, say glob-
al warming is occurring. There certainly are facets that need to be 
explored,  but  using  the  existing  knowledge  to  denigrate  the  IPCC, 
I think, is unfortunate. But it’s something that will go on. We need 
to  keep  in  mind  that  the  scientific  community  has  tried  to  do  the 
best  they  can  on  this,  and  is  putting  out  their  result  in  the  IPCC 
reports.  And  I  would  urge  people  to  examine  the  science  as  dis-
cussed  there,  rather  than  what  appears  in  other  less  scientific 
sources. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Piltz, I just have a few minutes left. What are your thoughts 

on the letter? 

Mr.  PILTZ.  On  the  letter?  Yes,  I  saw  an  example  of  that  letter 
last  year  when  it  was  going  around,  one  of  the  leading  scientists 
shared  it  with  me.  I  know  that  they  were  concerned  about  it.  I 
hesitate  to  attribute  motives  to  the  sender  of  the  letter.  I  do  think 
it’s important when you have the international science community, 
through  the  IPCC,  or  through  other  major  assessments  that  are 
well-reviewed  and  well-vetted,  that  this  is  the  material  that  those 
of  us  who  are  not  necessarily  climate  science  experts  should  use, 
and embrace. 

And,  I  do  think  we  have  seen  the  beginnings  of  an  orchestrated 
political  effort  to  undermine  the  perception  of  the  IPCC.  Because 
the  IPCC’s  conclusions  about  global  climate  change,  and  its  impli-
cations,  raise  questions  that  could  cause  pressure  for  a  stronger 
policy. And people who don’t find that politically congenial do have 
an  interest  in  somehow  making  it  look  like  the  IPCC  is  somehow 
controversial. 

So,  I  was  concerned,  when  I  saw  this.  As  to  whether  that  was 

part of this sort of, denialist or contrarian or skeptic effort. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Dr.  Mahoney,  do  you  think  that  if  we  follow  the 
path we’re following, we’re on a path to destruction that’s irrevers-
ible? 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Mr.  Chairman,  yes  I  do.  I  think  that  the  time- 
scale  over  which  that,  the  word  you  use  was  destruction,  would 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

occur,  is  something  that  needs  to  continue  to  have  sharpened— 
more  and  more  sharp  definition  in  time.  So,  I  think  that  is—the 
way  I  view  what  we  do  with  the  science  now,  I  think  the  last  few 
years  have  seen  a  real  coalescence  of  the  science  on  the  funda-
mental  issue  that  humans  are  a  principle  cause  of  the  climate 
change that we’re seeing. 

We  could  refer  back  many  years,  and  many  scientists  would  say 
we  already  had  a  consensus,  but  I  think  it’s  fair  to  say  that  that 
consensus  has  become  more  firm  and  more  broad  in  the  last  very 
few years. And so now, I look at the science as appropriately turn-
ing  its  attention  to  what  I  described  in  a  lecture  last  week,  for  ex-
ample,  is  the  very  important  differential  questions:  What  impacts 
are the most severe, and when are they likely to occur? What’s our 
confidence  in  that  because  we  have  to  pay  special  attention  that, 
if  we  estimate  a  time  too  long,  we’re  in  grave  trouble,  of  course. 
What  mitigation  measures  would  help  the  most,  and  when  and 
where do they need to be applied? 

So,  I  think  I  see  something  of  the  nature  of  a  sea  change  in  the 
science, where we can turn away from this fundamental yes or no, 
is there any human influence—the answer is yes. But now we have 
an  even  greater  challenge  for  the  science,  which  is  to  say—let  us 
really  get  on  about  figuring  out,  with  the  best  confidence  we  can, 
when changes are likely to occur, and what’s our ability to forestall 
those changes by the various measures available to us. 

The CHAIRMAN. One last question. 
In  my  four  decades  of  experience  in  the  Senate,  I  have  observed 
that people of the United States begin to act when they get scared, 
or there’s something they fear down the road. Most people will con-
clude that at this moment they have not reached that level of fright 
regarding climate change. When will something happen where peo-
ple will come to this level of fright? Dr. Rowland? 

Dr. ROWLAND. I will resort to discussing an earlier problem—that 
of stratospheric ozone depletion, where the question of what should 
be  done  was  being  discussed  back  and  forth.  The  United  States  in 
that  case  took  action  in  1976,  while  the  rest  of  the  world—except 
for  Scandinavia—was  not  aggressively  pursuing  the  problem,  until 
suddenly  the  Antarctic  ozone  hole  appeared.  This  manifestation  of 
loss  of  ozone—in  a  distant  location,  but  with  massive  loss  there, 
suddenly  raised  the  attention  of  everybody,  saying,  ‘‘We  don’t  un-
derstand it completely, but this sudden change to the Earth seems 
to have been done by man,’’ That realization led very quickly to the 
Montreal  Protocol,  and  to  the  toughening  of  the  controls  on 
chlorofluorocarbons,  in  fact,  their  elimination  by  1996,  as  far  as 
manufacture. 

The important consequence there was, in fact, the appearance of 
something totally unpredicted. I’m afraid, that that’s what the like-
lihood  will  be  on  global  warming.  Something  will  happen  that  we 
haven’t really factored in, that is even more serious than the things 
that  we  have  seen.  Sea  level  will  rise  gradually,  but  something 
else—I’m  still  concerned  about  that.  There  are  enough  changes 
going  on  to  be  very  worried  just  by  what  we  see.  But,  we  don’t 
know,  we  don’t  understand  the  Earth  system  completely,  and  so 
maybe something else will happen, too. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

The  CHAIRMAN.  If  this  was  an  issue  of  great  concern  and  fright, 

these seats would have been filled here. 

Senator Stevens? 
Thank you very much. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
I  do  have  another  conflict,  as  I  told  the  Chairman,  let  me  just 

ask a general question or two. 

We’ve  been  pursuing  this  subject  at  the  Arctic  Institute,  Inter-
national  Arctic  Research  Commission  in  Fairbanks  for  some  time. 
And, with the cooperation of the Congress, we’ve put vessels out on 
the Arctic Ocean for the last 4 years to measure the change in tem-
perature,  and  to  really  follow  the  change  in  the  ice,  as  it  shifted 
around in the Arctic Ocean. 

As I said in my opening statement, I’ve been told that the oscilla-
tions  in  both  the  Atlantic  and  Pacific  have  increased  the  tempera-
ture  of  the  water  going  into  the  Arctic  Ocean,  and  that  had  a  lot 
to do with this disappearance, or the starting of the disappearance 
of  the  Arctic  Ice.  We’ve  had  some  predictions  that  it  might  be  as 
early  as  2040,  others  told  us  it  would  be  2320—so,  we’ve  had  a 
whole series of predictions here. 

Beyond  that,  I’m  told  now  that  because  of  that  increase  in  tem-
perature of the Arctic, both the Russian and Alaska ice is thinning 
and  the  permafrost  is  starting  to  melt  and  recede,  and  as  it  does, 
it’s  releasing  a  great  deal  of  methane  emissions.  And,  that  the 
studies show that not only that, it contributes to methane, but the 
increased  cultivation  of  the  lands  of  the  Earth  is  adding  a  great 
deal  of  methane,  and  the  chart  I  saw  showed  that  the  methane 
spike  was  greater  than  all  of  the  other  greenhouse  gases  together. 
Now,  I’m  looking  at  this  from  the  point  of  view  of  our  safety. 
Some  people  are  suggesting,  ‘‘Let’s  just  put  a  blanket  over  Alaska, 
and don’t let them develop anything more.’’ We have 34,000 trillion 
cubic  feet  of  gas.  We  have  half  of  the  Nation’s  supply  of  coal.  We 
have more oil and gas out on the Outer Continental Shelf, we have 
two-thirds of the Continental Shelf. 

Now,  our  future,  I  think,  needs  some  of  that  energy,  but  at  the 
same  time,  these  other  issues  are  coming  up  about  greenhouse 
gases, and I wonder two things: One, is it possible to capture some 
of that methane as the permafrost in Russia and the U.S. subsides? 
I’m told that’s increasing annually, the amounts that are being re-
leased. On the other hand, is it possible to convince the farm com-
munity  that  there  ought  to  be  some  different  way  of  using  fer-
tilizer,  so  that  the  methane  doesn’t  come  from  the  farm  commu-
nity?  And,  do  any  of  you  conclude  that  the  people  who  say  we 
should shut down Alaska are right? 

Now,  it’s  a  hard  job  to  represent  a  State  that’s  one-fifth  the  size 
of  the  United  States  and  we  have  three  Representatives  in  Con-
gress. We find that out too often. Now, the Chairman says, is any-
one scared? I’m scared. And I’ve changed my policy on the concepts 
of  the  CAFE  standards—I  want  to  know  what  else  we  can  do  to 
convince the rest of the country that this is a serious question, and 
action should be taken? 

And  I  can  go  back—is  it  possible  to  trap  some  of  this  methane 
as it escapes? I’m told if we could refine that methane, it would be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

a  very  good  fuel,  better  than  some  of  the  other  gases  and  petro-
leum. But, it’s escaping. 

Dr.  ROWLAND.  I  don’t  think  that  it  is  possible  to  trap  the  meth-
ane  from  such  widespread  sources.  However,  I  do  have  to  say  that 
our  own  global  methane  measurements  have  shown  that  the 
amount  of  methane  in  the  atmosphere,  the  yearly  increase,  has 
been slowing down for the last few years. There has been very little 
change  in  the  global  amount  since  the  year  2000.  This  leveling  off 
shows  up  in  our  data,  and  it  shows  up  in  the  NOAA  data  from 
Boulder,  Colorado.  We’re  trying  to  understand  why  the  increase  in 
the  amount  of  methane  in  the  atmosphere  has  slowed  down.  I  at-
tribute  part  of  this  to  places  where  people  have  been  capping  off 
leakage, because they realize that methane can be—if it is trapped 
and prevented from escaping, then they can sell it as a fuel. 

Senator  STEVENS.  That’s  what  I’m  saying,  can  we  do  that  in  the 

Arctic? 

Dr.  ROWLAND.  I  don’t  think  you  can,  unless  it’s  a  very  con-
centrated  source.  I  don’t  think  you  can  do  it  with  cows  or  rice 
paddies, which are other sources. 

What can be done is with that part that’s already under the con-
trol  of  mankind—namely  the  oil  and  gas  industry.  We  went  into 
the  Southwest  United  States  into  Oklahoma  and  Texas  and  Kan-
sas, and found that there were a lot of hydrocarbon leakages there. 
And that seems to be something, a very positive thing that we can 
do, that is to look all over the U.S., and all over the world, for that 
matter—about those places where we have methane already under 
control,  but  are  letting  it  escape  because  it  leaks  away.  That’s 
something that I think might counteract very strongly the tendency 
toward increases in the amount of methane in the atmosphere. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, what about—I’ve got to leave, this is my 
last question, I’m really late now—what about the impact of the os-
cillation  of  the  Atlantic  and  the  Pacific?  The  heat  in  the  Arctic 
Ocean? That’s not man-made, that came from the sun. 

Dr.  ROWLAND.  That’s  not  man-made,  but  the  consequences  of  it 
are spread very widely. It’s only when you have something already 
in  a  controlled  fashion  that  you  do  well  in  improving  our  control. 
Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  thank  you  all,  I  do  have  some  questions 
to  submit  for  the  record,  also,  and  I  look  forward  to  reading  some 
of the documents that you submitted for the record. I appreciate it 
very much, Senator. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Lautenberg? 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thanks  to  all 
of  you  for  the  work  that  you’ve  done,  and  for  bringing  your  views, 
even  though  we  have  a  contrary  analysis  of  what  a  couple  have 
said. After having heard so much about the intimidation of science, 
and scientists and their effort to tell it like it is, very frankly. 

Mr.  Knutson,  you  said  that  NOAA  had  sent  Public  Affairs  offi-
cers to monitor comments that you would be making to the press— 
what do you think, once again—what was their intention? Did they 
just want to listen to you? You have a lot of intelligent knowledge, 
did they just want to hear? 

Mr. KNUTSON. I’d rather not speculate on their motives. I can say 
that  they  did  not  interfere  with  what  I  said  in  these  appearances, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

but  I  know  a  number  of  scientists  have  commented  that  this  just 
seems to not be right, that it seems—some call this activity ‘‘mind-
ers’’—having  minders  come  around  to  see  what  see  what  we  say, 
and sort of monitor us. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. You’re generous in your views. 
Mr. Piltz? 
Mr.  PILTZ.  Well,  how  Mr.  Knutson  was  dealt  with  by  the  NOAA 
political  structure  has  been  revealed—at  least  to  some  extent—by 
internal e-mail traffic that was obtained by Freedom of Information 
Act  requests,  and  it  was—in  particular—after  Hurricane  Katrina 
and toward the end of the 2005 hurricane season when NOAA was, 
this  was  very  much  in  the  media,  and  there  was  the  question  of, 
does  the  intensity  of  this  hurricane  activity  have  something  to  do 
with global warming? Clearly, it was on the public’s mind. And the 
NOAA leadership was doing a press wrap-up on the season and all 
of  that,  and  it  seemed  to  me,  there  was  clearly  an  effort  to  selec-
tively  put  forward  certain  scientists  at  NOAA  and  keep  others  out 
of the media, in such as way as to sort of sever the link in the pub-
lic  mind  between  increased  hurricane  intensity  and  global  warm-
ing. 

Tom  Knutson’s  work  was  climate  modeling  projections  that 
showed  that  under  business-as-usual  greenhouse  gas  scenarios, 
that over the course of the 21st century, more and more of our hur-
ricanes would be category four and category five. 

There  was  a  political  operative  at  the  Department  of  Commerce 
who,  in  collusion  with  the  NOAA  Press  Office,  didn’t  want  Tom 
Knutson giving interviews to the press in which he would describe 
his work. And instead, they selectively put forward people from the 
weather service who said, ‘‘We don’t see any connection.’’ It’s a tre-
mendous—it’s  a  really  amazing  example  of  the  mismanagement, 
misrepresentation  of  the  state  of  knowledge  on  this  issue,  selec-
tively, by the NOAA leadership. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  We  have  documents  that  show  redaction 
and  changes  in  wording  that  ‘‘could  be  dangerous,  might  be  dan-
gerous,’’ or ‘‘is dangerous’’—what does that say? Is there any possi-
bility that this was just innocent scribbling? 

Dr. Mahoney? 
Dr. MAHONEY. No, Senator. Senator, no—I don’t think those com-
ments  were  made  where  they  were,  or  they  were  offered  as  edi-
torial  comments.  I  don’t  think  they  were  offered  simply  to  try  to 
pick  one  word  over  another,  I  think  they  were  attempts  to  create 
a  more  moderate  picture,  or  a  less  dangerous  picture.  If  I  pick  up 
on  the  Chairman’s  words,  the  issue  is  how  much  would  the  public 
be scared by some of these things? I have no doubt that some peo-
ple  interpret  their,  did  interpret  their  jobs  as—among  other 
things—aimed  toward  reducing,  what  I  call,  the  ‘‘fear  factor.’’  I’m 
just  quoting  that  here,  I’m  not  saying  that’s  a  phrase  in  common 
use  about  it.  And  that  would  be  a  reason  that  some  editorial  com-
ments would be reflected that way. 

I do think there’s another matter that is important in context to 
this, Senator, if I could add to that. Some documents are meant to 
be  project  reports,  or  planning  documents  or  things  of  that  sort. 
And,  I  saw  occasions  to  my  views,  since  this—much  of  this  came 
to  my  attention—where  some,  including  among  working  scientists, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

would see in the case of a document, the opportunity to editorialize, 
somewhat,  by  pointing  out  the  great  problems  that  might  occur. 
Because, after all, each of us as individuals have our thoughts and 
feelings—we may feel this is highly possible, or not, in some cases. 
So,  from  the  perspective  of  trying  to  create  a  plan  document,  or 
an  overall  project  report  document,  I  would  find  that  I  would  try 
to be very careful to avoid extremes at either end. And the extreme 
at the one end would be that which, would be attempts to take out 
all  the  scary  words.  The  extreme  at  the  other  end  would  be  that, 
that  would  say,  ‘‘The  sky  is  falling,’’  when  it  may  not  be  appro-
priate to say that. So, I—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  it  certainly  doesn’t  seem  to  have 
been a journalistic exercise, to improve the quality of the language. 
I  mean,  it’s  obviously  designed  to  change  what’s  being  said  into 
something less, something different. 

And, Mr. Piltz, do you want to make a last comment, before I get 

chastised by the Chairman? 

Mr.  PILTZ.  Yes,  Senator,  if  I  could  just  comment  on  that.  I 
worked  for  the  Climate  Change  Science  Program  for  10  years,  and 
I worked with career science professionals throughout the agencies, 
putting  together  9  editions  of  the  annual  report  of  the  Program  to 
Congress,  Our  Changing  Planet.  It’s  not  a  technical  document,  it’s 
a  communication  to  Congress  and  to  a  wider  audience,  but  it  had 
many state of knowledge statements in it. 

I’m  not  a  scientist,  but  I  worked  with  90  career  science  profes-
sionals,  with  them  clearing  every  step  of  the  way,  to  put  together 
the  most  careful,  reviewed  language  on  what  was  understood,  the 
highlights of recent research, and what the issues were. 

And,  that—once  that  had  been  cleared  by  the  science  profes-
sionals—and  I  was  accountable  to  them  at  every  step  of  the  way, 
it would go to the White House for final review and clearance. And 
there,  political  gatekeepers  would  step  in.  And  most  notably,  the 
Council  on  Environmental  Quality,  the  Chief-of-Staff  for  several 
years  there  was  a  former  oil  industry  lobbyist,  who  clearly  had  a 
political agenda. 

And,  I  think,  if  you  kind  of  look  at  the  process,  he  was  not  ac-
countable  back  to  the  science  community,  his  proposed  edits  didn’t 
have  to  be  vetted  by  anyone,  there  was  some  pushing  and  pulling 
as  to  exactly  how  much  of  it  to  take,  but  I  think  that  if  you  put 
it  in  front  of  the  scientists  and  say,  ‘‘Was  this  editing  that  en-
hanced the quality of the scientific communication, or made it more 
accurate?’’ I think you will find that the answer was no. 

And so, I don’t think it was a question of toning down extremes. 
I think it was a question of White House misrepresentation of lan-
guage that had been agreed upon by science professionals. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  will  close  with  this,  Mr.  Chairman.  I 
have  a  report  submitted  from  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science 
Program  in  2003,  and  it  starts  with,  ‘‘Warming  will  also  cause  re-
ductions  in  mountain  glaciers,  advance  the  timing  of  the  melt  of 
mountain snow, of snow packs in polar regions,’’ et cetera, et cetera. 
And the entire paragraph is deleted, by Mr. Cooney, I believe. And, 
I  mean,  that  evidence  is  hardly  circumstantial.  This  is  a  gross  at-
tempt  not  to  furnish  the  information  as  it  was  developed,  period. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

Mr.  PILTZ.  I  think  it  was  generally  understood  among  people  in 
the  program  that  there  was  something  about  this  process  that 
wasn’t  completely  on  the  up-and-up.  Everyone  has  a  right  to  com-
ment, but I think under the previous Administration, comments of 
as little merit as we were seeing would have been flat-out rejected 
by the Program Office, and they would have been backed up by the 
White House Science Office, and here, a lot of that stuff was being 
allowed  to  go  through.  And  I—I  think  that  the  science  leadership 
was  trying  to  hold  the  line,  but  they  were  really  under  a  tremen-
dous amount of White House pressure. That’s why the National As-
sessment  got  suppressed,  they’re  not  even  allowed  to  talk  about 
that, to this day. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much.  It 
will  be  on  us  if  we  don’t  listen  to  what  we’re  hearing  these  days. 

Thank you very much. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Lautenberg.  I’d 
like  to  recognize  Senator  Nelson,  but  before  I  do,  I’d  like  to  note 
that Senator Nelson is an astronaut, he worked on NASA issues for 
several years. And, as all of you aware, in research of this problem, 
climate  change,  the  bulk  of  the  money  is  in  NASA.  And  his  sub-
committee  is  the  one  that  authorizes  the  funding  for  research  for 
NASA. So, he’s a kingpin. 

Senator Nelson? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And,  I  would 
describe myself as a lieutenant of Senator Inouye, and it is a privi-
lege. Thank you for this opportunity. 

Thank you all for your public service. 
Dr. Griffin, the Administrator for NASA, assures me that this at-
tempted  muzzling  of  scientists  at  NASA  has  stopped.  I  would  like 
to know your observations. Does anybody disagree with that? 

[No response.] 
Senator NELSON. Does that mean you all agree that the muzzling 

has stopped? I mean, this kind of nonsense is going to stop. 

Dr.  MAHONEY.  Senator,  I  think  I  could  comment,  certainly  for 
myself, and just by noting the affiliation of others around the table. 
We  all  may  hear  things  generally,  I  don’t  think  we  have  a  close- 
in  observer  of  NASA  practices  these  days.  My—all  that  I’ve  heard 
is  that  there’s  been  a  major  improvement  in  recent  times.  But,  I 
don’t  think  that  there’s  a  strong  oversight  role  here  in  the—at  the 
witness table at the moment. 
Senator NELSON. Mr. Piltz? 
Mr.  PILTZ.  The  last  four  pages  of  my  written  testimony  submis-
sion, Senator, is a memorandum prepared by the Legal Director of 
the  Government  Accountability  Project,  with  which  I’m  affiliated, 
on the NASA media policy. And, we do acknowledge that there has 
been  a  significant  improvement  in  the  ability  of  NASA  scientists’ 
ability to communicate. 

However,  there  are  problems  with  that  media  policy.  There  are 
hidden  traps  in  it  that  could  be  used,  there  are  issues  having  to 
do  with  the  protections  under  the  Whistleblower  Protection  Act 
that  are  not  fully  incorporated  into  that  policy,  and  I’m  not  tech-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

nical  on  this  issue,  but  I  commend  it  to  your  attention,  and  the 
Committee’s for your consideration. 

Senator NELSON. OK, we will follow up on that. It’s my judgment 
that  Dr.  Griffin  wants  to  exorcise  any  of  that  political  restraint  on 
scientists in his agency, and I certainly want to assist him in mak-
ing sure that that’s the case. 

Now, at least NASA has come out with a communications policy, 
which  you  refer  to.  Tell  me,  Dr.  Brennan,  why  hasn’t  NOAA  come 
out with such policy? 

Dr.  BRENNAN.  Well,  sir,  thank  you  for  the  question.  As  I  indi-
cated in my statement, the Department of Commerce is in the proc-
ess  of  finalizing  a  revised  policy  that  overcomes  some  inconsistent 
and confusing communication policies from several Administrations 
ago. 

One  of  the  things  I  think  is  important  to  bear  in  mind,  sir,  is 
that  the  Department  of  Commerce  has  not  just  NOAA  in  its  oper-
ational  science  and  forecasting-type  of  capability,  it  also  has  the 
scientific measurement, precision measurement of the National In-
stitutes  of  Standards  and  Technology,  it  has  the  population  dy-
namic  research  and  science  of  the  Census  Bureau,  Economic  Anal-
yses and Forecasting, so it has a wide array of scientific disciplines, 
and consequently, it has a much more difficult matter of developing 
a policy that will be applicable throughout that range of disciplines. 
Nevertheless,  sir,  and  I  think  it  has  been  pointed  out  here,  the 
Department has put together a policy that provides an opportunity 
for  scientists  to  address  their  scientific  findings,  without  the  inter-
ference  of  the  Public  Affairs,  if  they  so  choose—a  policy  that  has 
an  appeals  process,  so  that  if  there’s  any  concern,  there’s  a  rapid 
means  of  addressing  that,  and  also  a  robust  training  program  so 
that  any  mistakes  that  have  been  made  in  the  past  can  be  over-
come, and we can set this behind us. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  I  just  heard  what  you  said,  with  regard 
to all of the multiplicity of disciplines, and so forth, but what we’re 
trying to get at is that scientists are not politically intimidated. We 
want  that  intimidation  dead.  As  former  Congresswoman  Carrie 
Meeks  said,  ‘‘Black  Flag  dead.’’  And,  I  would  assume  that  you 
bringing  out  a  policy  that  everybody  can  see  would  be  important. 
So, when do we expect that policy to come? 

Dr. BRENNAN. Sir, it’s my understanding that it will be issued in 

the next couple of weeks. 

Again, sir, several scientists throughout the agencies participated 
in several rounds and iterations and developments, and have made 
this a much-improved product. 

Senator  NELSON.  All  right,  let’s  talk  about  the  cooperation  be-

tween NASA and NOAA. 

There  was  a  pretty  rocky  time,  back  a  few  years  ago,  and  that 
particularly  came  out  with  regard  to  the  GOES  and  the  POESS. 
No, the GOES and the POESS satellites were the ones that we had 
pretty  good  coordination.  But,  a  few  years  ago  as  you  worked  to 
this new system called NPOESS, we had a pretty rocky time in co-
ordination. 

Are NASA and NOAA beginning to cooperate a little better? 
Dr.  ANTHES.  An  important  part  of  our  recommendation  to  OSTP 
was  to  develop  a  national  strategy  so  that  we  have  a  long-term 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

plan  for  Earth  observations  that  would  involve  both  NASA  and 
NOAA  in  a  more  coordinated  fashion.  There  is  definitely  room  for 
improvement  in  the  relationship  between  NASA  and  NOAA  in 
terms of transitioning research observations into operational obser-
vations. So, we’re recommending that a national plan be developed 
which  transcends  Administrations  and  Congresses  and  develops  a 
long-term  plan  for  sustained  Earth  observations  for  both  research, 
operations, and applications. 

Senator  NELSON.  Is  there  anything  that  needs  to  be  done  (from 
your  recommendation  to  us)  in  our  oversight  capacity  with  regard 
to  the  leadership  of  those  two  organizations  to  get  them  to  get 
along better? 

Dr.  ANTHES.  It’s  difficult  to  legislate  individuals  to  get  along. 
That’s  why  our  recommendation  to  OSTP  is  to  develop  a  process 
that transcends whoever’s in power at the moment in the two agen-
cies, so that it’s not a matter of people getting along personally, but 
a plan that’s in the national interest, regardless of who’s in charge. 
Senator  NELSON.  It  is  my  understanding,  and  it  is  certainly  my 
hope,  that  Dr.  Griffin  and  the  Admiral  are  having  a  fairly  good, 
open  line  of  communication,  working  on  this  system  now.  Is  that 
translating  down  into  the  lower  structure  of  the  bureaucracy  in 
those two agencies? 

Dr.  ANTHES.  Well,  you’d  have  to  ask  the  lower  structures  of  the 

Senator  NELSON.  What’s  your  observation,  is  what  I’m  trying  to 

bureaucracy. 

get. 

Dr.  ANTHES.  In  terms  of  our  report,  it’s  too  early  to  see  if  there 
will  be  any  action.  But  there  definitely  needs  to  be  action.  That’s 
why  we’re  recommending  these  17  missions  to  both  NOAA  and 
NASA, and we certainly hope the two agencies get together and do 
something.  This  does  not  require  a  huge  amount  of  money.  To  do 
the  incremental  program  requires  about  $2.50  per  person  in  the 
United  States.  That’s  an  inexpensive  visit  to  the  coffee  shop.  So, 
this  can  be  done,  and  nothing  is  more  important.  The  Nation  is  at 
risk by our diminishment of satellite observations. 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  two  more  questions,  I’ll 

be happy to wait until after Senator Kerry has finished. 

Senator KERRY. I’m happy to have you finish. 
Senator  NELSON.  All  right,  let  me  ask  you  again,  Dr.  Anthes, 
what  essential  space-based  measurement  capabilities  are  going  to 
be  lost  in  the  coming  decade,  and  what  is  the  impact  on  climate 
research? 

Dr. ANTHES. Well, a number of observations are being degraded, 
and  some  are  being  lost.  For  example,  ocean  altimetry,  measuring 
the  sea  level  height,  a  very  important  variable  for  monitoring  cli-
mate change, how fast the sea level is rising. 

Vertical  profiles  of  ozone  are  being  lost.  The  atmospheric  sound-
ing  capability,  the  vertical  profiling  capability  of  temperature  and 
water  vapors  is  being  seriously  degraded—not  completely  lost,  but 
being  degraded.  The  loss  of  these  capabilities  will  affect,  not  only 
our  measurements  of  how  climate  is  changing  in  all  regions  of  the 
world,  but  also  the  prediction  by  the  numerical  models  of  hurri-
canes and other severe storms. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

So,  it’s  a  whole  suite  of  observations,  scores  of  them  which  are 

63 

either being degraded, or lost completely. 

The important thing is that it is the system of these observations 
that  is  important.  It’s  not  just  one  single  type  of  observation,  it’s 
how they all work together that counts. It is like taking a measure-
ment  of  your  body’s  health.  You  don’t  want  to  just  measure  one 
part  of  the  body,  you  have  to  understand  and  measure  the  whole 
body. 

So,  that’s  what  we’re  talking  about—it’s  important  to  measure 
the entire Earth with a suite of observations, that puts the picture 
together  of  how  the  whole  planet  is  changing.  That’s  what  we’re 
recommending. 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  that’s  where  I  want  to  sound 
the alarm bell. Because it is in the degrading of those systems that 
we’re  losing  our  ability  to  measure  the  changes,  which  is  the  very 
subject  of  this  hearing.  And,  yet  global  warming  is  the  reason  we 
need to have those assets up there. And, they’re degrading. 

We’ve had the Triana satellite spacecraft, sitting in a can waiting 
to  be  launched  for  several  years.  One  of  its  functions  would  be  to 
measure the heat of the Earth, which just happens to dovetail with 
the subject that we’ve been discussing here, global warming. 

What do you think about that? 
Dr.  ANTHES.  Well,  you  have  to  measure,  you  have  to  know  how 
much  energy  the  sun  is  putting  out,  You  have  to  measure,  also, 
how  much  the  Earth  is  radiating  back.  The  balance  of  these  two 
is responsible for global warming. Right now, there’s a net surplus 
of energy coming into the Earth. So, to separate the factors of solar 
variability,  greenhouse  gas  increases  and  other  contributions  such 
as  changing  soil  moisture,  changing  reflectivity  of  clouds,  melting 
ice,  and  so  forth,  you  have  to  measure  the  radiation  coming  back 
from the planet. 

So, yes, if you don’t measure these essential climate forcing func-
tions,  you’re  not  going  to  be  able  to  understand  what’s  happening 
now,  what’s  happened  in  the  past,  and  certainly  what  is  likely  to 
happen in the future. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Chairman, that’s about $150 million launch 
cost for that Triana satellite, it’s sitting there. It’s built and under 
the  present  constraints  of  NASA,  they  have  difficulty  coming  up 
with that money for launching. We may want to look to see outside 
of  the  budget  of  NASA,  or  create  an  add  for  that,  but  also  that’s 
not to minimize all of these other systems. 

And,  my  final  question  Dr.,  Mr.  Piltz—or  I  guess  it’s  Dr.  Piltz? 
Mr. PILTZ. Mr. Piltz. 
Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Tell  us  what  you  think  about  the 
budget  trend  for  climate  research,  being  consistent  or  inconsistent 
with the scientific importance of this work? 

Mr.  PILTZ.  Well,  whenever  it’s  criticized,  this  Administration 
likes  to  say,  ‘‘Well,  we  spend  a  whole  lot  of  money  on  research.’’ 
And it is a big research program, and it’s a fine research program, 
it’s worthy of bipartisan support. But this Administration has been 
systematically  cutting  the  budget  for  the  Climate  Change  Science 
Program, in the Fiscal Year 2008 request, it’s down almost 30 per-
cent in real terms, from just 4 years ago, in 2004. That is a radical 
cutback.  And  most  of  that  can  be  accounted  for  by  the  NASA  sci-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

entific  research,  and  especially  global  observing  system  budget. 
This is a major problem. It’s not a $2 billion program anymore, it’s 
a  $1.5  billion  program,  and  it  was  that  in  1991,  when  it  was  just 
ramping up as a new start under then-President Bush. 

If I could just add one recommendation for your oversight on the 
NPOESS  crisis,  there  is  a  joint  document,  December  2006,  pre-
pared  by  NASA  Earth  Science  Division,  and  the  NOAA  Climate 
Observations and Analysis Program that describes in detail the im-
pacts  of  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  of  NPOESS  on  the  Cli-
mate Program goals of NASA and NOAA. I do not think this docu-
ment  has  been  released,  but—but  it  describes  in  stark  terms,  in 
NPOESS  the  Pentagon  dumping  the  climate  sensors  off  the  next 
generation of environmental satellites—that is the future of the cli-
mate-observing system. And, we have a major problem. 

I recommend that, if you do oversight on this, that you not limit 
yourself to hearing testimony only from Administration political ap-
pointees, such as the NASA Administrator and the NOAA Adminis-
trator, the Director of OSTP. I mean, they’re committed to advanc-
ing,  you  know,  White  House  policy  and  political  objectives,  and 
they’ll  tend  to  put  the  best  face  on  a  bad  situation,  and  perhaps 
be less than fully forthcoming with the Committee in calling things 
to your attention. 

I  recommend  that  you  hear  from  and  ask  the  tough  questions  of 
people  who  wrote  that  joint  report  to  the  White  House.  Bring  in 
people like Tom Karl of the NOAA National Climactic Data Center, 
the Director there, or Jack Kaye, of the NASA Earth Science Divi-
sion, and get them to tell you a straight story. 

Senator  NELSON.  Thank  you  for  that  recommendation.  We’ll  fol-

low up on that. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank you, Senator Kerry. 
The CHAIRMAN. And now I’d like to call upon a recognized leader 

in this area of concern, Senator Kerry. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, very, very much. 
Gentlemen, I apologize for not being able to be here during your 
testimonies,  because  we  had  a  competing  hearing  in  the  Finance 
Committee  on  the  budget.  But,  I  did  get  a  summary  of  each  of 
them  from  my  staff,  so  I’m  aware  of  what  you  said,  pretty  much, 
and  will  follow  up  on  a  few  of  the  things  that  you  did  say,  and  go 
to a few other places, too, if I can. 

Mr. Piltz, let me just confirm with you—you were the coordinator 
of  the  National  Assessment,  you  coordinated  the  agencies  that  put 
together the National Assessment for the year 2000, correct? 

Mr.  PILTZ.  I  did  not  have  operational  responsibility  for  the  Na-
tional  Assessment.  It  was  coordinated  out  of  the  office  that  I 
worked  in.  The  National  Assessment  Coordinator,  Dr.  Michael 
McCracken, had a separate staff within the program that I worked 
in.  And  I  was  working  on  the  annual  reports  to  Congress,  and 
other  things.  I  was  very  closely  attuned  to  what  was  happening 
with that, I was in on the early planning meetings, I saw the whole 
process  by  which  the  National  Assessment  was  developed,  I  went 
to  the  meetings  of  the  synthesis  team  and  the  regional  workshops 
around  the  country,  and  I  saw  exactly  what  happened  to  it,  under 
the Bush Administration, from practically the day—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

Senator  KERRY.  You  described  that  earlier.  Precisely  what  hap-

pened to it? Would you describe it right now? 

Mr.  PILTZ.  Well,  as  early  as  2001,  and  much  more  aggressively 
from the middle of 2002 onward, the Administration moved to first 
ignore  and  then  actively  suppress  the—they  disbanded  the  whole 
National  Assessment  process,  this  nationwide  expert-stakeholder 
dialogue  that  was  the  intelligence  gathering,  diagnosis  capability. 
And,  they  literally  suppressed  the  use  of  the  report,  for  any—I 
mean,  not  just  as  a  policy  document,  which  it  wasn’t,  but  even  for 
research planning. 

I  was  directed  by  the  White  House  Science  Office  to  delete  the 
section on the National Assessment from the annual report to Con-
gress  in  the  year  it  came  out,  and  then  from  the  middle  of  2002 
onward,  we  had  a  very  strong  push  to  take  it  out  of  the  Strategic 
Plan, and—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Did  they  tell  you  why  they  wanted  you  to  take 

it out? Were you given any reasons? 

Mr.  PILTZ.  No,  there  is—the  Administration  has  never  gone  on 
record  with  any  reason  for  why  there  is  anything  wrong  with  the 
National  Assessment.  It  has  been  used  by  the  IPCC,  it  has  been 
used by the Academy, it has been praised by the Academy, and no 
scientific  or  intellectual  justification  has  been  given  for  why  this 
would not be playing a significant role in research planning and de-
cision-support  activities.  Not  just  the  original  document,  which  is 
6  years  old  now,  but  the  whole  process  that  it  initiated,  of  unfet-
tered communication. 

No, there’s never been, I mean—I think it’s evident that the rea-
sons  were  politically  driven,  rather  than  scientifically  justified.  I 
think it’s generally understood within the Program. 

Senator  KERRY.  And  as  you  say,  it  was  generally  understood— 
what was the understanding about what the political reasons were? 
Mr.  PILTZ.  Well,  you  know,  Dr.  Mahoney  could  probably  address 

this too, but I—it was my—— 

Senator  KERRY.  He’s  smiling,  he’s  looking  forward  to  doing  that. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. PILTZ. It was my understanding—and I was not in the room 
when high Administration officials decided this, I just saw the fall-
out  from  it—but  it  is  my  understanding  that  the  White  House  di-
rected  the  CCSP  leadership,  and  in  particular,  it’s  my  under-
standing that Phil Cooney at CEQ was the proximate White House 
political  operative  agent.  But  just  as  an  operative  in  a  chain  of 
command  that  went  all  the  way  to  the  top—directing  the  CCSP 
leadership that we weren’t going to be using this report, discussing 
it,  putting  it  in  the  Strategic  Plan,  and  making  it  very  clear  that 
we  were  not  going  to  go  forward  with  another  integrated  National 
Assessment process. 

And  that  was  transmitted,  then,  to  the  agencies  by  the,  at  the 

principals level. 

Senator KERRY. How many years had you worked there? 
Mr. PILTZ. Ten years. 
Senator KERRY. What was your background before that? 
Mr.  PILTZ.  Well,  I  had  been  working  on  the  collision  between 
science  and  policy  on  global  warming  since  I  first  moved  to  Wash-
ington  in  1988,  the  same  week  as  the  famous  hearing  where  Jim 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

Hansen  testified.  I  was  on  the  staff  of  the  House  Science  Com-
mittee  for  4  years,  1991  to  1994,  I’m—my  academic  training  is  as 
a social scientist. At this point I know a lot more science than most 
policy  people,  and  a  lot  more  politics  than  most  scientists,  so  I’m 
in between those two worlds. 

Senator KERRY. And what do you think has been the consequence 
for  our  country  of  this  flat-Earth  approach  to  the  science  and  the 
global warming issue itself, global climate change? 

Mr.  PILTZ.  Well,  you  know,  the  Administration  has  had  many 
mechanisms,  I  mean,  there’s  the  National  Assessment,  there’s  the 
keeping  scientists  away  from  the  media,  there  are  some  dis-
appearing  websites,  there  are  these  pre-clearances—it  goes  on  and 
on—ignoring  the  Arctic  Assessment,  it  just  depends  on  what  they 
need  to  do.  But,  the  net  effect  of  it,  is  rather  than  to  embrace  the 
scientific assessment and use that to drive effective response strat-
egies, it’s somehow worrying about trying to make the science com-
munication  conform  to  a  pre-determined  political  position,  that 
might be threatened by a more straightforward science communica-
tion. 

Senator KERRY. What would you call that? 
Mr. PILTZ. What would I call it? 
Senator KERRY. What’s the—I mean, what’s the rationale? 
Mr.  PILTZ.  I  believe  that,  sir,  when  the  President  is  asked  about 
global  warming,  and  says,  ‘‘Yes,  the  Earth  is  warming,  funda-
mental  debate—is  it  man-made  or  natural? ’’  That’s  not  a  funda-
mental debate in the science community. And, I mean, you ask me 
what would I call it? I call it misrepresenting the intelligence. 

Senator KERRY. Dr. Mahoney, your testimony, your written testi-
mony, leads one to believe that there had been no real occurrences 
where  NOAA  scientists  have  been  prevented  from  speaking  freely 
regarding  their  scientific  findings  to  the  media,  is  that  really  your 
opinion? 

Dr. MAHONEY. No, it isn’t, Senator, and I don’t think I said that. 
Senator  KERRY.  Well,  just  in  the  written  testimony,  it  doesn’t 
make  it  explicit.  Could  you  make  it  explicit  here,  now?  Are  there 
instances where scientific findings have been prevented from being 
spoken about to the media by scientists, by NOAA scientists? 

Dr. MAHONEY. What I think has occurred, Senator, in some cases 
is,  in  the  process  of  interacting  with  the  Public  Affairs  representa-
tives  in  NOAA  in  particular,  there’s  a  perception  developed  that 
some of the scientists were discouraged, or at least not encouraged, 
and  in  some  cases  discouraged  from  carrying  out  interviews  with 
the  media.  In  some  cases,  interviews  that  might  have  been  set  up 
were  denied  by  the  Public  Affairs  Office  representatives  and  the 
like.  And,  I  certainly  saw  instances  of  that  during  my  time  at 
NOAA. 

Senator  KERRY.  Dr.  Anthes,  you  said  in  your  testimony  that  we 
need to restore U.S. leadership on Earth science, and that the Bush 
cuts to NOAA and NASA have hurt us. The cuts are about 30 per-
cent, aren’t they? 

Dr. ANTHES. The cuts in NASA are about 30 percent, and in real 
purchasing  power,  from  the  value  as  recent  as  the  year  2000.  So, 
this is a 30 percent cut in the Earth science research. And you can 
look  forward,  into  the  future,  and  see  that  there  are  almost  no 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

plans  in  NASA  for  additional  missions  to  study  the  Earth  from 
space.  I  showed  a  chart  in  my  testimony  that  shows  the  number 
of  instruments  was  decreasing  from  about  120  last  year,  to  some-
thing like 80 in 3 years from now, and then on down to 50 percent 
by 2015. So, unless things are turned around, there is a huge shift 
away  from  Earth  science  and  observations  from  space,  which  are 
needed  more  than  ever.  This  is  not  the  time  to  be  cutting  back  on 
observations,  it’s  the  time  to  restore  them  and  restore  the  U.S.  to 
a leadership capability. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well  now,  each  of  you  with  one  exception,  have 
testified  here  to  the  need  to  commit  to  science.  What  we  have  on 
the  record  here  is  a  picture  of  this  Administration  willfully,  pur-
posefully,  quashing  science  from  reaching  the  American  people. 
Willfully  stepping  in  the  way  of  legitimate  global  climate  change 
conclusions being drawn. Willfully stepping in the way of proactive 
steps  to  try  to  deal  with  this.  In  effect,  a  dodge  and  a  duck,  an 
avoidance  of  reality.  That’s  the  conclusion  you  have  to  draw  from 
scientists being told, ‘‘Don’t talk about it,’’ words being stripped out 
of reports, and budgets being cut. 

Dr.  Brennan,  what’s  your  response  to  that?  Are  you  proud  of  a 
record of the last 6 years that sees the United States falling behind 
the  rest  of  the  world,  avoiding  science,  and  not  telling  the  Amer-
ican people the truth? 

Dr.  BRENNAN.  Thanks,  sir.  My  response  to  that  is  that  the 
United  States  is  the  lead  in  advancing  climate  science,  as  I  testi-
fied, the United States involvement in the world—— 

Senator  KERRY.  How  can  you  be  the  lead  in  advancing  climate 
science  if—I  mean,  I  was  here  with  Senator  Hollings,  as  Senator 
Inouye  was,  when  we  passed  the  Global  Change  Research  Act, 
1990.  And  we  specifically  set  out  the  following,  ‘‘at  least  every  4 
years,  to  give  us  the  National  Scientific  Assessment.  To  integrate, 
evaluate,  interpret  research  findings  on  climate  change,  scientific 
uncertainties,  analyze  the  effects  of  global  climate  change  on  the 
natural environment, agriculture, energy production, use, land and 
water resources, transportation, human health, welfare, human so-
cial  systems,  biological  diversity,  analyze  current  trends  in  global 
change,  both  human  inducted  and  natural.’’  Don’t  you  think  that 
if  the  IPCC  report  comes  out  in  2001,  if  you  guys  were  serious 
about this, that you might have reported to the Congress after that 
your judgments about that report? 

Dr. BRENNAN. Sir, as you know the Administration, utilizing the 
CCSP  process,  is  advancing  the  21  Synthesis  and  Assessment  Re-
ports  to  advance  our  understanding  of  a  science  that  is  developing 
and  evolving  very  rapidly,  and  it  provides  a  very  direct  way  to  get 
advances to—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  let  me  ask  you  about  your  understanding. 
Do  you  accept  the  scientific  consensus  that  since  the  Industrial 
Revolution,  the  planet  has  warmed  up  by  0.8  degrees  Centigrade, 
do you accept that? 

Dr.  BRENNAN.  I  accept  that  the  scientific  consensus  that  un-
equivocally indicates that the Earth is warming, and that there are 
anthropogenic causes for that. 

Senator  KERRY.  Do  you  accept  the  science  that  says  that  that 
carbon  dioxide  that  is  already  in  the  atmosphere,  coupled  with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

other greenhouse gas will continue to do damage for its half-life of 
whatever, 70 years or more, and that therefore, no matter what we 
do,  there  will  be  another  add-on  of  temperature  increase  to  some-
where in the vicinity of 1.5 degrees centigrade, do you accept that? 
Dr.  BRENNAN.  I  accept  that  we  are  continuing  to  add  emissions 

to our environment—— 

Senator KERRY. That’s not what I asked you. I asked you wheth-
er  or  not  the  existing  levels,  no  matter  what  is  added,  just  what 
is  there  now,  pre-ordains  a  continued  increase  in  temperature  up 
to about 1.5 degrees, do you accept that? 

Dr. BRENNAN. I accept that we have carbon increasing in our at-

mosphere, sir, yes. 

increase. 

Senator  KERRY.  So,  you  accept  that  we’re  stuck  with  that  in-

crease in temperature, no matter what we do? 

Dr. BRENNAN. No, I believe that the temperature will continue to 

Senator  KERRY.  Fair  enough.  And,  do  you  accept  the  consensus 
of  the  scientific  community  are  now  ratified  by  what  was  put  out 
in  Paris  last  week,  that  we  can  no  longer  afford  the  cushion  of  a 
temperature increase up to 3 degrees centigrade, we are now stuck 
with  a  2  degree,  sort  of,  precautionary  level,  which  leaves  us  now 
with a margin of 1.5 to 2 degrees. That everything man-made that 
we  do,  in  India,  in  China,  here,  the  entire  cushion  available  to  us 
is a 0.5 degree, do you accept that science? 

Dr. BRENNAN. I agree that the cushion available to us is narrow, 

sir. And the Administration supports the IPCC report. 

Senator  KERRY.  If  that’s  the  case,  where  is  the  plan  for  this  Ad-
ministration  to  cut  carbon?  To  cap  carbon?  To  reduce  carbon?  To 
the  levels  that  will  hold  us  to  450  parts  per  million,  which  is  the 
scientifically  agreed-upon  level  that  we  must  accept.  Where’s  the 
plan? 

Dr.  BRENNAN.  Sir,  the  Administration  has  been  developing  and 
has  a  plan,  and  has  been  working  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  inten-
sity,  it  has  been  working  to  address  the  fuel  side  to  reduce  emis-
sions, to stop emissions, and then to reverse—— 

Senator KERRY. Sir, with all due respect, that’s just talk. There’s 
no  real  plan  to  hold  carbon  emissions  to  a  450  parts  per  million 
level.  The  President’s  State  of  the  Union  message  suggested  some 
gasoline savings, which is good, and he suggested some alternative 
fuels. None of which get you close to the level of 450 parts per mil-
lion. And I just talked to a number of scientists last week, who con-
firmed that we can no longer afford the 550 parts per million they 
thought  we  could,  they’ve  ratcheted  it  down,  why?  Because  of  the 
evidence  of  the  break-up  of  the  ice,  what  is  happening  across  the 
planet. Now, do you guys take that seriously, or don’t you? 

Dr. BRENNAN. Absolutely, sir. 
Senator KERRY. Well, if you take it seriously, where’s the assess-
ment  to  the  American  people  of  what  we  have  to  do  to  deal  with 
this? 

Dr. BRENNAN. Sir, as I said, the Administration is producing the 
21  Synthesis  and  Assessment  products  to  advance  our  under-
standing of these impacts. 

Senator KERRY. With all due respect, it’s been over 5 years since 
the  last  report,  and  it  is  unclear  when  19  further  reports  of  those 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

21  are  going  to  be  due.  Totally  unclear.  Do  you  really  believe  that 
two  reports  in  two  separate  areas  is  sufficient  to  say  that  after  6 
years you’re doing the job, here? 

Dr. BRENNAN. Sir, these reports are on a schedule for completion 
that  will  be  submitted  to  you  in  a  timely  fashion  to  address  the 
issues  that  have  been  raised,  and  to  support  the  Administration’s 
view that this is the most appropriate way to advance the scientific 
understanding. 

Senator  KERRY.  This  is  where  I  am.  I  will  acknowledge  that 
there  is  no  computer  model  that  tells  us  precisely  what’s  going  to 
happen.  I  understand  that.  I  also  have  read  enough  to  understand 
that  there’s  certain  cooling  that  takes  place,  there  are  particulates 
in  the  atmosphere,  the  cooling  is  now  neutralized,  and  equals—if 
you  take  all  of  the  greenhouse  gases—except  for  carbon  dioxide— 
there’s sort of an equilibrium. 

But  then  you’ve  got  the  carbon  dioxide  outside  of  that.  There’s 
been  a  35  percent  increase  in  carbon  dioxide  since  the  beginning 
of the Industrial Revolution. I’m not a scientist, but I know enough 
to  connect  the  dots  here,  that  when  I’ve  got  all  these  scientists 
screaming  at  me,  saying,  ‘‘Precautionary  principle,  you  gotta  do 
this,  we  gotta  hold  it  to  450  parts  per  million,  we’ve  lowered  our 
estimate,  we’re  now  looking  at  devastation,  permafrost  melting  in 
Alaska, huge, 66-square mile sheet of ice breaks off, creates its own 
island,’’ you know, it’s all accelerated. The glaciers of the planet are 
melting,  not  just  in  our  own  part,  all  over  the  planet.  Every  indi-
cator is leading to this. An Arctic bird was discovered down in San 
Diego a few weeks ago, I mean, you run the gamut. 

You guys aren’t responding to it. I have to tell you this. 
Dr. BRENNAN. Sir, I believe we share a common goal in reducing 

these emissions, and the approach—— 

Senator  KERRY.  No,  I  don’t  think  we  do  share  that,  because  you 
fought  against  Senator  McCain’s  and  my  efforts  to  have  increased 
CAFE  standards  a  few  years  ago,  the  most  we  could  get  was  35 
votes  in  the  Congress.  You  weren’t  there,  you  didn’t  stand  for  it, 
the President didn’t, you’re not supportive of this. 

And  I  think  it  is  the  most  serious  dereliction  of  public  responsi-
bility that I’ve ever seen. Ever. When scientists are told, ‘‘Don’t tell 
the American people the truth,’’ I mean, this is serious stuff. In all 
of the years I’ve been on this Committee, I’ve never seen something 
like  this.  Where  an  Administration  is  unwilling  to  pull  people  to-
gether and say, ‘‘How are we going to do this?’’ 

When I was a Lieutenant Governor back in the 1980s, I had the 
privilege  of  chairing  the  only  Governor’s  task  force  in  the  country 
chaired by a Lieutenant Governor, and I met with John Sununu— 
then the Governor of New Hampshire, and with Dick Celeste, then- 
Governor of Ohio. And we patched together the sulfur plan for acid 
rain,  which  was  then  the  great  concern.  And  we  are  the  ones  who 
sort  of  created  the  whole  emissions  trading  concept,  which  was 
originally put in for acid rain. 

In  1990,  I  remember,  the  very  industry  that  is  now  standing  up 
against  it  fought  us  tooth  and  nail.  And  they  said,  ‘‘Don’t  do  this 
to  us,  it’s  going  to  cost  $8  billion,  and  you  can’t  do  it  in  the  time-
frame  you’re  setting.’’  The  environmental  community  came  in  and 
said,  ‘‘It’s  not  going  to  cost  $8  billion,  it’s  going  to  cost  $4  billion, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

and  we  can  do  it  in  half  the  time.’’  And  guess  what?  Thanks  to 
John Sununu, EPA Administrator Bill Reilly, and President George 
Herbert  Walker  Bush,  who  was  responsible  about  it,  we  passed  it. 
We  did  it,  and  we  did  it  in  half  the  time  that  the  environmental 
community  predicted,  and  at  half  the  cost.  Because  no  one  could 
predict  what  would  happen  when  you  started  down  that  road  of 
targets,  goals,  mandates,  and  technology  that  was  tried  to  meet 
them.  And  there’s  a  progressive  gain  in  technology  that  we  can’t 
predict today. 

You  folks  are  not  leading  this  country  to  a  place  where  we  can 
embrace  that,  and  go  do  that,  with  alternatives,  efficiency,  renew-
ables. And, we still hear you fighting about Kyoto, which we’re way 
beyond, at this point. 

I  know  we  can  pontificate  up  here,  and  that’s  all  we  get,  sitting 
here as a Senator. And we can try and take something to the floor. 
But  I’ve  got  to  tell  you,  in  my  judgment  in  22  years  here,  you’re 
not  doing  your  job.  The  Administration’s  not  doing  its  job.  This  is 
a  disgrace.  You  are  turning  your  backs  on  future  generations  in 
this  country.  And,  you  are  potentially  inviting  the  possibility  of 
global catastrophe, which will cost millions of lives, spread disease, 
destroy  species,  destroy  land,  you’ve  got  100  million  people  living 
within  3  feet  of  sea  level  in  buildings  in  Shanghai,  in  New  York, 
in Boston, and other similar places, and you’re just inviting this po-
tential catastrophe. 

I  think  you  ought  to  go  out,  and  you  can  protest  and  sit  there 
and  say  you’re  doing  it.  You’re  not  doing  it.  And  I  invite  you  to  go 
back  and  talk  to  your  people  back  there,  and  take  a  look  at  what 
your public responsibility is. 

Is there anybody here who disagrees? Mr. Piltz? 
Mr.  PILTZ.  I  don’t  disagree.  But  I  would  say,  Dr.  Brennan’s  a 
Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  of  Commerce.  I  understand  the  White 
House  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  declined  an  invita-
tion  to  testify  at  this  hearing,  and  they  left  Dr.  Brennan  hanging 
out here to get beat up. 

Senator KERRY. You’re good to support him. 
Mr. PILTZ. The problem is—the power—— 
Senator  KERRY.  I  understand,  folks,  this  is  the  forum  we  have, 
but  this  is  deadly,  serious  stuff.  This  is  the  most  serious  thing  I 
see.  This  is,  what,  how  many  years  now  of  hearings  on  this  Com-
mittee,  since  1987—almost  20  years.  Almost  20  years  of  hearings 
on  this  Committee,  when  we’ve  been  talking  about  this  very 
science. 

We  need  a  carbon  cap,  we’ve  got  to  reduce  carbon.  We’ve  got  to 
get  serious  about  putting  incentives  in  our  automobiles  to  be  hy-
brids,  and  plug-ins  and  all  kinds  of  things.  We’ve  got  to  move  now 
to clean coal technology. There are 16 coal-fired plants that they’re 
planning  to  build  in  Texas  under  TXU,  without  new  source  per-
formance  standards,  they’re  going  to  put  78  million  tons  of  addi-
tional  CO2 into  the  atmosphere.  China  is  building  one  coal-fired 
plant per week. That can’t happen. 

And we better show the global leadership to prevent it from hap-
pening.  And  I  don’t  care  if  people  get  tired  of  me  ranting  on  this, 
I’m going to rant on this every day I can for the next—for the time 
I’m here. Because this is the most serious issue we have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator NELSON. Mr. Chairman. I would recommend, as a result 
of what we’ve heard today that we, you—our Chairman—invite the 
testimony  from  OSTP  that  could  not  appear  today.  So  that  we  can 
get  more  at  the  Administration’s  agenda  with  regard  to  this.  Be-
cause,  I  think  the  things  that  Senator  Kerry  has  said  are  scientif-
ically obvious. And time is running out. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  can  assure  you,  that  we  will  make  another  at-

tempt to invite those witnesses. 

In  the  meantime,  the  record  will  be  kept  open  for  2  weeks.  So, 
if you have any changes you would like to make in your statement, 
or  if  you  want  to  have  addendums  made,  please  feel  free  to  do  so. 
We will also have 2 weeks to submit questions, and we hope that 

you will be responding to them. 

I thank you very much, and the meeting is adjourned. 
(Whereupon, at 12:20 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman.  This  is  a  very  important  topic  and  the  necessity  for 
a  fair  and  open  discussion  of  scientific  investigations  and  their  results  extends  be-
yond  today’s  topic  of  climate  change  and  affects  many  other  areas  of  public  policy. 
It is common practice in science to challenge and test new results and through this 
process of verification, acceptance, and rejection come to a consensus. We are fortu-
nate  in  the  United  States,  and  throughout  most  of  the  world,  to  have  a  system  of 
peer  review  whereby  good  science  and  bad  science  can  be  equally  debated.  Some-
times these scientific debates can take decades before there is agreement, especially 
in  a  new  field  such  as  climate  change  where  a  great  deal  of  science  still  needs  to 
be performed and much needs to be learned. 

What  is  not  acceptable  is  for  people  and  organizations  to  try  to  influence  the  sci-
entific debate by exerting undo influence on scientists or distorting their results. Dr. 
Alfred  Sommers,  former  Dean  of  the  Johns  Hopkins  University  School  of  Public 
Health summed up my feelings when he said: 

‘‘We have a uniquely non-politicized peer review scientific establishment in this 
country.  My  concern  is  that  politicization  is  accretive  in  nature.  If  it  goes  on 
long  enough  it  becomes  the  norm,  and  even  a  new  Administration  eight  or  12 
years from now will just accept it.’’ 1 

There  is  a  growing  body  of  scientific  evidence  that  significant  global  warming  is 
occurring  and  that  worldwide  industrialization  over  the  past  century  is  a  contrib-
uting  factor.  Last  week  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC) 
issued a report on the physical science basis for climate change. One of their conclu-
sions  is  that  most  of  the  temperature  change  is  very  likely,  meaning  a  90  percent 
certainty,  due  to  increased  levels  of  atmospheric  greenhouse  gases.  What  is  less 
clear, and still needs to be investigated, is what will be the affect of climate change 
on  the  Earth.  This  very  important  debate  can  only  take  place  if  scientists  are  al-
lowed to freely voice their concerns, conduct their research, and publish their results 
without fear of pressure or interference. 

Again, I thank the Chairman for holding this hearing and 1 look forward to hear-

ing the testimonies of the witnesses. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PETER H. GLEICK, PH.D., PRESIDENT, PACIFIC INSTITUTE; 

MACARTHUR FELLOW; MEMBER, U.S. NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCE 

Threats to the Integrity of Science 

Senators, thank you for the opportunity to provide testimony today on the critical 
issue  of  the  integrity  of  science.  Good,  independent  science—indeed,  good  informa-
tion  in  general—is  crucial  to  making  good  political  decisions.  It  is  difficult  enough 
to make intelligent policy choices given the complexities of today’s political, environ-
mental,  economic,  and  social  challenges.  It  is  almost  impossible  when  good  science 
or  data  are  ignored  or  distorted,  or  when  bad  science  is  sought  out,  to  support  pre- 
determined political conclusions. Yet never have the political abuses and misuses of 
science  seemed  as  pervasive  and  intentional  as  they  have  over  the  past  few  years. 
The  United  States  has  a  long  and  proud  non-partisan  tradition  of  scientific  re-
search,  analysis,  and  support.  As  far  back  as  the  American  Revolution,  Benjamin 
Franklin embodied the ideal of integrating a passion for science and fact with diplo-
macy  and  politics.  This  tradition  continued  through  more  than  two  centuries  of  ad-
vances  in  both  science  and  in  the  tools  and  avenues  for  moving  scientific  informa-
tion  into  the  policy  arena.  By  the  end  of  the  20th  century,  institutions  like  the 
White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP),  the  President’s 

1 Johns Hopkins Magazine, Political Science, November 2004, Vol 56, No. 5. 

(73) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

Science  Advisor,  the  Office  of  Technology  Assessment  (OTA),  the  National  Acad-
emies  of  Sciences  and  Engineering  (NAS  and  NAE),  national  laboratories  and  uni-
versities,  and  even  the  media,  were  considered  vital,  independent  sources  of  infor-
mation,  fact,  and  analysis  needed  across  the  political  spectrum  for  making  smart 
policies. 

For the last several years, there have been growing indications of systematic chal-
lenges and threats at the Federal level to the integrity of the scientific process using 
a  variety  of  strategies  and  tactics.  Independent  government  review  organizations 
and advisory boards have been disbanded. Access to data and information has been 
reduced.  Federal  scientists  have  been  muzzled.  Scientific  reputations,  rather  than 
scientific  evidence  itself,  have  been  questioned.  Scientific  analyses  and  conclusions, 
prepared  within  Federal  agencies  or  by  people  outside  of  government,  have  been 
changed  for  political  and  ideological  reasons  by  people  who  have  not  done  the  sci-
entific work. Work by partisan organizations has been substituted for work by non- 
partisan scientists. 

The  Pacific  Institute  and  its  Integrity  of  Science  program 1 has  been  cataloging 
and  evaluating  threats  in  the  areas  of  environmental  problems,  energy  policy, 
human  health,  and  national  security.  My  testimony  today  will  offer  a  framework 
(see  Table  1,  below)  for  better  understanding  and  categorizing  these  threats.  I  also 
offer  a  few  specific  examples  and  cases  that  may  offer  some  insights  into  how  Con-
gress  might  act  to  once  again  support  the  use  of  science  in  informing  and  setting 
policy. 
Scientific Misconduct and Altering Good Science 

Policymakers  have  the  right  to  make  decisions  that  consider,  but  then  discount, 
good science. Science is, after all, only one factor among many that must be weighed 
in  making  policy.  But  they  have  no  right  to  seek  bad  science  to  support  predeter-
mined conclusions, to misrepresent, misquote, misuse, or suppress science that con-
tradicts  those  conclusions,  or  to  penalize  scientists  who  seek  to  inform  and  educate 
the public. 

Equally  important,  political  operatives  and  appointees  must  not  be  permitted  to 
alter scientific findings and edit scientific conclusions to support pre-determined out-
comes,  as  has  recently  been  reported  in  the  fields  of  climate  change,  the  health  ef-
fects of pollution, and the need to protect threatened animals and plants under the 
Endangered Species Act. 
Suppressing or Limiting Good Science 

Access  to  information  is  a  cornerstone  of  good  policy.  Efforts  by  outside  parties, 
or  Federal  agencies,  to  restrict  or  limit  access  to  information  are  particularly  dam-
aging  in  a  democratic  society.  These  efforts  take  different  forms.  Access  to  good 
science  can  be  limited  through  changes  in  funding  to  selectively  collect,  fail  to  col-
lect,  or  reduce  access  to  certain  kinds  of  data.  Recent  changes  in  funding  have  re-
duced  the  ability  of  the  United  States  to  collect  data  on  environmental  issues,  to 
analyze  data  that  are  collected,  and  to  disseminate  information  to  the  public.  For 
example,  the  decision  to  close  Environmental  Protection  Agency  libraries  in  major 
cities  (such  as  Washington,  Chicago,  Dallas,  and  Kansas  City)  would  cut  the  avail-
ability  of  scientific  information,  data,  and  reports  available  to  the  public.  Funding 
cuts for satellite instrumentation to monitor the Earth’s climate will hinder the de-
velopment of intelligent climate policy. 
Scientific Policy Misconduct 

Ensuring  that  science  is  made  available  to  policymakers  has  long  been  a  chal-
lenge. In recent years, however, certain actions have made it more difficult for inde-
pendent, nonpartisan science to reach Congress and decisionmakers. The loss of the 
Office of Technology Assessment has crippled Congress’s ability to analyze informa-
tion,  receive  independent  advice,  and  make  thoughtful  decisions  on  vital  techno-
logical questions. 

The recent disbanding of a wide range of independent advisory committees, or ef-
forts  to  pack  them  with  ideological  allies,  weakens  the  policy  process.  For  example, 
the  Secretary  of  Health  and  Human  Services  (DIMS)  disbanded  the  National 
Human Research Protections Advisory Committee and DHHS’s Advisory Committee 
on Genetic Testing. Fifteen of the 18 members of the Advisory Committee to the Di-
rector  of  the  National  Center  for  Environmental  Health  (NCEH)  were  replaced, 
many  with  scientists  with  stronger  ties  to  industries  that  may  be  regulated  or  in 

1 The  Pacific  Institute,  founded  in  1987,  is  an  independent,  non-partisan  policy  research  cen-

ter. For details, see www.pacinst.org. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

leadership  positions  of  organizations  opposed  to  public  health  and  environmental 
regulation. 2 

The  U.S.  Department  of  Energy’s  principal  outside  advisory  board  on  scientific 
and  technical  matters,  in  place  for  more  than  a  quarter  century,  was  recently  dis-
banded.  The  independent  committee  set  up  by  Congress  to  advise  the  government 
on  the  safety  of  the  Nation’s  nuclear  weapons  stockpile  has  been  eliminated. 3 The 
Secretary  of  Health  and  Human  Services  disbanded  advisory  committees  that  pro-
vided  oversight  on  genetic  testing  and  the  use  of  humans  in  research.  A  nominee 
to  the  Army  Science  Board  was  rejected  by  the  current  Administration  because  he 
was  thought  (incorrectly  it  turns  out)  to  have  contributed  to  the  Presidential  cam-
paign  of  another  Republican  candidate  for  President.  All  of  these  actions  have  the 
effect  of  reducing  the  quantity  and  quality  of  independent  scientific  advice  that 
reaches decisionmakers. 
Arguments From Ideology 

There  is,  unfortunately,  a  long  history  of  policy  arguments  made  from  ideological 
or  religious  perspectives  that  result  in  attempts  to  discredit  contradictory  scientific 
information. The classic example, of course, is the order that Galileo Galilei, the fa-
mous Italian physicist, astronomer, and philosopher, stand trial on suspicion of her-
esy  in  1633.  The  charges  stemmed  from  Galileo’s  research  and  writings  that  sup-
ported  the  idea  that  the  Earth  moved  around  the  Sun,  rather  than  the  under-
standing  of  the  time  that  the  Earth  was  fixed  in  the  heavens,  derived  from  literal 
readings of the Bible. The idea that the Sun was stationary was condemned as ‘‘for-
mally heretical’’ and Galileo was required to recant his ideas, subjected to house ar-
rest  for  the  remainder  of  his  life,  and  had  all  his  publications  banned.  As  Galileo 
said:  ‘‘I  do  not  feel  obliged  to  believe  that  the  same  God  who  has  endowed  us  with 
sense, reason, and intellect has intended us to forgo their use.’’ 

More recently, biology in the Soviet Union during the 1930s and later periods was 
crippled when control and direction of state research was given to T.D. Lysenko who 
rejected  the  science  of  genetics  for  ideological  reasons.  Between  1934  and  1940, 
under Lysenko’s admonitions and with the approval of Stalin, many geneticists were 
executed or sent to labor camps. 

In the United States, ideological arguments that lead to the rejection of scientific 
information and conclusions, and contribute to public confusion and policy disarray, 
are still seen in disputes over evolution, climate change, sex education, and various 
health  research  efforts,  such  as  stem  cells.  The  inability  to  believe  or  accept  some-
thing because of ideological or religious contradictions says nothing about the accu-
racy or truth of scientific findings. 
Ad Hominem; Personal Attacks 

An  unusual  and  disturbing  trend  can  be  seen  in  efforts  to  discredit  scientists  on 
personal  grounds,  rather  than  on  challenges  to  science.  Such  personal  attacks  have 
no place in public discourse. In the world of political spin and hypocrisy, we’ve also 
seen pundits attempt to paint all scientists as ideologues who twist their science to 
fit  preconceived  political  preferences. 4 Scientists  make  errors;  indeed  some  let  ide-
ology trump evidence. But these scientists cannot long escape the proper functioning 
of  the  scientific  process.  Fraud,  abuse,  and  error  are  found  out,  revealed,  and  dis-
credited. 

Scientists, including this witness, have been threatened with lawsuits for offering 
public  opinions  on  controversial  issues  to  reporters. 5 But  there  is  a  difference  be-
tween  scientists  who  distort  their  work  and  produce  bad  science  based  on  pre-con-
ceived  political  positions,  and  scientists  who  are  willing  to  share  peer-reviewed  re-
sults with the public and policymakers. The former are fortunately rare and almost 
always discovered and discredited by the normal scientific process; the latter are not 
common enough and they should be encouraged, not discouraged. 

Blanket  attempts  to  discredit  good  science  and  scientists  who  attempt  to  inform 
the  public  and  policymakers  must  be  challenged.  Similarly,  officials  who  open  ‘‘in-
vestigations’’ of scientists, who reach conclusions that differ from their own do a dis-
service to science, unless there is evidence of wrongdoing. 

2 Michaels, D. et al. 2002. ‘‘Advice Without Dissent. Editorial. Science, Volume 298, No. 5594, 

3 J.  Dawson,  ‘‘Disbanding  NNSA  Advisory  Panel  Raises  Concerns,  Physics  Today,  September 

p. 703, October 25, 2002. 

2003. 

4 See, for example, P. Noonan, ‘‘The Heat is On.’’ Wall Street Journal, July 20, 2006. 
5 See ‘‘Science, Climate Change, and Censorship,’’ The Pacific Institute, Patrick Michaels, and 

Climate Change. http://www.pacinst.org/presslcenter/censorship/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

Misuse of Uncertainty and Arguments From Consensus 

Finally, there is a serious misunderstanding among some policymakers of the na-
ture  of  scientific  certainty  and  knowledge,  and  a  corresponding  misuse  of  uncer-
tainty. Absolute certainty in science, or even in politics, is a rare luxury, and never 
guaranteed. Insisting that scientists provide certainty before setting vital public pol-
icy  is  a  recipe  for  inaction  and  delay.  As  Dr.  Stephen  Jay  Gould  said,  ‘‘In  science, 
‘fact’  can  only  mean  ‘confirmed  to  such  a  degree  that  it  would  be  perverse  to  with-
hold provisional assent.’ I suppose that apples might start to rise tomorrow, but the 
possibility  does  not  merit  equal  time  in  physics  classrooms.  Yet  political  strategists 
often  publicly  recommend  using  uncertainty  to  delay  actions  long  past  the  time 
when  scientists  believe  we  know  enough  to  act. 6 The  issue  of  climate  change  is  an 
example  of  this,  where  the  misuse  of  uncertainty  has  delayed  national  action  long 
past the time when effective policies were needed. 

Similarly,  there  is  confusion  all  along  the  political  spectrum  on  the  issue  of  ‘‘con-
sensus’’  in  science.  A  ‘‘consensus’’  among  scientists  does  not  make  an  issue  true  or 
false. It is a reflection of the best scientific understanding at the time. For example, 
an  argument  is  often  made  in  the  context  of  global  climate  change  that  very  large 
numbers of climate scientists believe in climate change; therefore it must be a seri-
ous  problem.  This  is  backward:  climate  change  is  a  serious  problem  because  of  the 
mass  of  scientific  evidence  that  underlies  those  beliefs,  and  it  is  that  evidence  that 
produces  the  consensus  of  opinion.  The  strength  of  the  argument  comes  from  the 
science itself, not the consensus. 
Summary 

In  the  long  run,  the  truth  of  whether  the  Earth  is  round  (mostly),  goes  around 
the  sun  (so  the  best  evidence  shows),  or  is  warming  due  to  industrial  activity  (con-
sidered  ‘‘very  likely’’  i.e.,  more  than  90  percent  certainty)  will  be  demonstrated  on 
the global stage. Our job as scientists is to seek the best understanding of the world 
around us and to communicate that understanding to the public. Your job as elected 
officials  is  to  encourage  scientists  to  give  you  their  best  understanding,  fund  new 
science if there are gaps vital for the public interest, to weigh scientific information, 
and  then  to  make  decisions.  Short-term  political  or  economic  advantage  must  be 
trumped by our collective responsibilities to protect public health, the environment, 
and our national security and to ensure that our decisions are informed by the best 
available information. 
Specific Recommendations 

Congress  can  act  to  help  restore  confidence  in  the  integrity  of  science  and  to  re-
duce  threats  to  science  and  scientists  working  to  advise  policymakers  and  the  pub-
lic: 

• Reinstate  independent  advisory  committees  to  Congress  and  to  Federal  agen-

• Require  that  no  political  litmus  tests  be  imposed  on  advisory  committee  ap-

cies. 

pointees. 

fmdings. 

• Guarantee  open  public  access  to  government  studies,  data,  and  scientific 

• Require transparency of information on conflicts of interest. 
• Prohibit Federal agencies and employees from modifying, censoring, or altering 

scientific findings. 

• Re-establish and adequately fund an independent advisory organization to Con-

gress on technology and science issues. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  present  this  testimony  to  you,  and  for  entering 

it in the record. 

6 See, for example, the call to make scientific uncertainty a key part of the climate debate by 
Luntz Research Companies. 2002. ‘‘The Environment: A Cleaner, Healthier, and Safer America.’’ 
Memorandum 
for  GOP  Congressional  Candidates.  p.137.  http://www.ewg.org/briefings/ 
luntzmemo/pdf/LuntzResearchl—environment.pdf.  See  also  the  statement  by  the  Tobacco  In-
stitute  of  Hong  Kong,  ‘‘The  view  that  smoking  causes  specific  diseases  remains  an  opinion  or 
a  judgment,  and  not  an  established  scientific  fact.  Tobacco  Institute  of  Hong  Kong  Limited, 
1989, March. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

TABLE 1—CATEGORIES OF DECEITFUL TACTICS AND ABUSE OF THE SCIENTIFIC 

PROCESS (SOURCE: P.H. GLEICK, PACIFIC INSTITUTE, 2007) 

There are many tactics used to argue for or against scientific conclusions that are 

inappropriate, involve deceit, or directly abuse the scientific process. 
Appeal to Emotion 

This  is  a  large  category  and  involves  using  various  tactics  to  incite  emotions  in 
people  in  order  to  persuade  them  that  a  particular  argument  or  hypothesis  is  true 
or false, independent of the scientific evidence: 

Appeal to Fear 
Appeal to Flattery 
Appeal to Pity 
Appeal to Ridicule 
Appeal to Spite 

Personal (‘‘Ad Hominem’’) Attacks 

This  approach  uses  attacks  against  the  character,  circumstances,  or  motives  of  a 
person  in  order  to  discredit  their  argument  or  claim,  independent  of  the  scientific 
evidence. 

Demonization 
Guilt by Association 
Challenge to Motive (such as greed or funding) 

Mischaracterizations of an Argument 

This  approach  typically  mischaracterizes  an  issue  or  evidence  and  then  argues 

against the mischaracterization. It can include: 

Begging the Question 
Circular Reasoning 
Partial Truths 
Selective Choice of Problems 
Straw  Man  Argument  (includes  substituting  a  distorted,  exaggerated,  or  mis-
represented position for the one being argued) 
Loaded  Question  (includes  posing  a  question  with  an  implied  position  that  the 
opponent does not have) 
False  Dichotomy  (for  or  against)/False  dilemma  (includes  assuming  that  there 
are only two possible opinions or choices) 
Misplaced Burden of Proof 
Confusing Cause and Effect 
Red  Herring  (includes  presentation  of  an  irrelevant  topic  to  divert  attention 
from another topic) 
Slippery  Slope  (includes  the  assertion  that  one  event  must  inevitably  follow 
from another) 

Inappropriate Generalization 

Accusing all of a group of people or arguments or set of facts as having the char-

acteristics of a subset of that group. 
Misuse of Facts 

Numerical Mischaracterization 
Selective Choice or Presentation of Data; Biased Sample 
Inadequate Sample; Hasty Generalization; Leaping to a Conclusion 
Selective Omissions of Data 
Illusory Precision (where precision isn’t needed or available) 
Inappropriate Vagueness (where precision is needed) 
Unrelated Facts (bringing unrelated facts that seem to support a conclusion) 

Misuse of Uncertainty 
Misplaced Certainty 
Misrepresentation of Uncertainty 

False Authority 

Including appeal to authority not competent to address issue: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Hidden Value Judgments 

78 

Including  judgments  based  on  ideological  or  religious  rationales  rather  than  re-

viewable and testable evidence. 
Scientific Misconduct 

The  violation  of  the  standard  codes  of  scholarly  conduct  and  ethical  behavior  in 

professional scientific research, including: 

Fabrication (the fabrication of research data and observations) 
Falsification  (manipulation  of  research  data  and  processes  or  omitting  critical 
data or results) 
Failure to Acknowledge and Correct Errors 

Science Policy Misconduct 

The manipulation of the process of integrating science and policy, including: 

Packing Advisory Boards 
Imposing Litmus Tests 
Altering or Suppressing Information 
Bullying of Scientists 
Selective Funding or De-funding 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

DR. WILLIAM BRENNAN 

Question  1.  Last  year  there  was  an  article  in  Nature  questioning  whether  NOAA 
was accurately presenting the conclusions of its researchers regarding the possibility 
that global warming could be affecting the severity and frequency of hurricanes. The 
article states that in May 2006 an internal panel, chaired by Dr. Leetma of NOAA, 
prepared a statement on the current stats of the science and that the statement did 
not contain any policy recommendations. Why did NOAA management request that 
the statement be made ‘‘less technical? ’’ 

Answer.  The  two-page  Frequently  Asked  Questions  (FAQ)  document  on  Atlantic 
Hurricanes  and  Climate  was  a  summary  of  existing  scientific  research  containing 
no new science, but rather detailing the current state of science on hurricane activ-
ity  and  climate.  The  first  draft  used  technical  phrases  which  may  not  have  been 
readily  understood  by  a  wide  variety  of  audiences.  The  changes  recommended  did 
not  change  the  scientific  findings,  but  rather  were  intended  to  provide  clarity  and 
additional context to make the document more accessible to lay audiences. 

Question 2. What is the status of the statement? 
Answer. The FAQ document is updated as new and relevant information becomes 

available, and was last updated on December 12, 2006. 

Question 3. Was it ever publicly released? 
Answer.  Yes.  The  two-page  FAQ  document  on  Atlantic  Hurricanes  and  Climate 
was  publicly  released  on  September  27,  2006,  and  was  last  updated  on  December 
12,  2006.  The  FAQ  document  is  available  at  http://hurricanes.noaa.gov/pdf/hurri-
canes-and-climate-change-09-2006.pdf. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

RICHARD A. ANTHES, PH.D. 

Question  1.  The  Climate  Change  Science  Program  budget  shows  a  steady  decline 
in  funding  from  approximately  $2B  in  FY  2004  to  $1.5B  proposed  for  FY  2008. 
NASA’s  Space  Based  Observation  Program  has  been  particularly  hard  hit,  going 
from $1.01B in FY 2004 to a projected $576M in FY 2007. How has this substantial 
decrease in the CCSP budget affected funding decisions with the agencies? 

Answer.  The  CCSP  wrote  a  Strategic  Plan  in  July  2003.  The  NRC’s  2004  review 
of  the  Plan  said  that  the  program  would  require  significant  new  funds  to  fulfill  its 
mandate.  But,  the  funding  profile  has  gone  in  the  opposite  direction.  In  this  era  of 
declining funds, agencies have tried to cobble together the resources to simply main-
tain core, activities, but have not been able to take on many new activities that this 
Nation dearly needs. 

For example, the Strategic Plan said that we would improve understanding of the 
economics  of  climate  change,  which  now  is  the  issue  of  the  time  regarding  climate 
change. We have only the vaguest understanding of the costs and benefits of climate 
change and mitigation and adaptation options. The CCSP should be able to address 
these  and  other  areas  that  relate  to  trillion  dollar  decisions,  but  it  does  not  have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

the  resources  to  do  this.  As  another  example,  the  Strategic  Plan  said  that  the  U.S. 
was  going  to  do  a  much  better  job  of  providing  information  to  inform  decisions  at 
a  variety  of  scales  and  for  a  variety  of  sectors.  The  CCSP  has  not  had  the  funds 
to do that. A final example I will give is the demanifestation of climate sensors/capa-
bilities  associated  with  NPOESS,  which  has  seriously  jeopardized  the  ability  to 
measure long-term trends. This was a major concern addressed in our Decoded Sur-
vey report. 

Overall  I  am  deeply  concerned  about  the  health  of  the  Nation’s  climate  program. 
We  are  hearing  that  ‘‘the  science  is  settled—now  is  the  time  for  action.’’  While  I 
agree  with  the  latter  part  of  this  statement,  the  former  can  be  grossly  misleading. 
The  Nation  needs  the  science  now  more  than  ever.  The  world  is  committed  to  cli-
mate change, which will affect many things that we require or hold dear, e.g., water, 
ecosystem  services,  etc.  This  speaks  to  the  essential  need  to  adapt  to  climate 
change.  But,  our  ability  to  adapt  wisely  is  significantly  limited  by  the  state  of  the 
science.  For  example,  we  simply  don’t  know  whether  precipitation  will  increase  or 
decrease over most of the United States—an absolutely fundamental gap in our un-
derstanding  related  to  adaptation.  The  CCSP  does  not  have  the  funds  to  address 
these  and  other  areas  that  relate  directly  to  trillion  dollar  decisions.  In  brief  it  is 
imperative that ‘‘action’’ must involve a strengthened observation, research, decision 
support, and communication enterprise—the four pillars of the CCSP. 

Question  2.  Who  is  making  the  decisions  regarding  which  sensors  are  in  the  na-

tional interest and will be kept on NPOESS? 

Answer.  I  assume  the  ultimate  decision  will  be  by  the  Administrator  of  NOAA, 
in consultation with DOD (which shares NPOESS costs with NOAA), and with ulti-
mate approval by Congress. 

Question 3. Last week you were in Washington, D.C. to brief policymakers on the 
National  Research  Council  report.  The  report  recommends  a  path  forward  that  re-
stores  U.S.  leadership  in  Earth  Science  and  Applications  and  calls  for  NASA  and 
NOAA to undertake a series of 17 specific missions over the next decade. What has 
been the response from NASA, NOAA and OSTP to the report and its recommenda-
tions? 

Answer. There has been no formal reaction as yet, although the agencies have for-
mally  acknowledged  receipt  of  the  report  and  thanked  the  NRC  for  its  work.  There 
have  been  many  informal  contacts  and  conversations  with  certain  NASA,  NOAA, 
and OSTP officials that have been positive and hopeful. The response from the Con-
gress,  the  science  community  and  the  media  has  been  generally  very  positive.  Dr. 
Mike  Freilich,  the  director  of  NASA’s  Earth  Science  Division  has  publicly  praised 
the  report,  and  we  understand  front  his  recent  Senate  testimony  that  he  is  looking 
to  prepare  a  roadmap  guided  by  the  report  recommendations,  and  based  on  more 
detailed  studies  of  the  mission  concepts  at  NASA  field  centers.  What  Dr.  Freilich 
cannot do, however, is change the budgetary reality. 

The Administrator of NASA, Dr. Mike Griffin, has made remarks that suggest he 
does not support the recommendations of the report. In his recent testimony regard-
ing  the  NASA  budget  Dr.  Griffin,  has  made  it  clear  that  his  priorities  remain  cen-
tered  around  human  exploration.  Ills  assessment  of  the  Earth  science  program  as 
‘‘in good shape’’ suggests that he will attempt to implement only that portion of the 
report  recommendations  which  can  be  accomplished  within  existing  and  currently 
planned  Earth  science  funding  levels.  The  President’s  FY  2008  request  for  the 
NASA budget shows a continuing decline of the Earth Science budget after a small 
increase  in  FY  2008.  According  to  decadal  survey  cost  estimates,  this  approach 
would  likely  only  result  in  implementing  a  very  small  fraction  of  the  recommended 
missions (perhaps 3–4 of the 15 missions recommended for NASA). 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. TED STEVENS TO 

RICHARD A. ANTHES, PH.D. 

Question.  I  understand  that  the  recent  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate 
Change report concludes that much of the warming over the past 50 years is caused 
by humans. I am concerned about human-caused factors. However, I am also inter-
ested in the effects of natural causes such as solar flares and the impact of the Pa-
cific and Atlantic decadal oscillations. Do you feel enough has been done to examine 
the impacts of natural factors on climate change? 

Answer. Thank you Senator Stevens for your excellent question. 
The  short  answer  is  that  while  increased  effort  on  understanding  both  natural 
and  anthropogenic  climate  change  and  variability,  especially  on  regional  and  local 
scales where they matter most to people is needed, we know enough already to con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

clude  that  the  human  effects  on  climate  change  are  now  outweighing  natural  (non- 
human) effects. 

The  IPCC  has  concluded  that  most  of  the  observed  global  temperature  increase 
in the past 50 years is ‘‘very likely’’ due to human activity. This conclusion is based 
on studies that assess the causes of climate change, first considering all the possible 
agents of climate change (forcings), both natural and from human activities. The ca-
pability  of  climate  models  to  simulate  the  past  climate  is  also  assessed,  given  both 
the observations and estimates of past forcings, and the climate changes. Given good 
replications of the past, the forcings can be inserted one by one to study their indi-
vidual  effects  and  allow  attribution  of  the  observed  climate  change  to  the  different 
forcings. 

The  best  climate  models  have  been  extensively  tested  and  evaluated  using  obser-
vations. They are exceedingly useful instruments for carrying out numerical climate 
experiments, but they are not perfect, and some models are better than others. Un-
certainties  arise  from  shortcomings  in  our  understanding  of  climate  processes  oper-
ating  in  the  atmosphere,  ocean,  land  and  cryosphere,  and  how  to  best  represent 
those  processes  in  models.  Yet,  in  spite  of  these  uncertainties,  today’s  best  climate 
models  are  now  able  to  reproduce  the  climate  of  the  past  century,  and  simulations 
of  the  evolution  of  global  surface  temperature  over  the  past  millennium  are  con-
sistent with paleoclimate reconstructions. 

As  a  result,  climate  modelers  are  able  to  test  the  role  of  various  forcings  in  pro-
ducing  observed  changes  in  climate.  Forcings  imposed  on  the  climate  system  are 
both  natural  in  origin,  such  as  changes  in  solar  luminosity  or  volcanic  eruptions, 
or  human-induced,  such  as  increases  in  aerosol  and  greenhouse  gas  concentrations 
in  the  atmosphere.  Climate  model  simulations  that  account  for  such  changes  have 
now  reliably  shown  that  global  surface  warming  of  recent  decades  is  a  response  to 
the  increased  concentrations  of  greenhouse  gases  and  sulfate  aerosols  in  the  atmos-
phere.  When  the  models  are  run  without  these  forcing  changes,  the  remaining  nat-
ural  forcings  and  intrinsic  natural  variability  fail  to  capture  the  increase  in  global 
surface temperatures. But when the anthropogenic forcings are included, the models 
simulate the observed global temperature record with impressive accuracy. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

RICK PILTZ 

Question  1.  Last  year,  in  response  to  a  letter  from  Senator  McCain,  the  National 
Science  Board  recommended  that  all  Federal  agencies  that  conduct  research  estab-
lish  clear  policies  and  procedures  for  presenting  their  data.  Both  NASA  and  NOAA 
have taken steps to revise and clarify their respective media policy. 

Should Congress establish a consistent Federal policy regarding the dissemination 
of research by Federal employees? What should be the criteria for such policy? And 
is there a good model that can be used across the Federal Government? 

Answer.  I  am  most  familiar  with  the  problems  related  to  communication  of  cli-
mate  and  global  change  research,  though  I  believe  my  response  is  of  more  general 
applicability. 

Several  scientific  information  pathways  should  be  considered  in  establishing  pol-
icy  on  the  dissemination  of  research  conducted  by  Federal  employees.  They  include 
media  communications,  Congressional  communications  (hearing  testimony  and  re-
ports),  public  communications  (presentations,  lectures,  websites,  brochures,  etc.), 
professional  communications  (i.e.,  primarily  scientific  publications,  but  also  con-
ferences),  and  major  scientific  assessment  reports.  These  pathways  have  key  ele-
ments  in  common  but  are  not  identical  in  the  issues  they  raise  for  policymaking. 
Federal policy regarding the dissemination of research by Federal employees must 
include  certain  consistent,  government-wide  safeguards.  However,  given  the  diver-
sity  of  participating  research  agencies,  a  one-size-fits-all  policy  may  not  be  the  best 
approach for addressing the full range of pathways of science communication. In ad-
dition,  functional  and  organizational  differences  within  a  particular  agency  may 
warrant somewhat different requirements. 

In general, any government-wide policy should specify what category or categories 
of communication it is addressing, specify the purpose of the policy (i.e., to promote 
the communication of research), acknowledge the broad statutory and constitutional 
rights held by Federal scientists (and other Federal employees), address the employ-
ees’  obligations,  lay  out  a  grievance  and  reporting  system,  and  define  a  baseline  of 
protections. Detailed implementation of any government-wide policy should then be 
developed as appropriate by individual agencies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Recommendations  for  Executive  Branch  Agencies  on  Ensuring  the  Integ-

rity of the Dissemination of Climate Change Research 1 

81 

1.  Eliminate  pre-approval,  routing,  intake,  anticipated  Q&A,  and  monitoring  re-
quirements  for  agency  media,  and,  where  applicable,  Climate  Change  Science  Pro-
gram (CCSP) communications. 

The  ultimate  decision  about  the  content  of  and  parties  to  any  particular  media 
communication  should  rest  with  the  reporter  and  the  scientist  he  or  she  requests. 
Public  Affairs  Offices  (PAO)  should  take  an  active  role  in  coordinating  and  facili-
tating media interactions, especially connecting journalists with the appropriate sci-
entists and supplying corrections and background information. It may be reasonable 
to  require  notification  of  the  PAO  and  a  post-interview  recap,  as  many  local  PAOs 
have done to the scientists’ and reporters’ satisfaction. 

2.  Reaffirm  the  ‘‘personal  views’’  exception  for  all  media,  Congressional,  public, 

and professional communications. 

Scientists  must  be  apprised  of  their  constitutional  right  to  speak  about  any  sub-
ject,  including  policy-related  matters  and  those  outside  their  area  of  expertise,  so 
long as: 

• Scientists  make  it  clear  that  they  do  so  in  their  private  capacity,  not  as  a  rep-
resentative of their agency. Identifying the scientist with his or her agency, po-
sition,  and  area  of  expertise  is  permissible  so  long  as  the  communication  in-
cludes the ‘‘private capacity’’ disclaimer; and 

• Scientists’ personal communications do not unreasonably take from agency time 
and resources. Personal use of telephone or e-mail should be allowed during em-
ployees’  ‘‘paid  free  time.’’  Longer  interviews  may  need  to  be  conducted  during 
authorized  breaks  or  after  work.  Insofar  as  the  agency  facility  is  usually  open 
to the public, reporters should be able to interview with scientists on the prem-
ises. 

3. Comply with the mandatory requirements of the Anti-Gag Statute to notify em-
ployees  of  their  whistleblower  and  related  rights  by  incorporating  the  statutorily- 
prescribed addendum into the text of any restrictive communication policy or direc-
tive. 

4.  Comply  with  the  Whistleblower  Protection  Act  (WPA)  by  including  the  nec-

essary exceptions. 

The  Whistleblower  Protection  Act  protects  any  unclassified  disclosures,  or  those 
not  specifically  prohibited  by  statute,  that  a  Federal  employee  reasonably  believes 
is evidence of illegality, gross waste, gross mismanagement, abuse of power, or sub-
stantial  and  specific  danger  to  public  health  or  safety.  Communication  policies 
should include this exception to any restrictions it imposes. 

5.  Eliminate  communications  restrictions  based  on  the  ‘‘Sensitive  but  Unclassi-

fied’’ (SBU) classification. 

The unsettled legal definition of SBU can cover virtually any form of communica-
tion  and  thereby  implicates  constitutional  and  statutory  free  speech  concerns.  Cor-
respondingly,  regulations  governing  the  definition  of  ‘‘Sensitive  but  Unclassified’’ 
and related categories must be tightened so that employees know what type of infor-
mation is properly marked SBU. 

6. Guarantee the timely and proactive release of press releases. 
Any  scientist,  whether  they  are  lead  or  co-author  of  a  published  report,  study,  or 
article,  should  be  given  the  necessary  approval  and  assistance  to  issue  a  press  re-
lease  within  a  reasonable  time  and  concurrent  with  the  publication  date—even  if 
a release has already been or will be issued by another institution. 

7. Leave content editing to the scientists for scientific publications, Congressional 
written  testimony  and  reports,  web  postings  and  presentation  material,  and  press 
releases. 

Although  non-scientists  and  agency  management  may  be  actively  involved  in 
copy-editing and proof-reading, they should not have the authority to alter the sub-
stance  of  written  scientific  information  without  the  scientists’  expressed  approval. 
The  qualified  scientists  actively  involved  in  the  research  or  synthesis  of  research 
alone should be responsible for its content. Co-authors, peer review, ethics, and per-
sonal reputation are the proper check. 

8. Reaffirm a scientist’s ‘‘right of last review’’ for all media, Congressional, public, 

and professional communications. 

1 These recommendations for Executive Branch agencies follow closely those made by the Gov-
ernment  Accountability  Project,  as  contained  in  GAP’s  report,  Redacting  the  Science  of  Climate 
Change: An Investigative and Synthesis Report (March 2007), by Tarek Maasarani. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

Federal  employees  should  have  the  right  to  approve  the  scientific  content  in  the 
final  version  of  any  proposed  Federal  publication  that  significantly  relies  on  their 
research,  identifies  them  as  a  lead  author  or  contributor,  or  purports  to  represent 
their  scientific  opinion.  This  includes,  but  is  not  limited  to,  reports,  web  postings, 
and press releases. In the case of multi-author publications, co-authors should have 
a meaningful right of review and comment. Where an agency adopts an agency-wide 
position on a scientific issue, scientists should be allowed to register their disagree-
ment  publicly  and  without  consequence.  Finally,  Federal  employees  should  be  per-
mitted  reasonable  access  to  all  drafts  and  edits  of  their  publications  produced 
throughout the review process. 

9. Solicit the input of scientists and other stakeholders in the development of the 
content of substantial Congressional and public reports and the procedures that gov-
ern their production. 

10. Continue to ensure that Federal employees are not restricted either from pub-
lishing  their  research  in  peer-reviewed  journals  and  other  scientific  publications  or 
from  making  oral  presentations  about  their  research  at  professional  conferences  or 
other meetings of their peers. 

11. Establish effective transparency and accountability procedures. 
In order to make the above two recommendations meaningful: 
• The  editing  and  review  process  must  clearly  identify  all  participants  and  text 
changes  in  each  stage  of  review.  Participants  must  be  able  to  address  any  con-
cerns or questions about changes with the party that made them; 

• An  internal  disclosure  system  must  be  established  to  allow  for  the  confidential 
reporting  and  meaningful  resolution  of  inappropriate  alterations,  conduct,  or 
conflicts of interest in the review process in particular; and 

• More generally, the government and its agencies must afford Federal scientists 
adequate  whistleblower  safeguards,  including  protections  from  retaliation,  the 
impartial  investigation  and  fair  resolution  of  complaints,  due  process  rights, 
confidentiality of disclosures, and adequate corrective relief. 

12. Adequately inform and clarify scientists’ rights and responsibilities. 
Every public affairs office should evaluate its existing policies and develop (or re-
affirm) a set of simple and unambiguous policies in light of these recommendations 
and with the input of their own scientists. These policies should clearly incorporate 
the scientists’ rights, as well as responsibilities, and be broadly disseminated to both 
scientists and management through annual reports, Internet sites, employment con-
tracts,  workplace  posters,  employee  handbooks,  and  special  trainings.  Although 
agency-  or  department-wide  policies  may  articulate  an  overarching  set  of  principles 
and basic rights and responsibilities, it is suggested that implementation guidelines 
should  be  afforded  some  measure  of  adaptability  to  the  particular  needs  of  agency 
subdivisions.  In  any  case,  communications  policies  should  be  uniformly  applied  and 
readily available to all employees and the general public. 

13.  Investigate  and  correct  the  inappropriate  policies,  practices,  and  incidents 
identified in the Government Accountability Project report, Redacting the Science of 
Climate Change, and identified in other sources. 

Determine  whether  and  why  the  reported  problems  have  occurred.  Where  con-

firmed to be true, provide: 

• Adequate relief, including, but not limited to, reinstatement, public, and/or pri-

vate acknowledgement to those who may have been harmed; 

• Adequate  discipline  of  those  found  responsible,  including  but  not  limited  to  fir-

ing or demoting them to a position of less authority; and 

• Necessary  reform  to  correct  the  institutional  conditions,  policies,  and  activities 

that prompted the problem. 

14.  Encourage  the  media  to  recognize  and  place  primary  emphasis  on  reporting 

credible peer-reviewed information from the scientific community. 

15.  Improve  public  affair’s  affirmative  role  of  translating  science  for  public  con-

sumption. 

This includes: 
• Mandating  PAOs  to  aggressively  pursue  the  dissemination  and  accessibility  of 

their scientists’ work to the public, media, and Congress; 

• Regularly training scientists on effective communication techniques; and 
• Hiring more local public affairs officers to work directly with the scientists. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

16. Develop a transparent communications policy for the Climate Change Science 
Program that meets the recommendations for media policy reform set out above and 
that streamlines the approval process for CCSP products and communications. 

17.  End  the  suppression  of  meaningful  and  appropriate  references  to  and  use  of 
the  National  Assessment  of  the  Potential  Consequences  of  Climate  Variability  and 
Change in the communication of climate change research and assessment, including 
in  CCSP  reports  to  Congress,  research  and  assessment  planning  documents,  and 
websites. 

18.  Ensure  CCSP  compliance  with  the  Global  Change  Research  Act  by  producing 
in  the  statutorily  required  timely  and  regular  manner  an  integrated,  scientifically- 
based assessment of climate and global change, including an analysis of current and 
projected  trends,  and  with  a  focus  on  the  impacts  of  climate  and  global  change  on 
society and the environment. 
Recommendations for Action by Congress 

1. Consider enacting legislation to ensure the integrity of the dissemination of re-

search as outlined in the above recommendations. 

2.  Enact  legislation  to  protect  Federal  free  speech  and  whistleblower  rights,  with 

particular reference to employees of Federal science agencies. 

3. Strengthen essential Congressional oversight functions on issues of scientific in-

tegrity. 
Four Legal Cornerstones for Freedom of Speech in the Context of Scientific 

Freedom 

A  comprehensive  approach  to  policymaking  must  include  certain  consistent,  gov-
ernment-wide criteria for ensuring the integrity of the process for disseminating fed-
erally-funded scientific research. The Government Accountability Project calls atten-
tion  to  consensus,  expert  criteria  that  have  existed  since  the  issuance  of  the  1995 
report of the Congressionally-charted HHS Commission on Research Integrity. 

To summarize, those criteria require application of and compliance with four cor-

nerstones for freedom of speech in the context of scientific freedom: 

1.  The  First  Amendment,  with  respect  to  the  right  of  government  scientists  to 
express  their  personal  views  on  their  own  time,  without  prior  restraint  or  re-
striction of their anonymity, about matters of public concern; 
2. The Lloyd-Lafollette Act of 1912, 5 USC 7211, which requires an unqualified, 
safe channel for government employees to communicate with Congress; 
3.  The  Whistleblower  Protection  Act,  5  USC  2302(b)(8),  the  statutory  applica-
tion of constitutional free speech rights; and 
4. the Anti-Gag Statute, 2 unanimously passed by Congress as part of every ap-
propriations  law  since  FY  1988,  which  bans  spending  to  implement  or  enforce 

2 The  current  version  can  be  found  in  Sec.  820  of  the  Transportation,  Treasury,  Housing  and 
Urban Development, the Judiciary, and Independent Agencies Appropriations Act of 2006, which 
became Pub. L. 109–115 on November 30, 2005, and is extended through the current continuing 
resolution. SEC. 820. No funds appropriated in this or any other Act may be used to implement 
or  enforce  the  agreements  in  Standard  Forms  312  and  4414  of  the  Government  or  any  other 
nondisclosure policy, form, or agreement if such policy, form, or agreement does not contain the 
following provisions: ‘‘These restrictions are consistent with and do not supersede, conflict with, 
or otherwise alter the employee obligations, rights, or liabilities created by Executive Order No. 
12958;  section  7211  of  title  5,  United  States  Code  (governing  disclosures  to  Congress);  section 
1034  of  title  10,  United  States  Code,  as  amended  by  the  Military  Whistleblower  Protection  Act 
(governing  disclosure  to  Congress  by  members  of  the  military);  section  2302(b)(8)  of  title  5, 
United  States  Code,  as  amended  by  the  Whistleblower  Protection  Act  (governing  disclosures  of 
illegality, waste, fraud, abuse or public health or safety threats); the Intelligence Identities Pro-
tection  Act  of  1982  (50  U.S.C.  421  et  seq.)  (governing  disclosures  that  could  expose  confidential 
government agents); and the statutes which protect against disclosure that may compromise the 
national security, including sections 641, 793, 794, 798, and 952 of title 18, United States Code, 
and  section  4(b)  of  the  Subversive  Activities  Act  of  1950  (50  U.S.C.  783(b)).  The  definitions,  re-
quirements,  obligations,  rights,  sanctions,  and  liabilities  created  by  said  Executive  Order  and 
listed  statutes  are  incorporated  into  this  agreement  and  are  controlling.’’:  Provided,  That  not-
withstanding  the  preceding  paragraph,  a  nondisclosure  policy  form  or  agreement  that  is  to  be 
executed by a person connected with the conduct of an intelligence or intelligence-related activ-
ity,  other  than  an  employee  or  officer  of  the  U.S.  Government,  may  contain  provisions  appro-
priate to the particular activity for which such document is to be used. Such form or agreement 
shall, at a minimum, require that the person will not disclose any classified information received 
in  the  course  of  such  activity  unless  specifically  authorized  to  do  so  by  the  U.S.  Government. 
Such  nondisclosure  forms  shall  also  make  it  clear  that  they  do  not  bar  disclosures  to  Congress 
or to an authorized official of an executive agency or the Department of Justice that are essen-
tial to reporting a substantial violation of law. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

any  nondisclosure  policy,  form  or  agreement  unless  it  contains  a  Congression-
ally-drafted  addendum  that  specifies  the  Whistleblower  Protection  Act  and  the 
Lloyd-Lafollette Act (protecting communications with Congress) prevail and su-
persede any conflicting language from the agency-based restriction. 

The  proper  model  is  found  in  H.R.  985,  which  recently  passed  the  House  by  a 
331–94 vote. It provides a remedy for the Anti-Gag Statute, and in Section 13 rein-
forces  the  WPA  with  a  scientific  freedom  amendment  that  makes  the  following  ac-
tions  legally-recognized  ‘‘abuse  of  authority’’  and  protects  any  government  scientist 
from challenging: 

‘‘As used in section 2302(b)(8), the term ‘abuse of authority’ includes— 

(1)  any  action  that  compromises  the  validity  or  accuracy  of  federally  funded 
research or analysis; 
(2) the dissemination of false or misleading scientific, medical, or technical in-
formation; 
(3)  any  action  that  restricts  or  prevents  an  employee  or  any  person  per-
forming  federally  funded  research  or  analysis  from  publishing  in  peer-re-
viewed  journals  or  other  scientific  publications  or  making  oral  presentations 
at professional society meetings or other meetings of their peers.’’ 

A further improvement could be to make those same actions illegal, so that a gov-
ernment scientist also could ‘‘walk the talk’’ and be legally-shielded from retaliation 
for refusing to obey orders implementing the above practices. 
The Government Accountability Project’s Model Media Policy 
Section 1: Purpose 

.01 This  Order  establishes  this  agency’s  media  policy  governing  media  commu-
nications  including  advisories,  press  releases,  statements,  interviews,  news  con-
ferences,  and  other  related  media  contacts.  Public  affairs  offices  have  been  estab-
lished to facilitate the active dissemination of agency research results and to coordi-
nate media and public relations activities. A principal goal of public affairs is to help 
the  agency  or  program  achieve  its  vision  of  a  better  informed  society  and  of  policy-
making based on sound and objective science. 
Section 2: Rights 

.01 Scientists  and  other  employees  of  the  government  have  the  fundamental 
right to express their personal views, provided they specify that they are not speak-
ing  on  behalf  of,  or  as  a  representative  of,  the  agency,  but  rather  in  their  private 
capacity.  So  long  as  this  disclaimer  is  made,  the  employee  is  permitted  to  mention 
his  or  her  institutional  affiliation  and  position  if  this  has  helped  inform  his  or  her 
views  on  the  matter.  The  employee  is  allowed  to  make  reasonable  use  of  agency 
time  and  resources  for  the  purposes  of  expressing  their  personal  views,  i.e.,  accom-
modations comparable to what would be allowed on other personal matters. 

.02 Employees  have  the  right  of  final  review  to  approve  and  comment  publicly 
upon  the  text  of  any  proposed  publication  that  significantly  relies  on  or  interprets 
their scientific research, identifies them as a lead author or contributor, or purports 
to represent their scientific opinion. In the case of multi-author publications, proce-
dures should be set up to allow co-authors to have a meaningful right of review and 
comment. 

.03 Final authority over the content of and parties to any particular media com-

munication rests with the reporter and the scientist he or she requests. 
Section 3: Responsibilities 

.01 Public affairs is responsible for: 

a.  promoting  media  attention  on  important  scientific  and  institutional  develop-
ments, 
b.  coordinating  journalists  and  the  sources  of  information  they  are  looking  for, 
and 
c. providing both reporters and scientists with timely, accurate, and professional 
media assistance. 

.02 Employees are responsible for working with public affairs to make significant 

research developments accessible and comprehensible to the public. 

.03 Employees are responsible for the accuracy and integrity of their communica-
tions  and  should  not  represent  the  agency  on  issues  of  politics  or  policy  without 
prior  approval  from  the  PAO.  Employees  are  not  free  to  disclose  classified  informa-
tion unless authorized by the U.S. Government or Federal statute. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

Section 4: Guidelines for Media and Public Interactions 

.01 To help public affairs best fulfill its responsibilities, employees are asked to: 
a. keep the PAO informed of any media interest or potential for interest in your 
work, subject to the protections of the Whistleblower Protection Act. 
b.  notify  the  PAO  of  any  impending  media  contacts  and  provide  a  recap  after-
wards. 
c.  request  press  releases  from  the  PAO  and  submit  drafts  for  review  of  their 
form and non-scientific content. 
d.  work  with  the  PAO  to  review  presentations  or  news  conferences  for  their 
form and non-scientific content. 
.02 Public affairs officers should 

a. respond to all media inquiries within 120 minutes during the workday. 
b.  do  all  they  can  to  help  reporters  get  the  appropriate  information  know  the 
reporter’s deadline to ensure timely response. 
c.  provide  contact  information  where  they  will  be  available,  even  after  hours, 
on weekends, and on holidays. 
d. draft regional and national press releases whenever warranted. 
e. ensure a timely turn-around on press releases over no more than 1 week. 
f.  develop  or  coordinate  the  development  of  talking  points  in  collaboration  with 
the  relevant  experts  for  the  release  of  scientific  papers  and  other  agency  prod-
ucts. 

Section 5: Media Coverage 

.01 In the spirit of openness, media representatives must be granted free access 
to open meetings of advisory committees and other meetings convened by this agen-
cy,  as  well  as  permission  to  reasonably  use  tape  recorders,  cameras,  and  electronic 
equipment for broadcast purposes. 

.02 The  PAO  sponsoring  or  co-sponsoring  a  meeting  may  be  present,  or  con-
sulted,  to  undertake  all  responsibilities  of  a  news  media  nature,  including  but  not 
restricted to necessary physical arrangements. 

.03 It shall be the responsibility of the servicing PAO to cooperate fully with and 
accede  to  all  reasonable  requests  from  news  media  representatives.  In  instances 
where  conflicts  or  misunderstandings  may  arise  from  the  expressed  views,  wishes, 
or  demands  on  the  part  of  news  media  representatives,  such  matters  should  be  re-
ferred at once to the Director for resolution. 

.04 The PAO Director shall exercise full authority and assume responsibility for 

all decisions involving the news media and related activity. 
Section 6: Internal Reporting 

.01 The agency will offer an internal disclosure system to allow for the confiden-
tial  reporting  and  meaningful  resolution  of  inappropriate  alterations,  conduct,  or 
conflicts of interest that arise with regards to media communications. 
Anti-Gag Addendum and Relevant Statutory Rights 

[As explained in the previous section, ‘‘Four cornerstones for freedom of speech in 

the context of scientific freedom.’’] 

Question 2. The Global Change Research Act of 1990 requires the Administration 
to  prepare  a  National  Assessment  of  the  Potential  Consequences  of  Climate  Varia-
bility and Change ‘‘no less frequently than every 4 years.’’ The only National Assess-
ment produced was by the Clinton Administration. In 2005, the GAO concluded that 
the Bush Administration’s plan to publish individual Synthesis and Assessment Re-
ports did not meet the statutory mandate of the Act. In fact only one of the proposed 
twenty-one  reports  has  been  released.  In  your  testimony  you  discuss  the  assess-
ment’s ability to provide response strategy options. 

What were some of these options as listed in the last Assessment? Did the Assess-

ment also include mitigation factors as well? 

Answer. Due to the limited time and resources for many of the studies during the 
first cycle of National Assessment reports, response strategy options were often only 
touched  upon  without  substantial  development.  However,  there  were  a  few  well- 
funded  studies  that  lasted  long  enough  to  start  to  get  at  these  questions.  I  expect 
there  would  have  been  substantially  more  development  of  response  strategy  issues 
had  the  first  reporting  cycle—which  produced  the  National  Assessment  Synthesis 
Team Overview and Foundation documents as well as a set of regional and sectoral 
reports—continued  into  an  extended  and  ongoing  assessment  process  as  originally 
intended. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

Thus, for example, in the Mid-Atlantic region (funded by EPA), a study was start-
ed along the southern New Jersey coast, working with stakeholders to consider how 
best to respond in the face of rising sea level (what areas to protect and how, what 
areas  to  agree  could  not  be  protected  and  would  be  transformed,  etc.).  EPA  also 
funded  a  study  for  a  few  years  along  the  Gulf  Coast  (Houston,  the  Louisiana  delta 
region, and an area in the panhandle region of Florida), with the intention of work-
ing with stakeholders to analyze what could be done. But with the new Administra-
tion’s completely non-supportive view of the National Assessment process, the study 
was  modified  to  focus  in  a  more  limited  way  on  the  question  of  what  information 
decisionmakers  would  need  in  order  to  address  the  issues.  The  impacts  of  climate 
variability  and  change  on  coastal  ecosystems  and  communities  is  one  key  area  in 
need of expert-stakeholder interaction to assess adaptation strategies. 

Another  general  area  is  water  resources.  There  have  been  studies  about  how 
water  management  should  be  adjusted  in  the  face  of  El  Nin˜ o/La  Nin˜ a  variations. 
It  is  my  understanding  that  California,  for  which  one  of  the  National  Assessment 
regional  reports  was  developed,  later  launched  a  significant  program  for  assessing 
the implications of climate change for water resources. Other regions should also be 
supported in developing this type of assessment activity. 

The early impact studies have led the Department of Transportation to undertake 
efforts to investigate adjustments it needs to make. DOT has one study in the Lou-
isiana delta region, and my understanding is that their workshops and other activi-
ties have identified a range of transportation infrastructure adaptation issues. 

The  first  National  Assessment  report  identified  a  wide  range  of  potential  con-
sequences  of  climate  change  and,  by  implication,  a  wide  range  of  potential  adapta-
tion response strategy issues facing policymakers and resource managers, region-by- 
region and sector-by-sector. In order to advance this work, the National Assessment 
process needs to be revitalized, with Federal support for a distributed process of ex-
pert  assessment  coupled  with  engagement  with  policymakers  and  other  stake-
holders. 

The  National  Assessment  process  initiated  in  the  late  1990s  focused  on  projected 
change  and  impacts,  pursuant  to  the  requirements  specified  in  the  Global  Change 
Research  Act.  The  project  did  not  address  the  complex  issues  of  mitigation  strate-
gies  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  and  thereby  slow  the  rate  of  global  warm-
ing.  It  did  not  focus  on  policy  options  for  developing  and  deploying  sustainable  en-
ergy technologies, nor on the relationship between energy alternatives and economic 
development. It did not address the need to consider climate change adaptation and 
mitigation  strategies  in  an  integrated  way—for  example,  looking  at  how  climate 
change  might  affect  wind  resources,  the  availability  of  water  resources  for  hydro-
power, agricultural resources for the production of biofuels, and the demand for en-
ergy for buildings and industry. 

In  my  judgment,  a  revitalized  National  Assessment  process  should  be  expanded 
to  incorporate  the  full  range  of  adaptation  and  mitigation  issues.  The  Federal  Gov-
ernment  should  commission  a  new  nationwide,  regionally-  and  sectorally-based  as-
sessment  of  technologies  and  strategies  for  mitigating  global  warming.  This  compo-
nent  of  the  assessment  should  include,  for  example,  energy  policy  experts,  renew-
able  energy  and  energy  efficiency  companies,  state  energy  offices,  electric  utilities, 
electricity regulators, and so on, somewhat analogous to the network established for 
the original National Assessment of climate change impacts. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

DR. F. SHERWOOD ROWLAND 

Question  1.  The  overall  levels  of  methane  in  the  atmosphere,  while  at  record  lev-
els,  have  stabilized  over  the  past  few  years.  Why  do  you  believe  this  is  happening 
and what, if any, are the policy implications of this stabilization? 

Answer.  The  standing  amount  of  methane  in  Earth’s  atmosphere  depends  upon 
the rates of emission of a dozen or more source types (swamps, cattle, termites, min-
ing, natural gas leaks) and upon the actual removal processes from the atmosphere. 
The removal occurs almost entirely by one chemical reaction, the attack by hydroxyl 
(HO)  radicals,  and  is  reasonably  well  established  and  measured.  However,  the 
sources  are  geographically  widely  distributed  and  seldom  intensively  studied  on  a 
global  basis  (e.g.  what  are  the  amounts  of  methane  released  from  Ugandan  cattle.) 
Some of the sources such as emissions from rice paddies are affected by changes in 
agricultural  practice  whose  effects  on  methane  emission  have  not  been  well  docu-
mented—rice  paddies  are  numerous,  vary  much  from  one  another  in  different  loca-
tions,  and  are  being  judged  by  relatively  few  experiments.  The  only  process  which 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

I know to reducing emissions are the efforts to close methane leaks from the oil and 
gas industry, and these efforts are in general not fully documented. 

Methane  is  in  a  different  timeline  category  than  most  of  the  other  greenhouse 
gases because its atmospheric lifetime is decadal in nature—about 8 years—in con-
trast  to  the  century  long  time  scale  of  carbon  dioxide,  nitrous  oxide  and  the 
chlorofluorocarbons,  on  the  one  hand,  and  the  monthly  scale  of  tropospheric  ozone 
and aerosols such as black carbon. Basically, the 1 percent growth rate in methane 
during  the  1980s  represented  emissions  equal  to  about  13  percent  of  the  total 
amount  present,  and  12  percent  loss  of  that  present—net  change  +1  percent.  The 
slow-down recently suggests that presently the emissions are now only about 12 per-
cent of the amount present, for a net balance of no change. 

This  suggests  two  aspects—first,  the  change  in  global  methane  concentration 
which has taken place has been in part spontaneous rather than from deliberate ac-
tions,  and  second,  that,  for  example,  a  concentrated  effort  on  finding  and  fixing 
leaks  in  the  existing  global  oil  and  natural  gas  delivery  system  might  well  tighten 
up  the  system  enough  to  drive  the  global  methane  concentration  downward,  and 
ease  somewhat  the  total  greenhouse  gas  strain  on  the  environment.  The  scattered 
reports  which  I  have  read  where  such  leaks  have  been  sought  and  fixed  indicates 
that—because  the  leaking  material  is  largely  a  commercial  fuel  which  could  other-
wise  be  sold—that  the  costs  for  rigorous  attention  to  the  reduction  of  leakage  may 
not have large associated net costs. 

Question 2. What kinds of deposits of methane is it feasible to trap or cap? 
Answer.  My  impression  is  that  trapping  and  capping  is  very  closely  associated 
with the concentration of methane gas—that is, the ratio of the amount of methane 
relative  to  the  amount  of  air  mixed  with  it  is  the  key  to  the  cost  and  thereby  the 
feasibility  of  trapping.  The  separation  of  methane  from  air  has  a  cost  associated 
with  it  which  is  generally  dependent  on  how  much  air  there  is,  rather  than  how 
much methane. The obvious first choice is closing the leaks of methane in the deliv-
ery  system,  not  yet  mixed  with  air.  On  the  other  end,  capping  of  rice  paddy  emis-
sions  or  the  bubbles  coming  up  from  the  melting  Siberian  tundra  represent  condi-
tions which are far less favorable for collection of the purified methane. 

Question 3. Politicizing the scientific process may make funding agencies hesitant 
to  support  controversial  science.  Also,  young  scientists  may  be  unwilling  to  gamble 
their  careers  on  an  area  of  research  where  their  funding  could  be  under  fire  from 
political  forces.  What  are  your  views  on  whether  the  funding  agencies  and  newly 
minted  Ph.D.s  are  more  or  less  wary  of  working  in  certain  controversial  areas  of 
science? 

Answer.  My  own  career  experience  began  with  roughly  two  decades  of  working 
with  radioactive  materials  under  circumstances  in  which  the  only  disagreements 
were  internal  within  the  scientific  conclusions  to  be  drawn  from  certain  experi-
ments, that is with almost no public contact. From this situation, the CFC/ozone de-
pletion  hypothesis  dropped  into  the  middle  of  deep  public  controversy.  The  political 
controversy in this case was basically not between national political parties but be-
tween  orientations  toward  the  environment  or  toward  industry.  In  the  1970s  and 
1980s,  there  were  strong  supporters  on  both  sides  from  both  the  Republican  and 
Democratic parties, in approximately equal numbers. The funding agency which was 
supporting  my  research  in  1973  was  the  U.S.  Atomic  Energy  Commission,  which 
had  been  supporting  my  radiochemical  research  in  a  long,  continuing  series  of  one- 
year contracts for 17 years. This support continued through the transition into pub-
lic  controversy,  as  well  as  through  the  transformation  of  the  AEC  into  ERDA  and 
then  DOE,  and  eventually  ended  in  1994.  By  this  time,  the  larger  part  of  research 
support  for  my  work  was  coming  from  NASA,  most  of  it  for  aircraft-based  atmos-
pheric  experiments  in  a  form  quite  different  from  our  original  laboratory-based  ex-
periments. 

The  most  obvious  changes  in  the  ‘‘CFC/ozone  controversial’’  period,  (which  lasted 
approximately 14 years until the adoption of the Montreal Protocol in 1987 and the 
NASA  Ozone  Trends  Panel  report  early  in  1988)  were  the  drying  up  of  invitations 
to  give  seminars  to  U.S.  chemistry  departments  (but  an  increase  to  other  depart-
ments)  and  applications  for  postdoctoral  positions  from  U.S.  students.  Applications 
for postdoctoral positions from Asian and European universities continued as before, 
especially from Japan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. TED STEVENS TO 

THOMAS R. KNUTSON 

Question  1.  From  what  I  understand,  you  are  one  of  the  only  scientists  that  has 
alleged  censoring  from  NOAA.  Considering  that  the  agency  sends  out  over  10,300 
reports,  press  releases,  and  press  contacts  annually,  do  you  believe  that  there  is 
truly a systemic problem at the agency? 

Answer.  The  problem  is  more  serious  than  implied  in  the  question.  At  the  hear-
ing. I focused on my own experiences, with a few anecdotal comments about the ex-
periences  of  others  at  GFDL.  Being  an  active  researcher,  I  have  little  time  to  ex-
plore/document  the  pervasiveness  of  these  problems  at  NOAA  in  detail.  However, 
a recent report by the Government Accountability Project has researched this ques-
tion in some detail. The full report can be downloaded from this site: 

http://www.whistleblower.org/doc/2007/ 

Final%203.28%20Redacting%20Climate%20science%20Report.pdf 

Based on this report, it seems clear that the interference that government climate 
scientists  at  NOAA  and  other  agencies  have  experienced  in  their  interactions  with 
the media is not just confined to a few isolated incidents involving a few scientists. 
Rather,  there  have  clearly  been  more  numerous  incidents  than  should  be  tolerated 
at any agency, in my opinion. 

The  10,300  NOAA  reports  and  contacts  annually  is  not  a  very  appropriate  sta-
tistic in the context of the problems being discussed, which are focused on the much 
smaller set of reports and individuals involved with leading-edge global warming re-
search.  For  example,  former  GFDL  directory  Jerry  Mahlman  is  quoted  in  the  GAP 
report as follows: 

‘‘NOAA  employs  roughly  1.200  people,  the  large  majority  of  which  have  little 
or  nothing  to  do  with  climate,  or  climate  change.  I  think  it  is  fair  to  say  that 
there are about 120 people who are connected with the climate problem in some 
form  other  another.  . . .  Of  that  roughly  120  people,  I  would  estimate  that 
about,  say,  20  of  them  are  the  ones  who  are  actively  submitting  climate-warm-
ing relevant scientific papers to prestigious scientific journals . . .’’ 

The  NOAA  incidents  outlined  in  the  GAP  report  typically  involve  some  of  these 
scientists (who are relatively rare within NOAA) that are publishing leading climate 
warming-relevant research in such journals. 

In my opinion, NOAA should take pride in the accomplishments of its climate sci-
entists within the ranks of the organization, and should encourage their interactions 
with  the  media.  Instead  the  incidents  outlined  in  the  GAP  report  reveal  an  organi-
zation where a number of these scientists have at times had to try to overcome var-
ious hurdles from NOAA public affairs, and elsewhere in the government, in trying 
to  convey  their  science  to  the  general  public.  Since  their  research  is  funded  by  the 
U.S.  tax  payers,  it  seems  appropriate  to  me  that  the  tax  payers  should  be  entitled 
to  learn  about  the  results  of  the  research  that  they  are  paying  for,  without  inter-
ference from NOAA public affairs or other parts of the Federal Government. 

Question  2.  I  understand  that  the  recent  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate 
Change report concludes that much of the warming over the past 50 years is caused 
by humans. I am concerned about human-caused factors. However, I am also inter-
ested in the effects of natural causes such as solar flares and the impact of the Pa-
cific and Atlantic decadal oscillations. Do you feel enough has been done to examine 
the impacts of natural factors on climate change? 

Answer.  This  is  a  very  interesting  question.  My  colleague  Tom  Delworth  and  I 
published  an  article  in  the  journal  Science  several  years  ago  examining  possible 
causes  for  warming  during  the  20th  century,  focusing  especially  on  the  early  20th 
century warming. Here is a link to the article: http://www.gfdl noaa.gov/reference/ 
bibliography/2000/td0002.pdf 

Our  analysis  suggests  that  natural  internal  climate  variability  played  a  promi-
nent role in the early 20th century warming, perhaps comparable to that of increas-
ing greenhouse gases. In particular the strong warm event that occurred in the high 
latitudes  of  the  northern  hemisphere  around  the  1940s  seemed  to  fit  best  with  an 
explanation  of  a  strong  role  (in  that  region)  for  internal  climate  variability.  In  the 
high northern latitudes, particularly around the North Atlantic, temperatures actu-
ally  cooled  from  the  1940s  to  the  1970s.  Based  on  this  analysis,  there  does  seem 
to  be  a  role  for  internal  climate  variability  in  explaining  some  of  the  multi-decadal 
temperature variations during the 20th century. In fact, our climate model produced 
fairly realistic examples of such variations. 

However,  there  is  little  evidence  that  natural  internal  variability  has  caused  the 
global  scale  warming  that  has  taken  place  from  the  late  1800s  to  the  present.  This 
warming has a much different spatial pattern than the multi-decadal variation that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

took  place  in  high  northern  latitudes  in  the  early  20th  century.  The  broad-scale 
long-time  scale  global  warming  has  no  ‘‘naturally  occurring’’  analog  in  our  climate 
model  simulations.  However,  it  is  rather  well-reproduced  in  our  model  if  we  force 
the  model  using  best  estimates  of  the  changes  in  greenhouse  gases  and  aerosols 
since the late 1800s. 

Our view is that high northern latitude regions are characterized by a greater de-
gree  of  natural  multi-decadal  climate  variability  than  elsewhere  on  the  globe.  This 
can complicate the detection of the greenhouse warming signal in those regions. For 
example,  is  the  more  rapid  warming  in  recent  years  in  high  northern  latitudes  an 
example  of  polar  amplification  of  the  greenhouse  warming  signal?  Or  is  it  another 
manifestation of internal climate variability, perhaps combined with a more modest 
greenhouse  warming  signal?  The  short  answer  is  that  we  don’t  know  at  this  time. 
However, we can say with a high degree of confidence that the global warming sig-
nal is not solely natural in origin, but rather that a large part of the global warming 
has been caused by increases in greenhouse gases from human activity. 

Is  enough  being  done  to  understand  the  role  of  natural  factors?  I  think  there  is 
room for expanded research efforts on this topic (in fact on both natural and human- 
caused  climate  change).  However,  I  don’t  believe  that  the  relative  degree  of  effort 
being  expended  on  understanding  these  two  topics  (natural  vs.  human-caused  cli-
mate change) is seriously out of line at this time. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:38 Oct 04, 2010 Jkt 035039 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35039.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

